Immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in Indian visceral leishmaniasis.Stored sera from 429 Indian subjects were assayed to extend the analysis of the accuracy of immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in the non-invasive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). All 225 samples from patients with proven Leishmania infection tested positive [estimated sensitivity = 100%; 95% confidence interval (CI)=98%-100%]. Sera from 99 of the 100 symptomatic patients with other diseases were non-reactive (estimated specificity = 99%; CI = 94%-100%). However, samples from 13 of the 104 apparently healthy controls showed positive strip-test results (estimated specificity = 88%; CI = 79%-93%), yielding an overall specificity of 93% (190/204; CI = 88%-96%). If applied in a practical clinical setting (on symptomatic patients in whom active VL is suspected and other common infections have been excluded), strip testing of serum for anti-K39 antibody should be both sensitive and specific for diagnosing VL in India.Antigen detection from urine of Kala-azar cases by latex agglutination test.A recently developed Latex agglutination method known as "KATEX" for detecting leishmanial antigen in urine of Kala-azar patients was evaluated on 97 Kala-azar cases and 35 controls in the department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College during the period from March' 2004 to February' 2005. The method yielded sensitivity as 100% and 82.8% in 33 confirmed and 64 ICT positive cases respectively. Since 8.6% controls showed antigen positive results, so specificity of KATEX was calculated as 91.4%. KATEX methods for antigen detection in urine should be used as an early immuno-diagnostic test as it has yielded high sensitivity. But interpretation of a positive test must be made cautiously having correlation with clinical findings as because it becomes false positive in Kala-azar free person. Further elucidation of KATEX method including larger population from community giving particular emphasis on its prognostic use was strongly recommended.Performance of a rapid diagnostic test for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis in a large urban setting.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may improve the early detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), but their real-world performance requires additional study. Therefore, we evaluated the performance of an rK39-based RDT (Kalazar Detect™) for the detection of VL in an endemic, large urban area.Data were collected from a registry of rK39 RDT performed at 11 emergency care units in Belo Horizonte, Brazil, and from a national database of reportable communicable diseases of the Sistema de Informação de Agravos de Notificação (SINAN).The rapid rK39 test was performed in 476 patients, with 114 (23.9%) positive results. The analysis of rK39 RDT performance was based on 381 (80%) cases reported to the SINAN database, of which 145 (38.1%) were confirmed cases. Estimates for sensitivity and specificity were 72.4% (95% CI: 64.6-79%) and 99.6% (95%CI: 97.6-99.9%), respectively. Positive and negative predictive values were estimated at 99.1% (95%CI: 94.9-99.8%) and 85.5% (95%CI: 80.8-89.1%), respectively. In addition, close agreement between the rK39 RDT and indirect immunofluorescence was observed.In summary, the rK39 RDT showed a high specificity but only moderate sensitivity. In endemic areas for VL, treatment may be considered in cases with clinical manifestations and a positive rK39 RDT, but those with a negative test should be subjected to further investigation.Rapid & reliable diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis.Comparison of microscopic examination, rK39, and PCR for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis in Turkey.The laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis is based on microscopic examination, culture, serological tests, and molecular methods. In this study, we examined 50 blood specimens from suspected visceral leishmaniasis patients by microscopic examination, recombinant antigen dipstick test (rK39), and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in the University of Cukurova, Faculty of Medicine, Parasitology Department in Turkey. We calculated the sensitivity-specificity and positive-negative predictive values for these diagnostic tests. We found that positive predictive value of microscopy examination, rK39 dipstick test, and PCR were 20%, 24%, and 58% for visceral leishmaniasis, respectively. When we compared polymerase chain reaction, recombinant antigen dipstick test, and microscopic examination for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis, the polymerase chain reaction is more sensitive (100%) than recombinant antigen dipstick test and microscopy examination.Compararative evaluation of rK9, rK26 and rK39 antigens in the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis.This study was designed for comparative evaluation of two relatively newer recombinant hydrophilic antigens, rK9 and rK26 of Leishmania chagasi along with rK39 (a 39-aminoacid-repetitive immunodominant B-cell epitope of kinesin-related antigen from L. chagasi) and crude soluble antigen (CSA) for the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) patients by quantitative ELISA.In the present study a total of 80 subjects comprising of 55 confirmed VL cases and 25 endemic controls (EC) were subjected to ELISA using four different antigens, namely rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA (derived from Leishmania donovani promastigotes).Sensitivity was as follows: 78% (95%CI 63-100%) for rK9, 38% (95%CI 28-59%) for rK26, 100% for rK39, and 80% (95% CI 65-100%) for CSA. The specificity of rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA was found to be 84% (95%CI 61-100%), 80% (95%CI 56-100%), 96% (95%CI 75-100%) and 72% (95%CI 49-100%), respectively.rK39 was observed to be the most suitable antigen as compared to rK26 and rK9 whereas rK9 performed better than rK26. Hence rK9 antigen may either be used as an adjunct to rK39 for accurate diagnosis of VL or may be used in the absence or non-availability of rK39 antigen for the serodiagnosis.Standardization of the dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA) for human visceral leishmaniasis.The Dot-ELISA, a rapid, visually read micro enzyme immunoassay for visceral leishmaniasis utilizing minute volumes of antigen "dotted" on nitrocellulose filter discs and precipitable chromogenic substrate, was analyzed under a variety of experimental parameters. Raising assay incubation temperatures from 23 degrees C to 28 degrees C resulted in titer increases in three of five leishmaniasis patient sera; at 37 degrees C, all five patient sera and one of five normal human sera showed titer increases. The amount of antigen used could be reduced 50% by incubating patient serum overnight at 4 degrees C. Antigen discs stored at - 20 degrees C were optimally reactive with leishmaniasis sera over a 270-day period. Antigen discs stored at 4 degrees C and 23 degrees C showed reproducible titer decreases at 90 days. Aging either peroxidase-conjugated antibody or substrate for up to 28 days at 4 degrees C did not adversely affect titers of positive and negative control sera and reagent controls. Activated substrate stored at 23 degrees C was optimally reactive in the assay for at least 24 hours. No changes in titers of positive and negative control sera or nonspecific reactions in reagent controls occurred when using different brands of microtiter plates. The long shelf lives and stabilities of Dot-ELISA antigen and reagents indicate this test should prove useful both in the laboratory and in the field.Value of a dipstick based on recombinant RK39 antigen for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis from other sympatric endemic diseases in Venezuela.A laboratory trial using recombinant rK39 dipsticks for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) from other sympatric endemic diseases which share similar clinic features (Chagas disease, malaria, schistosomiasis and toxoplasmosis) was conducted in Venezuela. The 100% specificity of the test previously obtained in other countries was confirmed. The use of this test at the primary health care level in Venezuela for a rapid diagnosis of active AVL cases, which may avoid deaths, is recommended.Potential non-invasive urine-based antigen (protein) detection assay to diagnose active visceral leishmaniasis.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bihar India: comparison of the rK39 rapid diagnostic test on whole blood versus serum.Antibody-detecting rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) against rK39 are available to aid in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Although these rK39 RDTs have been developed, validated and approved for use with serum, they are universally performed using whole blood. It was therefore necessary to determine whether this RDT is as sensitive on whole blood as on serum.In this study we compared the rK39 RDT on serum and blood samples from 624 individuals with symptoms of VL attending the outpatient clinic at the Rajendra Memorial Research Institute of Medical Sciences, Patna, India. A total of 251 cases (40%) were both serum and blood-positive and 26 cases (4%) were identified as blood-negative and serum-positive. These 26 individuals in general had low titer antibodies against rK39 as determined by ELISA and follow-up on most of these individuals revealed none had persistent VL symptoms. The Cohen kappa index comparing blood and serum was 0.88 indicating excellent concordance.Although the concordance was excellent, it is possible to miss rK39 positive individuals when using blood and the titer of anti-rK39 antibodies is low. We recommend that when an individual from an endemic area has obvious clinical symptoms of VL and the whole blood rK39 RDT is negative, that the test should be redone 2-3 weeks later if the symptoms persist.Diagnosis of Indian kala-azar by dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (dot-ELISA).Serodiagnosis of kala-azar was determined by dot-ELISA under variable conditions such as may be encountered in the field, for example, in the nature of the antigen, the preservation of antigen at different temperatures, variation in incubation temperature and so on. The test was found to be useful under field conditions, and the correlation between ELISA and dot-ELISA was significant. Dot-ELISA has definite advantages over the ELISA test, as it is easy to perform, is stable and does not require expensive equipment. The test can be used for large-scale screening of sera in sero-epidemiological studies.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The purpose of this study was to compare the performance of a rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test for the qualitative detection of circulating antibodies to the leishmanial recombinant antigen K39 with that of a classical immunofluorescent antibody test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Sera from 143 Italian subjects, including 69 patients with clinically suspected visceral leishmaniasis, 23 patients with hypergammaglobulinemia and 51 healthy controls, were tested. The immunochromatographic test was performed according to the manufacturer's instructions, using antigen-impregnated nitrocellulose paper strips. The immunofluorescent antibody test was performed according to an established method, using promastigotes of Leishmania infantum zymodeme Montpellier 1 as antigen. In 11 patients, diagnosis of active Leishmania infection was established by microscopic examination of biopsy samples and/or clinical response to meglumine antimoniate. Results of the two tests correlated for all but two sera examined. In two patients, one with proven infectious mononucleosis and one with bacterial pneumonia, the immunofluorescent antibody test was positive and the dipstick test was negative. In the restricted sample of patients in whom a definitive diagnosis was established, the immunochromatographic test was positive in 11 of 11 patients with confirmed Leishmania infection and negative in 103 of 103 subjects who either had other documented diseases or were healthy controls, showing 100% sensitivity and 100% specificity.Noninvasive management of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: clinical application of diagnosis by K39 antigen strip testing at a kala-azar referral unit.Firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) requires organ aspiration and microscopic examination of tissue specimens. To determine the usefulness of noninvasive diagnosis by strip test detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin (Ig) G antibody in blood specimens obtained by fingerstick, 143 Indian patients with suspected kala-azar (fever, splenomegaly, anemia) were studied. Of 120 strip test-positive subjects (subjects with presumed kala-azar [group A]), amphotericin B treatment induced clinical cure in 119. Of 23 strip test-negative subjects (subjects presumed to have other diseases [group B]), 16 had other disorders diagnosed at entry, 4 responded to empiric antimalarial therapy, 2 were proven to have kala-azar, and 1 died elsewhere after undergoing splenic aspiration. Six months after treatment ended, all 120 patients in group A and the 18 assessable patients in group B were healthy. In a region in India where visceral infection is prevalent, strip test detection of anti-K39 IgG is a clinically promising diagnostic guide in persons with suspected kala-azar.Detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis by a latex agglutination test.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually done by demonstration of parasites in tissue smears. However, obtaining these smears may be risky, painful, and difficult. Antibody-based diagnostics are limited by their inability to predict active disease. In this study, a new latex agglutination test (KAtex), which detects parasite antigen in freshly voided and boiled urine, was evaluated in patients with VL before the start (n = 382) and at the end of treatment (n = 273); 185 healthy controls from leishmaniasis-endemic region were also studied. The KAtex result was positive in 87% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 83.3-90.3). However, at the end of treatment only 3% (95% CI = 1.6-6.2) patients were positive. The specificity of the test was 99% and 2 of 185 healthy controls tested positive. Positive and negative predictive values were 0.994 and 0.788, respectively. KAtex is a promising test, and in a simplified and improved format it could be applied meaningfully in the diagnosis of VL.The latex agglutination test: standardization and comparison with direct agglutination and dot-ELISA in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in India.Laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually based on the detection of Leishmania amastigotes in samples of bone marrow or splenic aspirate obtained by invasive procedures. Serological tests serve as a useful adjunct and are especially valuable in early or highly immune cases where amastigotes may be too scanty to be seen easily. The direct agglutination test (DAT) is generally considered the most suitable of the four types of tests currently employed (IFAT, counter immuno-electrophoresis, ELISA and DAT). However, the latex agglutination test (LAT) was recently reported to be a rapid and sensitive screening tool for VL and one which could be carried out at the patient's bedside. Further standardization and evaluation of LAT has now revealed that although it is comparable with DAT and dot-ELISA in terms of sensitivity it is far inferior because of cross-reactivity with other infections. This lack of specificity makes LAT unsuitable for routine diagnosis of VL even though it is rapid and sensitive. DAT still appears to be the best choice as a diagnostic tool, as it is very specific and does not require expensive equipment or reagents or much technical competence and the result can be visually interpreted. These merits make DAT very suitable for the diagnosis of VL in endemic areas of India.[Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum. Update on the utility of the IT-Leish and ID-Pagia leishmaniasis tests].The purpose of this article is to update information about Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum in man and about the canine reservoir. Special emphasis is placed on laboratory diagnosis tests for Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis (MVL) in humans. In addition two rapid diagnostic tests for human leishmaniasis are compared based on indirect immunofluorescence and Western blot. Findings show that the overall sensitivity of the two tests in immunocompetent and immunodepressed patients ranged from 54% to 97%, a specificity of 97%, with positive predictive value ranging from 75% to 97% and a negative predictive value of around 95%. For diagnosis of cutaneous leishmaniasis, positivity of these tests in one case out of 2 underscores the predictive value of a positive test.Rapid screening with a recombinant antigen (rK39) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis using dipstick.To evaluate the diagnostic value of the recombinant antigen of 39 amino acid repeats encoded by a kinesin-like gene of Leishmania changasi (rK39) in serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL).In Kashi, Xinjiang, 13 VL patients with splenomegaly and bone marrow aspirate culture positive were subjected to dipstick assay. A drop of whole blood or serum from patient was placed at the absorbing pad at the bottom of the dipstick. Flooding of the bottom protein with buffer allows serum proteins to migrate upwards, producing the positive band and Western blot analysis of rK39 subsequently performed with the sera collected.The end-point titers of anti-rK39 antibodies of these sera were determined by ELISA and found to fall within the range of 10(-2) to 10(-4), which were consistent with the intensity of their reaction with rK39 in dipstick assay. The positive sera could also recognize the specific rK39 band as analyzed by Western blot analysis.The rK39 dipstick assay is more rapid, specific, sensitive and less invasive than the conventional methods of diagnosis for VL in the areas of low endemicity.Testing urine samples with rK39 strip as the simplest non-invasive field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis: an early report from eastern India.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is a major obstacle in the control of this disease. The rK39 strip-test using patient's blood is a breakthrough; however, it still requires a blood sample, which is a concern for safety in the field. We tried to simplify the test using the patient's urine instead of blood.To observe the sensitivity and specificity of the urine test in comparison with the blood test.We tested active and post-treatment VL patients, Post Kala azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL), VL/HIV and control subjects (healthy, disease suspects and diseased other than VL) with the rK39 strip-test using blood and urine samples.The level of agreement between the urine and blood testing was calculated by inter-rater agreement (kappa) statistics.Forty-two active VL, 40 treated VL, six PKDL, three VL/HIV and 139 controls (54 healthy, 21 disease suspects and 64 diseased other than VL) were tested. All VL-related cases showed positive results with urine as well as blood samples (100%). The urine testing was found to have 100% sensitivity and 86.33% specificity for the diagnosis of VL. Kappa statistic between the two methods was 0.916 (P<0.001). Urine testing had more false-positive results in comparison with blood testing (13.67% vs. 9.45%), but the test subjects were from VL-endemic areas and they might be exposed to Leishmania donovani infection.The present study has the potentiality of providing a new, yet simplest non-invasive screening tool for VL in remote rural areas.[Investigation of Leishmania infantum seropositivity in HIV/AIDS patients].In recent years an increase in the rate of detection of HIV and Leishmania co-infections has been reported from many countries especially countries in Southern Europe. Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is sporadically detected in some parts of Turkey. Although the natural transmission is via sandfly bites, VL may be transmitted by needle sharing of intravenous drug addicts or by blood transfusion in HIV/AIDS patients. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence of specific antibodies against Leishmania infantum, which is the causative agent of VL, in the sera of HIV/AIDS patients. A total of 79 HIV/AIDS patients (61 male, 18 female; mean age: 30 +/- 2 years) with confirmed diagnosis by HIV Reference Laboratory of Refik Saydam Hygiene Center between the years of 2004-2006, were included in the study. L. infantum antibodies were searched by fast agglutination screening test (FAST), direct agglutination test (DAT), indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) and rK39 dipstick assay. Only one serum sample (1.2%) was found to be seropositive by all of the serological tests (> 1/100 by FAST, 1/3200 by DAT, 1/256 by IFAT, and specific bands for L. infantum by rK39 dipstick test), while the remaining samples were negative with all of the methods. The seropositive serum was from a 49 years-old heterosexual male, living on the Mediterranean cost and has had acquired the HIV infection by sexual contact. He has no history of intravenous drug use but he had experienced blood transfusion. Since the seropositive serum sample was collected 2-3 weeks after the transfusion, the transmission of L. infantum was thought to be during blood transfusion, however it could also be acquired via a previous sandfly bite. In conclusion although the rate of L. infantum seropositivity was low in HIV/AIDS patients in our study, the possibility of HIV/Leishmania co-infections should be considered.Evaluation of latex agglutination test (KAtex) for early diagnosis of kala-azar.Kala-azar is one of the major public health problem in Bangladesh. But the diagnosis of the problem often is difficult, unusual and time consuming, a simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, reliable and rapid diagnostic test has been a long-felt need of the clinicians. Therefore, the present study was conducted to see the sensitivity and specificity of Latex Agglutination test (KAtex) to detect leishmanial antigen from urine of kala-azar cases. The study was carried out in the department of Paediatrics, Mymensingh Medical College and Hospital, Bangladesh during July to December, 2008. A total of 100 urine samples were collected of which 50 were confirmed kala-azar cases and 50 were age and sex matched controls. Out of 50 kala-azar cases 47 showed positive result of KAtex. The test was also positive in 01 out of 30 healthy controls. None of the febrile controls was positive by KAtex. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test using presence of LD bodies in splenic and/or bone marrow aspirate as gold standard were 94%, 98%, 97.91% and 94.23% respectively. KAtex is simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, rapid and reliable test for diagnosing kala-azar in endemic area and useful for small, less equipped laboratories as well as for the laboratories with better facilities.Sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of immunochromatographic strip test in diagnosis of childhood kala-azar.In Bangladesh, the total population at risk for kala-azar exceeds 20 million (18%) living in 88 Thana (19%) of 27 districts (42%). A confirmatory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) is done by demonstration of the parasite (LD body) in organ aspirates or tissue biopsy sample, an invasive procedure with relatively low sensitivity. To assess the diagnostic usefulness of ICT for antibody against the leishmanial antigen rK39 & its feasibility for use under field conditions (rural areas). An experimental study conducted during January, 2003 to July, 2003 in pediatrics department of MMCH including 60 confirmedly diagnosed KA cases & 60 controls having diseases other than KA. One drop of peripheral blood is applied to the nitrocellulose strip & 3 drops of test buffer is added to the dried blood. Observing 2 visible bands indicates presence of IgG anti-K39. The rK39 strip test was positive in 57 out of 60 confirmed KA case diagnosed by LD body demonstration in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The estimated sensitivity was 95%. One control diagnosed as other than KA had positive strip test but negative aspirate smear. The estimated specificity of the strip test was 98.3%. The predictive value of a positive result is 98.3% & that of a negative result is 93.5%. rK39 strip test is highly sensitive & specific in our situation & it can be used as a simple & the best method for diagnosis of KA in rural areas.Diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis with the recombinant K39 strip test: experience from the Sudan.We compared a strip test employing recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen and protein A/colloidal gold as read-out agents with the rK39 ELISA for IgM and IgG antibodies and the direct agglutination test (DAT) using 55 sera from patients with parasitologically confirmed visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The rK39 strip test was positive in 37/55 (67%), the DAT in 50/55 (91%) at > or = 1 : 1600 cut-off value and in 47/55 (85%) at > or = 1 : 6400 cut-off value. The rK39-ELISA gave positive IgG results for all sera; those who had a positive strip test had significantly higher IgG levels than those with a negative strip test (31.1 (SD=3.6) and 17.7 U/ml (SD=9.8), respectively, P < 0.0001). A total of 31/55 (56%) sera showed a positive IgM result; of these 27 (49%) had a positive strip test. We tested 115 apparently cured VL patients with the strip test during follow-up; 68 were also tested with DAT. In the strip test, 25-43% of patients had a positive result at time points 3, 6, 9 and 12 months after treatment; for DAT (cut-off > or = 1 : 1600) these results were 67-83%. In neither test did a significant decrease in positivity rates occur over time (P=0.37 for the strip test, P=0.17 for the DAT). No correlation (P=0.33) was found between a positive strip test and a positive DAT result (cut-off > or = 1: 1600), indicating that the strip test and DAT are complementary rather than interchangeable. Of 61 endemic controls two (3%) had a positive strip test result; both had a positive leishmanin skin test. The rK39 strip test has the ideal format for use in the field, but its sensitivity is limited; like DAT, but to a lesser extent, it remains positive after treatment.Rapid immunochromatographic strip test for detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin G antibodies for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.InBios International has developed an immunochromatographic rapid strip for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis that requires minimal equipment and only a small amount of blood to run a test. We compared the InBios rapid strip test with the CDC immunofluorescent antibody assay, and the agreement, sensitivity, and specificity were 98%, 90%, and 100%, respectively.Latex agglutination test for the detection of urinary antigens in visceral leishmaniasis.This paper describes a new latex agglutination test ('KATEX') for the detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. In preliminary laboratory trials, using urine collected from well-defined cases and controls from Brazil, Yemen and Nepal, the test had 100% specificity and a sensitivity between 68 and 100%. When used in a time-course experiment in cotton rats infected with Leishmania donovani, the test became positive 1 week after inoculation and antigen levels in urine declined rapidly after chemotherapy (the test was negative before the end of the course of treatment). Finally, in an integrated study performed in Sudan, KATEX was compared to microscopy and four different serological tests in a group of 73 patients having presented with clinical manifestations suggestive of visceral leishmaniasis. Compared to microscopy, KATEX performed better than any single serological test in predicting positivity and a particularly good result was obtained by combining KATEX and the direct agglutination test (DAT).Evaluation of the direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The direct agglutination test (DAT) based on a freeze-dried antigen and the rK39 dipstick test were evaluated for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The sensitivity and specificity of both tests were determined using sera from confirmed VL patients (n = 21), healthy controls (n = 19) and from patients with other confirmed infectious diseases (n = 42). The DAT had a sensitivity and a specificity of 100%. The rK39 had a sensitivity of 85.7% and a specificity of 82%. Both tests were also used to screen blood samples of confirmed VL patients (n = 15) and serum samples of VL suspects (n = 61). The DAT found all blood samples of confirmed VL patients positive and tested 98.4% of the serum samples of the VL suspects positive. In contrast, rK39 detected in 9/15 blood samples (60%) antibodies against Leishmania chagasi and found 85.3% of the serum samples of the suspected patients positive. Although the rK39 dipstick is more rapid and user friendlier than the DAT, the latter has a superior sensitivity and specificity. Furthermore, the reagents used for DAT do not require cold storage, whereas the buffer of the rK39 must be stored at 4oC. Therefore, the DAT is the most suitable test for the sero-diagnosis of VL under field conditions.Comparison of new diagnostic tools for management of pediatric Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis.New techniques are available for diagnosing leishmaniasis, but their efficacy in the identification of pediatric visceral leishmaniasis (VL) has not been compared with that of traditional methods. Blood, bone marrow, and urine samples were taken from 25 children with VL during their first clinical episode, 22 days after the start of treatment with liposomal amphotericin B (3 mg/kg/day on 6 days over a 10-day period), and when a relapse was suspected during follow-up. The results obtained suggest that antibody detection techniques, the antigen detection in urine (KAtex kit), and Leishmania nested PCR (LnPCR) analysis of the blood could be used for diagnosis of the first clinical episode. After treatment, clinical improvement was associated with negativization of Novy-MacNeal-Nicolle culture and microscopy of bone marrow aspirate, KAtex test, and LnPCR blood analysis results. Interestingly, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow aspirate showed that sterile cure was not achieved in eight patients, two of which suffered a relapse within 10 to 20 weeks. All of the new noninvasive techniques tested showed high diagnostic sensitivity. However, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow was the most sensitive; this test was able to detect the persistence of parasites and predict potential relapses.Sensitivity and specificity of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test has become available for the qualitative detection of total anti-Leishmania immunoglobulins using the recombinant K39 antigen. To evaluate the test, 96 serum specimens from patients with a variety of tropical infections were tested. Fourteen of the specimens derived from patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar, and all were strongly positive for antibodies to Leishmania donovani complex using the immunofluorescence test. Although all 82 samples negative by the immunofluorescence test were confirmed as negative by the dipstick assay, only 10 (71.4%) of the 14 positive samples were reactive. These results indicate that the test in its current form lacks sufficient sensitivity to be recommended as a screening tool, but it might be useful for indicating further diagnostic procedures in a clinical setting.Easy test for visceral Leishmaniasis and post-Kala-azar Dermal Leishmaniasis.Performance of recombinant K39 antigen in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis.This study evaluated the performance of recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen in a immunochromatographic format (strip test) and a crude antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in 128 consecutive patients with parasitologically proven infections (by microscopy and/or culture). For each patient, a medical history was obtained and a complete physical examination was performed. Controls included 10 healthy volunteers and 50 patients with other diseases: malaria (10), leprosy (9), Chagas' disease (10), tuberculosis (10), and cutaneous leishmaniasis (11). The sensitivities of the rK39 antigen strip test and the ELISA were 90% and 89%, respectively, while the specificities were 100% and 98%, respectively. Our study confirms the accuracy of the rK39 antigen strip test in the diagnosis of VL in a high prevalence population.Improvement of the newly developed latex agglutination test (Katex) for diagnosis of visceral lieshmaniasis.Different methods are available for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), among them the urine-based antigen detection assay, latex agglutination test (Katex), is a recently developed one. The main drawback of the test is false-positive reactivity in some of healthy individuals. The false positivity of the test can be removed by boiling the urine sample for 5 min before testing. In this study an attempt was made to improve Katex by removing unpleasant boiling process, which also decreases field applicability of the test.False-positive and true-positive urine samples were collected from VL patients and healthy individuals. Both samples were then treated by reagents including, sodium dodecyl sulfate, trichloroacetic acid, dithiothreitol (DTT), sulphosalicylic acid and also heating at 56 degrees C.Findings of this study showed that DTT pretreatment significantly reduced the rate of false-positive reactivity of Katex where 73% of false-positive urine samples changed to negative after DTT treatment. However, the DTT treatment reduced the rate of true positivity by 14%.These data indicate that DTT can be used to eliminate nonspecific reactivity in the Katex. This will improve the performance of Katex and make it a more convenient and field applicable test.Dot-ELISA using monoclonal antibodies for identification of Leishmania donovani.In search of an ideal test for diagnosis and prognosis of kala-azar.The latex agglutination test (KAtex), direct agglutination test (DAT), and the rK39 immuno-chromatographic strip test (dipstick test) were evaluated for their role in the diagnosis and prognosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) in India. Sera and urine samples from 455 subjects--150 confirmed visceral leishmaniasis cases, 160 endemic controls, 100 non-endemic controls, and 45 other febrile diseases--were included in the study. The sensitivity of the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test was 87% [95% confidence interval (CI) 80-96], 93.3% (95% CI 88-100), and 98% (95% CI 93-100) respectively. The specificity of these tests was 98% (95% CI 93-100), 93% (95% CI 87-100), and 89% (95% CI 82-97) for the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test respectively. Fifty cases were followed up and subjected to the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test after 30 days of successful treatment. The DAT and rK39 strip test showed positive results in all the 50 cases whereas the KAtex showed no positive reaction in any case. Based on the results, it is concluded that the sensitivity and specificity of the DAT and rK39 strip test are comparable but the greater convenience of use of the strip test makes it a better tool for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in the peripheral areas of endemic regions whereas the sensitivity of the KAtex needs to be improved to promote its use as a first-line diagnostic test in the field-setting. It may be used for the prognosis of the disease as antigen becomes undetectable in urine after 30 days of the completion of the treatment. Alternatively, it can be used as an adjunct with rK39 for sero-epidemiological surveys.K39 strip test--easy, reliable and cost-effective field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis in India.A firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires demonstration of the parasite in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the usefulness of K39 strip test as a noninvasive method of diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis under field conditions by testing serum antibody to the leishmanial antigen K39.One drop of serum/blood was applied to the sample application pad on the test strip, which was diluted with 2 drops of chase buffer solution. The development of two visible red lines indicates the presence of IgG anti-K39. In the first phase of the study (2001), a total of 200 patients (Active VL-70, ex-VL-30, healthy endemic control-20 and patients with other tropical diseases-80) were tested with the K39 strip test at the School of Tropical Medicine, Kolkata. In the second phase of the study (2002), the test was applied in a remote tribal area of West Bengal where an epidemic of VL had occurred. Thirty-two patients were identified in 207 villagers of the affected area; all of them were tested with the K39 strip test.In the first phase, all VL and ex-VL cases gave positive results (100%). Ten percent of the healthy endemic controls were positive. The test results were negative in all other prevalent tropical diseases (100%). The estimated sensitivity of the test was 100% and the specificity was 98.18%. In the second phase of the study, all 32 patients of the epidemic were shown to be positive. All patients were treated with sodium stibogluconate injections and they recovered uneventfully.K39 strip test is ideal for rapid reliable field diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. The test has high sensitivity and specificity but it remains positive long after treatment (up to 3 years).[Katex for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis].Katex is a latex agglutination test allowing highly specific detection Leishmania antigen in urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. A multicentric study of this new diagnostic tool which is also effective in patients co-infected by leishmaniasis and HIV is currently in progress in Sudan, India, Nepal, Brazil and Spain. The authors describe the utility of this technique in comparison with other routine diagnostic procedures such as microscopic examination and serological tests. Preliminary results suggest that it could be used to confirm infection in the field and to monitor treatment efficacy.Evaluation of two rK39 dipstick tests, direct agglutination test, and indirect fluorescent antibody test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in a new epidemic site in highland Ethiopia.We assessed the performance characteristics of two rK39 immunochromatographic tests, a direct agglutination test (DAT), and an indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) in the site of a new epidemic of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in northwestern Ethiopia. The study population was composed of 179 patients with suspected VL and 67 controls. The sensitivities of Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT in 35 polymerase chain reaction-confirmed VL cases were 94.3%, 91.4%, 91.4%, and 100%, respectively, and the specificities were 98.5%, 94%, 98.5%, and 98.5%, respectively. In a Bayesian latent class analysis of all 246 specimens, the estimated sensitivities were 90.5%, 89%, 88.8%, and 96% for Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT, respectively; DAT showed the highest estimated specificity (97.4%). Both rK39 immunochromatographic tests perform as well as DAT, and are suitable for VL diagnosis in first-level health centers in this area of Ethiopia.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): comparison with standard ELISA and complement fixation assays for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis.The dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA), standard ELISA and the complement fixation (CF) tests were compared in the serodiagnosis of African visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar). Assay sensitivity was determined using sera from 44 patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar. Using the Dot-ELISA, 42 of 44 patients (95%) were positive at a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 32 (titer range 512-524 288). In the standard ELISA technique, 43 of 44 patients (98%) were positive (titer range 32-32 768). At a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 8 in the CF test, 35 patients (80%) were positive, 1 (2%) was negative and 8 patients (18%) showed anticomplementary (AC) activity (titer range 8-2048). Specificity, determined using 33 sera from healthy individuals not living in endemic areas, was 97% in both the Dot-ELISA and the standard ELISA (32 of 33 sera); in he CF test, all sera were negative except 1 (3%) which showed AC activity. Sera from patients with Chagas' disease cross-reacted in the dot-ELISA up to a titer of 512. In the standard ELISA, cross-reactions occurred mainly using sera from patients with Chagas' disease, malaria and syphilis, and to a lesser extent with sera from amebiasis, schistosomiasis and trichinosis patients. Overall titer agreement in replicate experiments was highest in the Dot-ELISA (89%), followed by the standard ELISA (80%) and the CF test (72%).Use of the recombinant K39 dipstick test and the direct agglutination test in a setting endemic for visceral leishmaniasis in Nepal.We evaluated the field use of two serologic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), the direct agglutination test (DAT) and rK39 dipstick test, in the context of a case-control study. Most VL cases in Nepal are currently diagnosed on clinical grounds and with relatively non-specific tests such as the formol-gel test. Among 14 newly diagnosed VL patients with bone-marrow slides confirmed positive in two independent laboratories, the sensitivity of both tests was 100%. Among 113 controls with no personal or household history of VL, the specificity of the rK39 was 100% while that of the DAT was 93%. The rK39 was less expensive than DAT, and has the advantages of ease of use and obtaining results within minutes. The wider use of the rK39 dipstick test could improve the specificity of VL diagnosis in Nepal.Assessment of the direct agglutination test, fast agglutination screening test, and rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Syria.To evaluate the performances of 3 serological assays (direct agglutination test [DAT], fast agglutination screening test [FAST], recombinant protein [rK39] dipstick) test for use in primary care, for the diagnosis visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Syria.We utilized 267 serum samples obtained during 2007 from patient groups confirmed and suspected VL, confirmed cutaneous leishmaniasis, toxoplasmosis from endemic areas in Syria and control samples, and applied the 3 serological tests in the Damascus University, Damascus and Health laboratories at the same time, on these samples.Our data show that the tests were very sensitive, where the DAT was the most specific followed by FAST, then rK39 dipstick.Our study confirmed that all the tests performed well, and proved to be very important sero-diagnosis tools for visceral leishmaniasis.False-positive results of a rapid K39-based strip test and Chagas disease.The definitive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires invasive procedures with demonstration of amastigotes in tissue or promastigotes in culture. Unfortunately, these approaches require laboratory materials not available in poor countries where the disease is endemic. The correct diagnosis of VL is important, and made more difficult by the fact that several common tropical diseases such as malaria, disseminated tuberculosis, and enteric fever share the same clinical presentation. Serological tests have been developed to replace parasitological diagnosis in the field. A commercially available K39-based strip test for VL has been developed for this purpose. The endemic area of leishmaniasis in Brazil overlaps the endemic area of Chagas disease, a disease that can cause false-positive serological test results. The aim of this study was to evaluate the incidence of false-positive exams using a rapid test for VL in patients with Chagas disease.A rapid test based on the recombinant K39 antigen of Leishmania was used in: (1) 30 patients with confirmed Chagas disease, (2) 30 patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease by ELISA, indirect immunofluorescence, indirect hemagglutination, and chemiluminescence, (3) 30 healthy patients from a non-endemic area as the control group, (4) 30 patients with confirmed VL, and (5) 20 patients with proved cutaneous leishmaniasis.The sensitivity and specificity of the rapid strip test were 100% when compared with healthy volunteers and those with confirmed Chagas disease. One false-positive result occurred in the group with Chagas disease diagnosed by serological tests (specificity of 96%).The rapid test based on recombinant K39 is a useful diagnostic assay, and a false-positive result rarely occurs in patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of kala-azar & post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis at a tertiary care centre of north India.Definitive diagnosis of kala-azar requires demonstration of parasites by diagnostic protocols based on invasive organ aspirations. We evaluated in the present study the diagnostic utility of an immunochromatographic test (ICT) for detection of anti- rK-39 antibodies for the non-invasive diagnosis of kala-azar and post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL) at a tertiary care centre of north India.The study was conducted in the Department of Microbiology, All India Institute of Medical Sciences, New Delhi, from July 2003 to October 2004. Of the 120 samples tested, 57 were found to be positive by ICT; of which, 51 were diagnosed as kala-azar and 6 as PKDL. The controls included individuals from endemic (50) and non endemic (19) areas with malignancies, haemolytic disorders, chronic liver diseases, hypersplenism, portal hypertension, metabolic disorders and sarcoidosis. In addition, 47 sera from confirmed cases of tuberculosis, malaria, typhoid, filariasis, leptospirosis, histoplasmosis, toxoplasmosis, invasive aspergillosis, amoebic liver abscess, AIDS, leprosy, cryptococcosis, strongyloidiasis, cyclosporosis, patients having collagen vascular diseases and hypergammaglobulinaemia were also tested to check the specificity of the test.Of the 51 cases with kala-azar 43 were males, children accounted for 25 per cent of these cases. All had fever of duration ranging from <1 month to 1.5 yr (median 4.5 months). All PKDL patients (n=6, 4 males) gave a history of having suffered from kala-azar in the past, and their slit skin test smears were microscopically positive for Leishman-Donovan (LD) bodies. The strip test was positive in all the cases of kala-azar and PKDL (estimated sensitivity 100%), all control sera were negative by the ICT (specificity 100%).The rK-39 ICT is a highly sensitive and specific test, and may be suitable for a rapid, cost-effective and reliable field diagnosis of kala-azar and PKDL.Imported visceral leishmaniasis: diagnostic dilemmas and comparative analysis of three assays.The present study evaluates the performances of three noninvasive serological assays for the detection of immunoglobulin G antibodies to leishmania antigen for the diagnosis of imported cases of kala azar (visceral leishmaniasis [VL]) in a country, Kuwait, where the disease is not endemic. A total of 323 individuals including 21 patients with documented cases of VL, 72 individuals with suspected cases of VL, 155 patients with other parasitic infections, and 75 healthy control individuals were tested by indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA; Behring Diagnostics GmbH, Marburg, Germany), indirect fluorescent-antibody assay (IFA; bioMerieux sa, Marcy l'Etoile, France), and a qualitative membrane-based immunoassay with recombinant leishmania antigen K39 (strip-test; Intersep Ltd, Berkshire, United Kingdom). Our data show that IHA is the most sensitive test (100%), followed by IFA (86.6%) and the strip-test (80.0%). The strip-test was the most specific (100%) of the three assays, followed by IFA (93.0%) and IHA (86.0%). However, the strip-test failed to detect at least three confirmed cases of VL. We conclude that IHA is preferred over IFA and the strip-test for the screening of individuals with suspected cases of VL, especially in a country where VL is not endemic and where the number of cases is regular but limited. The details about some of the patients with VL are presented to highlight the diversity of clinical presentations and problems encountered in the diagnosis of VL in a country where VL is not endemic.A rapid and simple diagnostic test for active visceral leishmaniasis.We have developed an immunodot assay for the serodiagnosis of active visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) which utilizes protein A colloidal gold as the visualizing agent. The test is simple, requires few reagents, and can be completed in two hours. It is sensitive and specific for active visceral leishmaniasis, and generally correlates with the ELISA. Either whole blood or sera in minute quantities may be used as test antibody. In addition, the use of the protein A gold immunodot is shown to detect anti-leishmania antibodies in infected dogs.Rapid detection of human Leishmania infantum infection: a comparative field study using the fast agglutination screening test and the direct agglutination test.This study aimed to evaluate the performance of a fast agglutination screening test (FAST) for serodiagnosis of human Leishmania infantum infection in Iran. FAST is based on the direct agglutination test (DAT) but combines with a higher parasite concentration and is performed with only one serum dilution. The validity of FAST for the detection of L. infantum infection in the field was compared with the direct agglutination test on 110 confirmed or patients suspected of infection with leishmaniasis, 177 healthy individuals and 41 patients with other infectious diseases who were from northwestern and southern parts of Iran. In this study, we found a 1:1600 cut-off point empirically by seeking the best correlation (90.8) between sera confirmed with visceral leishmaniasis and healthy control sera. A sensitivity of 95.4% (95% CI, 91.4-99.4) and specificity of 88.5% (95% CI, 84.2-92.8) were found with 1:1600 as a cut-off titer when DAT-confirmed cases were compared with the control groups. A good degree of agreement was found between FAST and DAT (90.8%) by Kappa analysis. FAST requires 2 h for reading the results versus the 12-18 h needed for DAT. As FAST is simple, rapid, sensitive and non-invasive and does not require a higher volume of antigens or much expertise, it can be used for screening and serodiagnosis of human L. infantum infection.Field use of the Dot-ELISA test for visceral leishmaniasis in Honduras.Detection of circulating antigens in sera from visceral leishmaniasis patients using dot-ELISA.The anti-amastigote IgG antibodies were raised in rabbits purified and fractionated using the standard methods. From the same anti-amastigote IgG antibodies, a peroxidase conjugate reagent was prepared. Initially, the anti-amastigote IgG antibodies and their corresponding peroxidase conjugate reagents were analyzed with respect to their ability to recognise the homologous antigens. Thirty five serum samples from visceral leishmaniasis patients (VLP) were examined using dot-ELISA. In addition, thirty seven serum samples from either non-infected individuals or from patients infected with heterologous organisms were used to define the sensitivity and specificity of the test. Circulating antigens in 35 serum samples from VLP were successfully identified using dot-ELISA giving 100% sensitivity. With exception of serum samples from patients with Plasmodium vivax which shown cross-reactivity with Leishmania donovani antigens, the test appeared to be specific for the detection of circulating leishmanial antigens. Cross-reactivity was not observed with P. faciparum or Brucellosis.Immunochromatographic rK39 strip test in the serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Tunisia.The performance of the rK39 strip test in the diagnosis of Tunisian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) was evaluated and compared with that of immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT). A total of 929 sera, including 574 from VL patients, 54 from cutaneous leishmaniasis (CL) patients, 42 from patients with other protozoan diseases, 152 from patients with non-parasitic diseases and 107 from healthy controls, were used in the study. The sensitivity and specificity of the rK39 strip test were 87.1 and 94.4%, respectively. Sixteen CL sera showed positive results, suggesting that the rK39 strip test is not restricted to Leishmania donovani complex detection. IFAT was comparatively more sensitive (98.9%) but slightly less specific (90.7%). Despite cross-reactivity shown by CL sera, the rK39 strip test can be recommended for the routine diagnosis of VL in Tunisia, as VL and CL are distinct clinical entities.Qualitative and semi-quantitative comparison of an rK39 strip test and direct agglutination test for detection of anti-Leishmania donovani antibodies in the Sudan.Until now, the comparison of the rK39 strip test (RKT) and direct agglutination test (DAT) for detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is exclusively based on either positive or negative qualification of the reaction outcome.In this study, we compared the diagnostic performance of RKT and DAT for VL both qualitatively and semi-quantitatively.For comparison based on semi-quantitative grounds, the execution of RKT and DAT was according to the standard procedures. For comparison on semi-qualitative grounds with DAT, the RKT was applied to aliquots from positive samples that were two-fold serially diluted in saline to determine, as for the DAT, the end-point reaction in RKT.While qualitatively both RKT and DAT demonstrated comparable reliability for VL detection (sensitivity = 96% and specificity = 98.7% or 99.3%), no significant correlation (r = 0.13) could be established between intensities of their positive reactions in 25 cases studied. A negative correlation was further determined in those 25 VL cases between the positive intensities of the RKT and antibody levels measured semi-quantitatively with the same procedure (r = -0.36) or the DAT (r = -0.30). Irrespective of the low, moderate or high antibody levels measured with RKT (< or = 1:8 and 1:16-1:32 > or = 1:256) or DAT (< or = 1:25,600 and 1:51,200- 1:409,600 > or = 1:3,276,800) in patients with confirmed or unconfirmed VL infection, exclusively strong positive intensities were obtained with RKT.For further optimizing diagnosis and simultaneously assessing magnitude of immune response to L. donovani infection in Sudanese patients, the combined application of RKT and DAT is recommended.Serological diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: direct agglutination test versus rK39 strip test.We evaluated the direct agglutination test (DAT), using freeze-dried (FD) and aqueous (AQ) antigen, and the rK39 immunochromatographic strip test in the diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Sera from 508 subjects (150 parasitologically confirmed patients with VL, 100 and 153 healthy controls drawn from non-endemic and endemic regions, respectively, and 105 patients with other diseases presenting with fever and/or splenomegaly) were tested. The sensitivity of the tests were as follows: DAT (FD), 96% (95% CI 91-98); DAT (AQ), 97% (95% CI 93-99); rK39 strip test, 99% (95% CI 95-100). The specificity of DAT (FD), DAT (AQ) and rK39 strip tests were 85% (95% CI 81-88), 87% (95% CI 83-91) and 89% (95% CI 86-92), respectively. A significant correlation (high degree of agreement) was observed between all tests (kappa>0.80). We conclude that the sensitivity of FD antigen is comparable to that of AQ antigen. Similarly, the rK39 strip test is as sensitive as the DAT, but the strip test's greater convenience of use makes it a better tool for diagnosis of VL in peripheral areas of endemic regions.Urine antigen detection by latex agglutination test for diagnosis and assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis.This prospective study evaluated the usefulness of the kala-azar latex agglutination test (KAtex) for the diagnosis and laboratory assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) (or kala-azar) patients following 30 days of sodium antimony gluconate treatment at Rajshahi Medical College Hospital (Bangladesh). KAtex detects a low molecular weight, heat-stable, carbohydrate antigen in the urine of VL patients. KAtex was performed using freshly voided urine samples obtained from 36 parasitologically confirmed cases of VL before and after treatment as well as from 40 healthy controls (20 each from kala-azar-endemic and non-endemic zones). KAtex was found to be positive in 27 (75%) of the 36 patients at diagnosis and was negative in all the controls. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of KAtex were 75% (95% CI 57-87%) and 100% (95% CI 89-100%), respectively. Following treatment, all 36 VL cases were negative for Leishman-Donovan bodies by splenic smear microscopy and 34 (94.4%) were negative by KAtex. This limited study suggests that KAtex is a satisfactorily sensitive, highly specific, rapid and completely non-invasive urine-based antigen detection test for the diagnosis of VL. Currently, this is the only non-invasive laboratory tool useful for the assessment of initial cure in VL patients.A community-based, comparative evaluation of direct agglutination and rK39 strip tests in the early detection of subclinical Leishmania donovani infection.In the Indian state of Bihar, the sensitivities and specificities of direct agglutination tests (DAT) and rK39 test strips for the detection of Leishmania donovani infection in humans were explored and found to be generally good (92%-100%). When 172 asymptomatic individuals [16 'case-contacts' who lived in the same households as past or current, confirmed cases of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) and 156 other subjects from neighbouring households] were tested, the same 36 (21%) individuals, including all 16 'case-contacts', were found seropositive using each type of test. When followed-up after 3 months, 18 of the individuals who had been found seropositive in the baseline survey remained seropositive, and eight (44%) of these had developed symptomatic VL, with amastigotes in their splenic aspirates. Seven (44%) of the 16 'case-contacts' but only one (5%) of the other 20 subjects found seropositive at baseline went on to develop VL within 3 months. Although the strip test appeared slightly better than DAT for predicting the development of VL in the 172 subjects, either type of test may be very useful for the early detection of asymptomatic L. donovani infection and thus the identification of those at relatively high risk of developing VL.Recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of human leishmaniasis.A new recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test (ICT) was compared with the immunofluorescent antibody assay (IFA) for the rapid serological diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Apulia, Southern Italy. A total of 264 individuals were tested, including 19 patients with VL (three of which were HIV positive), 67 individuals with suspected VL, 40 healthy controls and 138 patients with other diseases. The ICT was positive in all 19 patients with VL and negative in sera from the remaining individuals. Both the sensitivity and specificity of ICT was 100%. The ICT also worked well in HIV-Leishmania co-infected patients. Antibodies to Leishmania detected by the IFA and ICT remained at detectable levels for up to 12-24 months. A positive reaction by the ICT was detectable at a serum dilution of up to 1:20,480, indicating that a strong immunoresponse is mounted against the recombinant K39 antigen. In conclusion, the ICT is highly sensitive, specific, rapid, noninvasive and cost effective (euro8.43 for ICT and euro12 for IFA) in the diagnosis of VL in areas of low VL endemicity.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): a micro technique for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A micro enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay utilizing antigen dotted onto nitrocellulose filter discs (Dot-ELISA) was developed for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Leishmania donovani promastigotes applied to filter discs in volumes of 1 microliter were placed in 96-well microtiter plates, blocked with bovine serum albumin, then incubated with 4-fold dilutions of patient sera. After incubation with peroxidase-conjugated anti-human antibody, washing and addition of precipitable substrate, positive reactions appeared as blue dots on a white background which were easily read by eye. The procedure is performed at room temperature, takes about 2 h and is economical. At a reciprocal diagnostic titer of greater than or equal to 32, 41 of 42 (98%) leishmaniasis patients were positive, and positive titers ranged from 512 to 524,288. Control sera from healthy individuals showed 1 of 50 (2%) false positive reactions. Sera from patients with African trypanosomiasis, Chagas' disease, and lupus erythematosus were cross-reactive in the Dot-ELISA. No cross-reactivity was noted with sera from patients with amebiasis, coccidioidomycosis, cutaneous leishmaniasis, viral hepatitis, hydatidosis, malaria, schistosomiasis, syphilis, toxoplasmosis or trichinosis. In replicate experiments, 90% of 167 sera tested did not vary in titer. This rapid and inexpensive test should prove to be an important field diagnostic technique for visceral leishmaniasis.Immunochromatographic (rK39) strip test in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bangladesh.Immunochromatographic strip test (ICT strip test) for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis was evaluated in this study in the context of a case-control study. A total sixty consecutive cases of kala-azar admitted in all four Medicine Units of Mymensingh Medical College Hospital during the period of May 2002 to February 2003 was included here. Parasitological confirmation was done by demonstration of leishmania donovani bodies in bone marrow or splenic aspiration in all cases. A total 120 controls was taken of which sixty were asymptomatic endemic controls with no previous history of kala-azar and sixty were admitted patients suffering from diseases other than kala-azar (malaria, tuberculosis, enteric fever and chronic liver disease). ICT strip test for kala-azar was done in all cases and controls. Only 2 of the confirmed kala-azar cases were negative and the remaining 58 cases were positive for ICT strip test which gives the sensitivity of this test 96.6%. Among the controls, 118 were negative for ICT strip test and two of the asymptomatic controls were positive for this test with no clinical evidence of kala-azar. So, the estimated specificity of ICT strip test is 98.3%. The predictive value for a negative result was 98.3% and for a positive result was 96.6%. The ICT strip test is easy, quick, requires no technical facilities with higher sensitivity and specificity entails it to be the ideal test for the diagnosis of kala-azar in field level.Evaluation of direct agglutination test, rk39 Test, and ELISA for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The study reports an evaluation of the direct agglutination test (DAT) with use of promastigote/amastigote antigen, rk39 strip test, and ELISA for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Out of 94 clinically suspected VL patients, 16 (17%) were seropositive by all the techniques; in addition, 6 were positive in rk39 strip test and ELISA. On retrospective analysis, out of 16 positive by all the techniques, 11 (69%) had demonstrable Leishmania donovani (LD) bodies in their bone marrow samples, while in 5 bone marrow was not examined. Out of 6 that were positive by ELISA and rk39 strip test, 2 had myelofibrosis and 4 had chronic myeloid leukemia. On the basis of bone marrow aspirate positivity, the sensitivity and specificity of DAT were 100% while those of rk39 strip test and ELISA were 100% and 87%, respectively. The study suggests that DAT appears to be the best technique for the serodiagnosis of VL.[Non invasive diagnostic tools for visceral leishmaniasis: a comparison of the immunoserological tests DAT, rK26 and rK39].Human visceral leishmaniasis is a serious public health problem in endemic countries because of its high potential lethality, particularly in children. Rapid diagnosis is essential to early treatment and control of visceral leishmaniasis.The aim was to compare three serodiagnostic tools for human visceral leishmaniasis.Three methods were compared: the rK39 dipstick (Kalazar detection test, Inbios International Inc.), ELISA rK26 and direct agglutination test (DAT) (KIT Biomedical Research). Fifty serum samples from patients positive for rK39 ELISA were compared from four endemic provinces in Venezuela: Nueva Esparta (Margarita island), Lara, Anzoátegui and Trujillo. Additional serum samples from 17 healthy volunteers and 25 patients with other diseases were included. The rK39 ELISA served as the baseline standard method. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and likelihood ratio were calculated for each test.All methods had a positive correlation with rK39 ELISA (p<0.0001). They showed high sensitivity and specificity. The direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick showed high sensitivity values, 89.7% (95% CI: 81.34.0-98.2%) and 94.2% (95% CI: 87.7-100%), respectively, and high specificity, 81.0% (95% CI: 80.0-99.5%) and 100%. The rK26 ELISA showed good specificity, 99% (95% CI: 95.2-100%), but a very low sensitivity, 37% (95% CI: 23.4-50.2%).Overall results indicated that DAT and rK39 dipstick have the highest specificity and sensitivity. Both are simple, cost-effective and field applicable tests. Therefore, they are recommended for early and accurate diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Design, development and evaluation of rK28-based point-of-care tests for improving rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is diagnosed by microscopic confirmation of the parasite in bone marrow, spleen or lymph node aspirates. These procedures are unsuitable for rapid diagnosis of VL in field settings. The development of rK39-based rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) revolutionized diagnosis of VL by offering high sensitivity and specificity in detecting disease in the Indian subcontinent; however, these tests have been less reliable in the African subcontinent (sensitivity range of 75-85%, specificity of 70-92%). We have addressed limitations of the rK39 with a new synthetic polyprotein, rK28, followed by development and evaluation of two new rK28-based RDT prototype platforms.Evaluation of 62 VL-confirmed sera from Sudan provided sensitivities of 96.8% and 93.6% (95% CI = K28: 88.83-99.61%; K39: 84.30-98.21%) and specificities of 96.2% and 92.4% (95% CI = K28: 90.53-98.95%; K39: 85.54-96.65%) for rK28 and rK39, respectively. Of greater interest was the observation that individual VL sera with low rK39 reactivity often had much higher rK28 reactivity. This characteristic of the fusion protein was exploited in the development of rK28 rapid tests, which may prove to be crucial in detecting VL among patients with low rK39 antibody levels. Evaluation of two prototype lateral flow-based rK28 rapid tests on 53 VL patients in Sudan and 73 VL patients in Bangladesh provided promisingly high sensitivities (95.9% [95% CI = 88.46-99.1 in Sudan and 98.1% [95% CI = 89.93-99.95%] in Bangladesh) compared to the rK39 RDT (sensitivities of 86.3% [95% CI = 76.25-93.23%] in Sudan and 88.7% [95% CI = 76.97-95.73%] in Bangladesh).Our study compares the diagnostic accuracy of rK39 and rK28 in detecting active VL cases and our findings indicate that rK28 polyprotein has great potential as a serodiagnostic tool. A new rK28-based RDT will prove to be a valuable asset in simplifying VL disease confirmation at the point-of-care.Sero-epidemiological study of kala-azar in a village of Varanasi district, India.To evaluate five kala-azar serological tests for field use.Serological survey in Pandit Ka Purva village in Varanasi district, India, using Sia water test, aldehyde test, direct agglutination test (DAT), micro-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and dot-ELISA.The total population of the village was 518, 67 of whom showed typical clinical and parasitological features of kala-azar, including seven who died. The age distribution of kala-azar cases showed significant differences, being highest among the 45-54-year age group. The disease was more prevalent among males. Serum samples were collected from 498 persons (96% of total population) including 67 kala-azar cases and 40 disease controls (malaria, TB, leprosy, typhoid). Ten 10 serum samples from healthy controls living in endemic area were also collected. The test sensitivities were: Sia water test, 85.0%; aldehyde test, 62.7%; DAT, 94.0%; micro-ELISA, 91.0% and dot-ELISA, 97.0%. The test specificities were: Sia water test 92.5%, aldehyde test, 93.2%, DAT, 96.7; micro-ELISA, 97.6% and dot-ELISA, 98.4%.The dot-ELISA is highly sensitive and specific, cheap, and easy to interpret with the naked eye, making it a powerful screening test for the surveillance and diagnosis of Indian kala-azar at field level.[Evaluation of a rapid test using recombinant k39 antigen in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil ].Diagnostic value of rK39 dipstick in zoonotic visceral leishmaniasis in Turkey.K39 is a repetitive immunodominant epitope in a kinesin-related protein expressed predominantly in the amastigotes of visceral Leishmania spp. Enzyme immunoassays of patient's sera with recombinant K39 (rK39) proved to be highly specific and sensitive for diagnosis of active visceral leishmaniasis (VL, kala-azar). The same assays in dipstick format were also found effective for diagnosis of both human VL (HVL) and canine VL (CanVL) in most endemic areas of these diseases. Fifty-eight human patients and 22 dogs, clinically suspected of kala-azar, were screened with rK39 dipstick in comparison with the conventional methods of diagnosis, i.e., microscopic examinations of bone marrow and lymph node aspirates and immunofluorescent antibody tests (IFAT), respectively. Sixteen patients and 12 dogs were found to be rK39 dipstick positive. The results were corroborated with those of parasitological examinations, except 1, rK39-positive but smear-negative, case in each group. IFAT of the 2 discordant cases gave positive results. The rK39 dipstick is thus reliable for diagnosis of both HVL and canVL cases in Turkey.Immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in Indian visceral leishmaniasis.Stored sera from 429 Indian subjects were assayed to extend the analysis of the accuracy of immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in the non-invasive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). All 225 samples from patients with proven Leishmania infection tested positive [estimated sensitivity = 100%; 95% confidence interval (CI)=98%-100%]. Sera from 99 of the 100 symptomatic patients with other diseases were non-reactive (estimated specificity = 99%; CI = 94%-100%). However, samples from 13 of the 104 apparently healthy controls showed positive strip-test results (estimated specificity = 88%; CI = 79%-93%), yielding an overall specificity of 93% (190/204; CI = 88%-96%). If applied in a practical clinical setting (on symptomatic patients in whom active VL is suspected and other common infections have been excluded), strip testing of serum for anti-K39 antibody should be both sensitive and specific for diagnosing VL in India.Antigen detection from urine of Kala-azar cases by latex agglutination test.A recently developed Latex agglutination method known as "KATEX" for detecting leishmanial antigen in urine of Kala-azar patients was evaluated on 97 Kala-azar cases and 35 controls in the department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College during the period from March' 2004 to February' 2005. The method yielded sensitivity as 100% and 82.8% in 33 confirmed and 64 ICT positive cases respectively. Since 8.6% controls showed antigen positive results, so specificity of KATEX was calculated as 91.4%. KATEX methods for antigen detection in urine should be used as an early immuno-diagnostic test as it has yielded high sensitivity. But interpretation of a positive test must be made cautiously having correlation with clinical findings as because it becomes false positive in Kala-azar free person. Further elucidation of KATEX method including larger population from community giving particular emphasis on its prognostic use was strongly recommended.Performance of a rapid diagnostic test for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis in a large urban setting.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may improve the early detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), but their real-world performance requires additional study. Therefore, we evaluated the performance of an rK39-based RDT (Kalazar Detect™) for the detection of VL in an endemic, large urban area.Data were collected from a registry of rK39 RDT performed at 11 emergency care units in Belo Horizonte, Brazil, and from a national database of reportable communicable diseases of the Sistema de Informação de Agravos de Notificação (SINAN).The rapid rK39 test was performed in 476 patients, with 114 (23.9%) positive results. The analysis of rK39 RDT performance was based on 381 (80%) cases reported to the SINAN database, of which 145 (38.1%) were confirmed cases. Estimates for sensitivity and specificity were 72.4% (95% CI: 64.6-79%) and 99.6% (95%CI: 97.6-99.9%), respectively. Positive and negative predictive values were estimated at 99.1% (95%CI: 94.9-99.8%) and 85.5% (95%CI: 80.8-89.1%), respectively. In addition, close agreement between the rK39 RDT and indirect immunofluorescence was observed.In summary, the rK39 RDT showed a high specificity but only moderate sensitivity. In endemic areas for VL, treatment may be considered in cases with clinical manifestations and a positive rK39 RDT, but those with a negative test should be subjected to further investigation.Rapid & reliable diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis.Comparison of microscopic examination, rK39, and PCR for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis in Turkey.The laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis is based on microscopic examination, culture, serological tests, and molecular methods. In this study, we examined 50 blood specimens from suspected visceral leishmaniasis patients by microscopic examination, recombinant antigen dipstick test (rK39), and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in the University of Cukurova, Faculty of Medicine, Parasitology Department in Turkey. We calculated the sensitivity-specificity and positive-negative predictive values for these diagnostic tests. We found that positive predictive value of microscopy examination, rK39 dipstick test, and PCR were 20%, 24%, and 58% for visceral leishmaniasis, respectively. When we compared polymerase chain reaction, recombinant antigen dipstick test, and microscopic examination for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis, the polymerase chain reaction is more sensitive (100%) than recombinant antigen dipstick test and microscopy examination.A comparative study of the effectiveness of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis.We compared the validity of pancytopenia, the formol-gel test (FGT), the indirect fluorescence antibody test (IFAT), the direct agglutination test (DAT), and the rK39 dipstick test as diagnostic criteria for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Nepal. Between September 2000 and January 2002, 310 clinical suspects had a bone marrow aspirate, and if negative, a spleen aspirate smear examined for Leishmania donovani. Sensitivity and specificity of all tests were determined compared with parasitology and by latent class analysis (LCA). Compared with parasitology, the sensitivities of the other tests were as follows: pancytopenia = 16.3% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 11.3-22.5%), FGT = 39.9% (95% CI = 32.7-47.4%), IFAT = 28.4% (95% CI = 22.0-35.5%), DAT = 95.1% (95% CI = 90.8-97.7%), and the rK39 dipstick test = 87.4% (95% CI = 81.7-91.9%). Sensitivity estimates obtained by LCA were similar, but specificity estimates were substantially higher (DAT = 93.7% versus 77.8%; rK39 dipstick test = 93.1% versus 77.0%). The DAT or the rK39 dipstick test can replace parasitology as the basis of a decision to treat VL in Nepalese peripheral health services.Compararative evaluation of rK9, rK26 and rK39 antigens in the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis.This study was designed for comparative evaluation of two relatively newer recombinant hydrophilic antigens, rK9 and rK26 of Leishmania chagasi along with rK39 (a 39-aminoacid-repetitive immunodominant B-cell epitope of kinesin-related antigen from L. chagasi) and crude soluble antigen (CSA) for the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) patients by quantitative ELISA.In the present study a total of 80 subjects comprising of 55 confirmed VL cases and 25 endemic controls (EC) were subjected to ELISA using four different antigens, namely rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA (derived from Leishmania donovani promastigotes).Sensitivity was as follows: 78% (95%CI 63-100%) for rK9, 38% (95%CI 28-59%) for rK26, 100% for rK39, and 80% (95% CI 65-100%) for CSA. The specificity of rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA was found to be 84% (95%CI 61-100%), 80% (95%CI 56-100%), 96% (95%CI 75-100%) and 72% (95%CI 49-100%), respectively.rK39 was observed to be the most suitable antigen as compared to rK26 and rK9 whereas rK9 performed better than rK26. Hence rK9 antigen may either be used as an adjunct to rK39 for accurate diagnosis of VL or may be used in the absence or non-availability of rK39 antigen for the serodiagnosis.Prospective evaluation and comparison of the direct agglutination test and an rK39-antigen-based dipstick test for the diagnosis of suspected kala-azar in Nepal.The diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) remains difficult in rural endemic areas and practical and reliable tests are badly needed. Two serological tests, the Direct Agglutination Test (DAT) and an rK39-antigen-based dipstick test, were compared to parasitological diagnosis in a group of 184 patients presenting at a tertiary care centre in south-eastern Nepal with a history of fever > or = 14 days and splenomegaly; 139 patients had a parasitologically proven kala-azar and 45 patients had a negative parasitological work-up. The rK39 dipstick showed a sensitivity of 97% and a specificity of 71%. The DAT was up to 99% sensitive with a low cut-off titre (1:400) but its specificity did not exceed 82% even with a high cut-off titre (1:51 200). Both tests could be used for screening suspect patients in endemic areas. However, their use as confirmatory tests should be restricted to situations where the proportion of kala-azar among clinical suspect patients is high. The rK39 dipstick is cheaper and easier to use than the DAT and could be used widely provided that both its performance and production remain stable.Sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of immunochromatographic strip test in diagnosis of childhood kala-azar.In Bangladesh, the total population at risk for kala-azar exceeds 20 million (18%) living in 88 Thana (19%) of 27 districts (42%). A confirmatory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) is done by demonstration of the parasite (LD body) in organ aspirates or tissue biopsy sample, an invasive procedure with relatively low sensitivity. To assess the diagnostic usefulness of ICT for antibody against the leishmanial antigen rK39 & its feasibility for use under field conditions (rural areas). An experimental study conducted during January, 2003 to July, 2003 in pediatrics department of MMCH including 60 confirmedly diagnosed KA cases & 60 controls having diseases other than KA. One drop of peripheral blood is applied to the nitrocellulose strip & 3 drops of test buffer is added to the dried blood. Observing 2 visible bands indicates presence of IgG anti-K39. The rK39 strip test was positive in 57 out of 60 confirmed KA case diagnosed by LD body demonstration in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The estimated sensitivity was 95%. One control diagnosed as other than KA had positive strip test but negative aspirate smear. The estimated specificity of the strip test was 98.3%. The predictive value of a positive result is 98.3% & that of a negative result is 93.5%. rK39 strip test is highly sensitive & specific in our situation & it can be used as a simple & the best method for diagnosis of KA in rural areas.Evaluation of direct agglutination test, rk39 Test, and ELISA for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The study reports an evaluation of the direct agglutination test (DAT) with use of promastigote/amastigote antigen, rk39 strip test, and ELISA for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Out of 94 clinically suspected VL patients, 16 (17%) were seropositive by all the techniques; in addition, 6 were positive in rk39 strip test and ELISA. On retrospective analysis, out of 16 positive by all the techniques, 11 (69%) had demonstrable Leishmania donovani (LD) bodies in their bone marrow samples, while in 5 bone marrow was not examined. Out of 6 that were positive by ELISA and rk39 strip test, 2 had myelofibrosis and 4 had chronic myeloid leukemia. On the basis of bone marrow aspirate positivity, the sensitivity and specificity of DAT were 100% while those of rk39 strip test and ELISA were 100% and 87%, respectively. The study suggests that DAT appears to be the best technique for the serodiagnosis of VL.Validation of two rapid diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in Kenya.Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is a systemic parasitic disease that is fatal unless treated. In Kenya, national VL guidelines rely on microscopic examination of spleen aspirate to confirm diagnosis. As this procedure is invasive, it cannot be safely implemented in peripheral health structures, where non-invasive, accurate, easy to use diagnostic tests are needed.We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT), DiaMed IT LEISH and Signal-KA, among consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of VL in two treatment centres located in Baringo and North Pokot District, Rift Valley province, Kenya. Microscopic examination of spleen aspirate was the reference diagnostic standard. Patients were prospectively recruited between May 2010 and July 2011.Of 251 eligible patients, 219 patients were analyzed, including 131 VL and 88 non-VL patients. The median age of VL patients was 16 years with predominance of males (66%). None of the tested VL patients were co-infected with HIV. Sensitivity and specificity of the DiaMed IT LEISH were 89.3% (95%CI: 82.7-94%) and 89.8% (95%CI: 81.5-95.2%), respectively. The Signal KA showed trends towards lower sensitivity (77.1%; 95%CI: 68.9-84%) and higher specificity (95.5%; 95%CI: 88.7-98.7%). Combining the tests did not improve the overall diagnostic performance, as all patients with a positive Signal KA were also positive with the DiaMed IT LEISH.The DiaMed IT LEISH can be used to diagnose VL in Kenyan peripheral health facilities where microscopic examination of spleen aspirate or sophisticated serological techniques are not feasible. There is a crucial need for an improved RDT for VL diagnosis in East Africa.Sensitivity and specificity of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test has become available for the qualitative detection of total anti-Leishmania immunoglobulins using the recombinant K39 antigen. To evaluate the test, 96 serum specimens from patients with a variety of tropical infections were tested. Fourteen of the specimens derived from patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar, and all were strongly positive for antibodies to Leishmania donovani complex using the immunofluorescence test. Although all 82 samples negative by the immunofluorescence test were confirmed as negative by the dipstick assay, only 10 (71.4%) of the 14 positive samples were reactive. These results indicate that the test in its current form lacks sufficient sensitivity to be recommended as a screening tool, but it might be useful for indicating further diagnostic procedures in a clinical setting.Standardization of the dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA) for human visceral leishmaniasis.The Dot-ELISA, a rapid, visually read micro enzyme immunoassay for visceral leishmaniasis utilizing minute volumes of antigen "dotted" on nitrocellulose filter discs and precipitable chromogenic substrate, was analyzed under a variety of experimental parameters. Raising assay incubation temperatures from 23 degrees C to 28 degrees C resulted in titer increases in three of five leishmaniasis patient sera; at 37 degrees C, all five patient sera and one of five normal human sera showed titer increases. The amount of antigen used could be reduced 50% by incubating patient serum overnight at 4 degrees C. Antigen discs stored at - 20 degrees C were optimally reactive with leishmaniasis sera over a 270-day period. Antigen discs stored at 4 degrees C and 23 degrees C showed reproducible titer decreases at 90 days. Aging either peroxidase-conjugated antibody or substrate for up to 28 days at 4 degrees C did not adversely affect titers of positive and negative control sera and reagent controls. Activated substrate stored at 23 degrees C was optimally reactive in the assay for at least 24 hours. No changes in titers of positive and negative control sera or nonspecific reactions in reagent controls occurred when using different brands of microtiter plates. The long shelf lives and stabilities of Dot-ELISA antigen and reagents indicate this test should prove useful both in the laboratory and in the field.Value of a dipstick based on recombinant RK39 antigen for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis from other sympatric endemic diseases in Venezuela.A laboratory trial using recombinant rK39 dipsticks for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) from other sympatric endemic diseases which share similar clinic features (Chagas disease, malaria, schistosomiasis and toxoplasmosis) was conducted in Venezuela. The 100% specificity of the test previously obtained in other countries was confirmed. The use of this test at the primary health care level in Venezuela for a rapid diagnosis of active AVL cases, which may avoid deaths, is recommended.Potential non-invasive urine-based antigen (protein) detection assay to diagnose active visceral leishmaniasis.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bihar India: comparison of the rK39 rapid diagnostic test on whole blood versus serum.Antibody-detecting rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) against rK39 are available to aid in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Although these rK39 RDTs have been developed, validated and approved for use with serum, they are universally performed using whole blood. It was therefore necessary to determine whether this RDT is as sensitive on whole blood as on serum.In this study we compared the rK39 RDT on serum and blood samples from 624 individuals with symptoms of VL attending the outpatient clinic at the Rajendra Memorial Research Institute of Medical Sciences, Patna, India. A total of 251 cases (40%) were both serum and blood-positive and 26 cases (4%) were identified as blood-negative and serum-positive. These 26 individuals in general had low titer antibodies against rK39 as determined by ELISA and follow-up on most of these individuals revealed none had persistent VL symptoms. The Cohen kappa index comparing blood and serum was 0.88 indicating excellent concordance.Although the concordance was excellent, it is possible to miss rK39 positive individuals when using blood and the titer of anti-rK39 antibodies is low. We recommend that when an individual from an endemic area has obvious clinical symptoms of VL and the whole blood rK39 RDT is negative, that the test should be redone 2-3 weeks later if the symptoms persist.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The purpose of this study was to compare the performance of a rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test for the qualitative detection of circulating antibodies to the leishmanial recombinant antigen K39 with that of a classical immunofluorescent antibody test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Sera from 143 Italian subjects, including 69 patients with clinically suspected visceral leishmaniasis, 23 patients with hypergammaglobulinemia and 51 healthy controls, were tested. The immunochromatographic test was performed according to the manufacturer's instructions, using antigen-impregnated nitrocellulose paper strips. The immunofluorescent antibody test was performed according to an established method, using promastigotes of Leishmania infantum zymodeme Montpellier 1 as antigen. In 11 patients, diagnosis of active Leishmania infection was established by microscopic examination of biopsy samples and/or clinical response to meglumine antimoniate. Results of the two tests correlated for all but two sera examined. In two patients, one with proven infectious mononucleosis and one with bacterial pneumonia, the immunofluorescent antibody test was positive and the dipstick test was negative. In the restricted sample of patients in whom a definitive diagnosis was established, the immunochromatographic test was positive in 11 of 11 patients with confirmed Leishmania infection and negative in 103 of 103 subjects who either had other documented diseases or were healthy controls, showing 100% sensitivity and 100% specificity.Field evaluation of a fast anti-Leishmania antibody detection assay in Ethiopia.A fast agglutination screening test (FAST) for the detection of Leishmania antibodies in human serum samples was evaluated under harsh field conditions in northern Ethiopia. Test performance was compared with a standard serological test, namely the direct agglutination test (DAT), and with parasitology. In total, 103 suspected cases were recruited for the study. Based on parasitological examination, 49 patients were confirmed of having visceral leishmaniasis (VL) and the other 54 suspected cases were parasitologically negative. Field evaluation of FAST was possible in blood samples of 89 patients. FAST had 4 false negative results and 13 false positive results. DAT had 2 false negative results and 20 false positive results. A good degree of agreement (86.9%) was observed between FAST and DAT (kappa value 0.73). In this field-based evalauation, the sensitivity and specificity of FAST were found to be 91.1% (95% CI 77.9-97.1) and 70.5% (95% CI 54.6-82.8), respectively, compared with 95.3% (95% CI 82.9-99.2) and 62.3% (95% CI 47.9-74.9) for DAT. FAST had a high predictive value of a negative test, demonstrating that FAST could be utilised to exclude rapidly non-VL patients from a large population of suspects with fever and splenomegaly in endemic areas.Noninvasive management of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: clinical application of diagnosis by K39 antigen strip testing at a kala-azar referral unit.Firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) requires organ aspiration and microscopic examination of tissue specimens. To determine the usefulness of noninvasive diagnosis by strip test detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin (Ig) G antibody in blood specimens obtained by fingerstick, 143 Indian patients with suspected kala-azar (fever, splenomegaly, anemia) were studied. Of 120 strip test-positive subjects (subjects with presumed kala-azar [group A]), amphotericin B treatment induced clinical cure in 119. Of 23 strip test-negative subjects (subjects presumed to have other diseases [group B]), 16 had other disorders diagnosed at entry, 4 responded to empiric antimalarial therapy, 2 were proven to have kala-azar, and 1 died elsewhere after undergoing splenic aspiration. Six months after treatment ended, all 120 patients in group A and the 18 assessable patients in group B were healthy. In a region in India where visceral infection is prevalent, strip test detection of anti-K39 IgG is a clinically promising diagnostic guide in persons with suspected kala-azar.Detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis by a latex agglutination test.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually done by demonstration of parasites in tissue smears. However, obtaining these smears may be risky, painful, and difficult. Antibody-based diagnostics are limited by their inability to predict active disease. In this study, a new latex agglutination test (KAtex), which detects parasite antigen in freshly voided and boiled urine, was evaluated in patients with VL before the start (n = 382) and at the end of treatment (n = 273); 185 healthy controls from leishmaniasis-endemic region were also studied. The KAtex result was positive in 87% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 83.3-90.3). However, at the end of treatment only 3% (95% CI = 1.6-6.2) patients were positive. The specificity of the test was 99% and 2 of 185 healthy controls tested positive. Positive and negative predictive values were 0.994 and 0.788, respectively. KAtex is a promising test, and in a simplified and improved format it could be applied meaningfully in the diagnosis of VL.The latex agglutination test: standardization and comparison with direct agglutination and dot-ELISA in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in India.Laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually based on the detection of Leishmania amastigotes in samples of bone marrow or splenic aspirate obtained by invasive procedures. Serological tests serve as a useful adjunct and are especially valuable in early or highly immune cases where amastigotes may be too scanty to be seen easily. The direct agglutination test (DAT) is generally considered the most suitable of the four types of tests currently employed (IFAT, counter immuno-electrophoresis, ELISA and DAT). However, the latex agglutination test (LAT) was recently reported to be a rapid and sensitive screening tool for VL and one which could be carried out at the patient's bedside. Further standardization and evaluation of LAT has now revealed that although it is comparable with DAT and dot-ELISA in terms of sensitivity it is far inferior because of cross-reactivity with other infections. This lack of specificity makes LAT unsuitable for routine diagnosis of VL even though it is rapid and sensitive. DAT still appears to be the best choice as a diagnostic tool, as it is very specific and does not require expensive equipment or reagents or much technical competence and the result can be visually interpreted. These merits make DAT very suitable for the diagnosis of VL in endemic areas of India.[Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum. Update on the utility of the IT-Leish and ID-Pagia leishmaniasis tests].The purpose of this article is to update information about Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum in man and about the canine reservoir. Special emphasis is placed on laboratory diagnosis tests for Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis (MVL) in humans. In addition two rapid diagnostic tests for human leishmaniasis are compared based on indirect immunofluorescence and Western blot. Findings show that the overall sensitivity of the two tests in immunocompetent and immunodepressed patients ranged from 54% to 97%, a specificity of 97%, with positive predictive value ranging from 75% to 97% and a negative predictive value of around 95%. For diagnosis of cutaneous leishmaniasis, positivity of these tests in one case out of 2 underscores the predictive value of a positive test.Rapid screening with a recombinant antigen (rK39) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis using dipstick.To evaluate the diagnostic value of the recombinant antigen of 39 amino acid repeats encoded by a kinesin-like gene of Leishmania changasi (rK39) in serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL).In Kashi, Xinjiang, 13 VL patients with splenomegaly and bone marrow aspirate culture positive were subjected to dipstick assay. A drop of whole blood or serum from patient was placed at the absorbing pad at the bottom of the dipstick. Flooding of the bottom protein with buffer allows serum proteins to migrate upwards, producing the positive band and Western blot analysis of rK39 subsequently performed with the sera collected.The end-point titers of anti-rK39 antibodies of these sera were determined by ELISA and found to fall within the range of 10(-2) to 10(-4), which were consistent with the intensity of their reaction with rK39 in dipstick assay. The positive sera could also recognize the specific rK39 band as analyzed by Western blot analysis.The rK39 dipstick assay is more rapid, specific, sensitive and less invasive than the conventional methods of diagnosis for VL in the areas of low endemicity.Testing urine samples with rK39 strip as the simplest non-invasive field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis: an early report from eastern India.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is a major obstacle in the control of this disease. The rK39 strip-test using patient's blood is a breakthrough; however, it still requires a blood sample, which is a concern for safety in the field. We tried to simplify the test using the patient's urine instead of blood.To observe the sensitivity and specificity of the urine test in comparison with the blood test.We tested active and post-treatment VL patients, Post Kala azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL), VL/HIV and control subjects (healthy, disease suspects and diseased other than VL) with the rK39 strip-test using blood and urine samples.The level of agreement between the urine and blood testing was calculated by inter-rater agreement (kappa) statistics.Forty-two active VL, 40 treated VL, six PKDL, three VL/HIV and 139 controls (54 healthy, 21 disease suspects and 64 diseased other than VL) were tested. All VL-related cases showed positive results with urine as well as blood samples (100%). The urine testing was found to have 100% sensitivity and 86.33% specificity for the diagnosis of VL. Kappa statistic between the two methods was 0.916 (P<0.001). Urine testing had more false-positive results in comparison with blood testing (13.67% vs. 9.45%), but the test subjects were from VL-endemic areas and they might be exposed to Leishmania donovani infection.The present study has the potentiality of providing a new, yet simplest non-invasive screening tool for VL in remote rural areas.Diagnostic accuracy of two rK39 antigen-based dipsticks and the formol gel test for rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in northeastern Uganda.The development of an accurate, practical, and affordable diagnostic test is essential to improve the management of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in remote health centers. We evaluated the Formol Gel test (FGT) and two rK39 antigen-based dipsticks, the DUAL-IT L/M, and the Kalazar Detect for VL diagnosis in Amudat Hospital in Uganda. The DUAL-IT L/M was also evaluated for the diagnosis of malaria. All patients clinically suspect of VL were prospectively included in the study between October 2003 and March 2004. The gold standard used to define a VL case was a positive spleen aspirate or a direct agglutination test titer of >1:12,800 with an appropriate clinical response to antileishmanial therapy. A total of 131 VL and 112 non-VL patients were included in the analysis. The DUAL IT L/M was found to be more sensitive than the Kalazar Detect: 97% (95% confidence interval [95%CI] = 92 to 99%) versus 82% (95%CI = 74 to 87%). The Kalazar Detect and the DUAL IT L/M were highly specific (99% [95%CI = 95 to 100%] and 97% [95%CI = 92 to 99%], respectively). The FGT lacked both sensitivity (66% [95%CI = 57 to 73%]) and specificity (90% [95%CI = 83 to 94%]). The sensitivity of the DUAL IT L/M for malaria was only 57% (95%CI = 37 to 76%). The two rK39 dipsticks can be used for diagnostic confirmation of VL in this region. The DUAL-IT L/M without its malaria diagnostic component (DiaMed-IT LEISH) will be adopted as first-line test for VL in Uganda.[Investigation of Leishmania infantum seropositivity in HIV/AIDS patients].In recent years an increase in the rate of detection of HIV and Leishmania co-infections has been reported from many countries especially countries in Southern Europe. Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is sporadically detected in some parts of Turkey. Although the natural transmission is via sandfly bites, VL may be transmitted by needle sharing of intravenous drug addicts or by blood transfusion in HIV/AIDS patients. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence of specific antibodies against Leishmania infantum, which is the causative agent of VL, in the sera of HIV/AIDS patients. A total of 79 HIV/AIDS patients (61 male, 18 female; mean age: 30 +/- 2 years) with confirmed diagnosis by HIV Reference Laboratory of Refik Saydam Hygiene Center between the years of 2004-2006, were included in the study. L. infantum antibodies were searched by fast agglutination screening test (FAST), direct agglutination test (DAT), indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) and rK39 dipstick assay. Only one serum sample (1.2%) was found to be seropositive by all of the serological tests (> 1/100 by FAST, 1/3200 by DAT, 1/256 by IFAT, and specific bands for L. infantum by rK39 dipstick test), while the remaining samples were negative with all of the methods. The seropositive serum was from a 49 years-old heterosexual male, living on the Mediterranean cost and has had acquired the HIV infection by sexual contact. He has no history of intravenous drug use but he had experienced blood transfusion. Since the seropositive serum sample was collected 2-3 weeks after the transfusion, the transmission of L. infantum was thought to be during blood transfusion, however it could also be acquired via a previous sandfly bite. In conclusion although the rate of L. infantum seropositivity was low in HIV/AIDS patients in our study, the possibility of HIV/Leishmania co-infections should be considered.Evaluation of latex agglutination test (KAtex) for early diagnosis of kala-azar.Kala-azar is one of the major public health problem in Bangladesh. But the diagnosis of the problem often is difficult, unusual and time consuming, a simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, reliable and rapid diagnostic test has been a long-felt need of the clinicians. Therefore, the present study was conducted to see the sensitivity and specificity of Latex Agglutination test (KAtex) to detect leishmanial antigen from urine of kala-azar cases. The study was carried out in the department of Paediatrics, Mymensingh Medical College and Hospital, Bangladesh during July to December, 2008. A total of 100 urine samples were collected of which 50 were confirmed kala-azar cases and 50 were age and sex matched controls. Out of 50 kala-azar cases 47 showed positive result of KAtex. The test was also positive in 01 out of 30 healthy controls. None of the febrile controls was positive by KAtex. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test using presence of LD bodies in splenic and/or bone marrow aspirate as gold standard were 94%, 98%, 97.91% and 94.23% respectively. KAtex is simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, rapid and reliable test for diagnosing kala-azar in endemic area and useful for small, less equipped laboratories as well as for the laboratories with better facilities.Rapid accurate field diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis.A firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) requires demonstration of the parasite in organ aspirates or tissue biopsy samples. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the diagnostic usefulness of non-invasive testing for antibody to the leishmanial antigen K39 by means of antigen-impregnated nitrocellulose paper strips adapted for use under field conditions.One drop of peripheral blood is applied to the hitrocellulose strip. Three drops of test buffer (phosphate-buffered saline plus bovine serum albumin) are added to the dried blood. The development of two visible bands indicates presence of IgG anti-K39. 323 consecutive patients with suspected kala-azar referred to two specialist units in India, and 25 healthy controls, provided fingerstick blood samples for the test. Spleen aspirates were taken from 250 patients.Kala-azar was confirmed by microscopy of spleen-aspirate smears in 127 patients. The K39 strip test was positive in all 127; the estimated sensitivity was therefore 100% (95% CI 98-100). Four patients had positive strip tests but negative aspirate smears; all four responded to treatment for leishmaniasis. 217 individuals, including the 25 healthy controls, 73 patients with malaria or tuberculosis, and 119 spleen-aspirate-negative patients who had presumed malaria or cirrhosis (79) or no final diagnosis (40), had negative strip-test results. None of the 119 aspirate-negative patients developed evidence of kala-azar during 3-6 months of follow-up. The estimated specificity of the strip test was 98% (95-100; 217/221).Detection of anti-K39 by immunochromatographic strip testing is a rapid and non-invasive method of diagnosing kala-azar, which has good sensitivity and specificity and is well suited for use in field conditions.Diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis with the recombinant K39 strip test: experience from the Sudan.We compared a strip test employing recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen and protein A/colloidal gold as read-out agents with the rK39 ELISA for IgM and IgG antibodies and the direct agglutination test (DAT) using 55 sera from patients with parasitologically confirmed visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The rK39 strip test was positive in 37/55 (67%), the DAT in 50/55 (91%) at > or = 1 : 1600 cut-off value and in 47/55 (85%) at > or = 1 : 6400 cut-off value. The rK39-ELISA gave positive IgG results for all sera; those who had a positive strip test had significantly higher IgG levels than those with a negative strip test (31.1 (SD=3.6) and 17.7 U/ml (SD=9.8), respectively, P < 0.0001). A total of 31/55 (56%) sera showed a positive IgM result; of these 27 (49%) had a positive strip test. We tested 115 apparently cured VL patients with the strip test during follow-up; 68 were also tested with DAT. In the strip test, 25-43% of patients had a positive result at time points 3, 6, 9 and 12 months after treatment; for DAT (cut-off > or = 1 : 1600) these results were 67-83%. In neither test did a significant decrease in positivity rates occur over time (P=0.37 for the strip test, P=0.17 for the DAT). No correlation (P=0.33) was found between a positive strip test and a positive DAT result (cut-off > or = 1: 1600), indicating that the strip test and DAT are complementary rather than interchangeable. Of 61 endemic controls two (3%) had a positive strip test result; both had a positive leishmanin skin test. The rK39 strip test has the ideal format for use in the field, but its sensitivity is limited; like DAT, but to a lesser extent, it remains positive after treatment.Rapid immunochromatographic strip test for detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin G antibodies for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.InBios International has developed an immunochromatographic rapid strip for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis that requires minimal equipment and only a small amount of blood to run a test. We compared the InBios rapid strip test with the CDC immunofluorescent antibody assay, and the agreement, sensitivity, and specificity were 98%, 90%, and 100%, respectively.Latex agglutination test for the detection of urinary antigens in visceral leishmaniasis.This paper describes a new latex agglutination test ('KATEX') for the detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. In preliminary laboratory trials, using urine collected from well-defined cases and controls from Brazil, Yemen and Nepal, the test had 100% specificity and a sensitivity between 68 and 100%. When used in a time-course experiment in cotton rats infected with Leishmania donovani, the test became positive 1 week after inoculation and antigen levels in urine declined rapidly after chemotherapy (the test was negative before the end of the course of treatment). Finally, in an integrated study performed in Sudan, KATEX was compared to microscopy and four different serological tests in a group of 73 patients having presented with clinical manifestations suggestive of visceral leishmaniasis. Compared to microscopy, KATEX performed better than any single serological test in predicting positivity and a particularly good result was obtained by combining KATEX and the direct agglutination test (DAT).Dot-ELISA using monoclonal antibodies for identification of Leishmania donovani.Evaluation of the direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The direct agglutination test (DAT) based on a freeze-dried antigen and the rK39 dipstick test were evaluated for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The sensitivity and specificity of both tests were determined using sera from confirmed VL patients (n = 21), healthy controls (n = 19) and from patients with other confirmed infectious diseases (n = 42). The DAT had a sensitivity and a specificity of 100%. The rK39 had a sensitivity of 85.7% and a specificity of 82%. Both tests were also used to screen blood samples of confirmed VL patients (n = 15) and serum samples of VL suspects (n = 61). The DAT found all blood samples of confirmed VL patients positive and tested 98.4% of the serum samples of the VL suspects positive. In contrast, rK39 detected in 9/15 blood samples (60%) antibodies against Leishmania chagasi and found 85.3% of the serum samples of the suspected patients positive. Although the rK39 dipstick is more rapid and user friendlier than the DAT, the latter has a superior sensitivity and specificity. Furthermore, the reagents used for DAT do not require cold storage, whereas the buffer of the rK39 must be stored at 4oC. Therefore, the DAT is the most suitable test for the sero-diagnosis of VL under field conditions.Comparison of new diagnostic tools for management of pediatric Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis.New techniques are available for diagnosing leishmaniasis, but their efficacy in the identification of pediatric visceral leishmaniasis (VL) has not been compared with that of traditional methods. Blood, bone marrow, and urine samples were taken from 25 children with VL during their first clinical episode, 22 days after the start of treatment with liposomal amphotericin B (3 mg/kg/day on 6 days over a 10-day period), and when a relapse was suspected during follow-up. The results obtained suggest that antibody detection techniques, the antigen detection in urine (KAtex kit), and Leishmania nested PCR (LnPCR) analysis of the blood could be used for diagnosis of the first clinical episode. After treatment, clinical improvement was associated with negativization of Novy-MacNeal-Nicolle culture and microscopy of bone marrow aspirate, KAtex test, and LnPCR blood analysis results. Interestingly, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow aspirate showed that sterile cure was not achieved in eight patients, two of which suffered a relapse within 10 to 20 weeks. All of the new noninvasive techniques tested showed high diagnostic sensitivity. However, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow was the most sensitive; this test was able to detect the persistence of parasites and predict potential relapses.Easy test for visceral Leishmaniasis and post-Kala-azar Dermal Leishmaniasis.Performance of recombinant K39 antigen in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis.This study evaluated the performance of recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen in a immunochromatographic format (strip test) and a crude antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in 128 consecutive patients with parasitologically proven infections (by microscopy and/or culture). For each patient, a medical history was obtained and a complete physical examination was performed. Controls included 10 healthy volunteers and 50 patients with other diseases: malaria (10), leprosy (9), Chagas' disease (10), tuberculosis (10), and cutaneous leishmaniasis (11). The sensitivities of the rK39 antigen strip test and the ELISA were 90% and 89%, respectively, while the specificities were 100% and 98%, respectively. Our study confirms the accuracy of the rK39 antigen strip test in the diagnosis of VL in a high prevalence population.Improvement of the newly developed latex agglutination test (Katex) for diagnosis of visceral lieshmaniasis.Different methods are available for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), among them the urine-based antigen detection assay, latex agglutination test (Katex), is a recently developed one. The main drawback of the test is false-positive reactivity in some of healthy individuals. The false positivity of the test can be removed by boiling the urine sample for 5 min before testing. In this study an attempt was made to improve Katex by removing unpleasant boiling process, which also decreases field applicability of the test.False-positive and true-positive urine samples were collected from VL patients and healthy individuals. Both samples were then treated by reagents including, sodium dodecyl sulfate, trichloroacetic acid, dithiothreitol (DTT), sulphosalicylic acid and also heating at 56 degrees C.Findings of this study showed that DTT pretreatment significantly reduced the rate of false-positive reactivity of Katex where 73% of false-positive urine samples changed to negative after DTT treatment. However, the DTT treatment reduced the rate of true positivity by 14%.These data indicate that DTT can be used to eliminate nonspecific reactivity in the Katex. This will improve the performance of Katex and make it a more convenient and field applicable test.Diagnosis of Indian kala-azar by dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (dot-ELISA).Serodiagnosis of kala-azar was determined by dot-ELISA under variable conditions such as may be encountered in the field, for example, in the nature of the antigen, the preservation of antigen at different temperatures, variation in incubation temperature and so on. The test was found to be useful under field conditions, and the correlation between ELISA and dot-ELISA was significant. Dot-ELISA has definite advantages over the ELISA test, as it is easy to perform, is stable and does not require expensive equipment. The test can be used for large-scale screening of sera in sero-epidemiological studies.In search of an ideal test for diagnosis and prognosis of kala-azar.The latex agglutination test (KAtex), direct agglutination test (DAT), and the rK39 immuno-chromatographic strip test (dipstick test) were evaluated for their role in the diagnosis and prognosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) in India. Sera and urine samples from 455 subjects--150 confirmed visceral leishmaniasis cases, 160 endemic controls, 100 non-endemic controls, and 45 other febrile diseases--were included in the study. The sensitivity of the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test was 87% [95% confidence interval (CI) 80-96], 93.3% (95% CI 88-100), and 98% (95% CI 93-100) respectively. The specificity of these tests was 98% (95% CI 93-100), 93% (95% CI 87-100), and 89% (95% CI 82-97) for the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test respectively. Fifty cases were followed up and subjected to the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test after 30 days of successful treatment. The DAT and rK39 strip test showed positive results in all the 50 cases whereas the KAtex showed no positive reaction in any case. Based on the results, it is concluded that the sensitivity and specificity of the DAT and rK39 strip test are comparable but the greater convenience of use of the strip test makes it a better tool for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in the peripheral areas of endemic regions whereas the sensitivity of the KAtex needs to be improved to promote its use as a first-line diagnostic test in the field-setting. It may be used for the prognosis of the disease as antigen becomes undetectable in urine after 30 days of the completion of the treatment. Alternatively, it can be used as an adjunct with rK39 for sero-epidemiological surveys.Evaluation of a urinary antigen-based latex agglutination test in the diagnosis of kala-azar in eastern Nepal.We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy as well as the reproducibility of the urine latex agglutination test 'KAtex' in the diagnosis of kala-azar in patients recruited at a tertiary care centre in Dharan, Nepal, between November 2000 and January 2002.All patients presenting with fever of 2 weeks or more and splenomegaly were consecutively enrolled. Bone marrow and--if negative--spleen aspirates were examined for Leishmania donovani. Serum and urine samples were taken in duplicate for the Direct Agglutination Test (DAT) and KAtex. The reference laboratory determined sensitivity and specificity of KAtex. Reproducibility between both laboratories was assessed.KAtex was performed on urine from 155 parasitologically confirmed kala-azar and 77 non-kala-azar cases (parasitology and DAT-negative). KAtex showed a sensitivity of 47.7% (74/155, 95% CI: 39.7-55.9) and a specificity of 98.7% (76/77, 95% CI: 93.0-100.0). Reproducibility of KAtex showed a kappa of 0.684 (P < 0.001, n = 232).KAtex evaluation showed high specificity, low sensitivity and moderate reproducibility. A urine test for kala-azar could become a real breakthrough in kala-azar management if its reproducibility and sensitivity could be further improved.K39 strip test--easy, reliable and cost-effective field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis in India.A firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires demonstration of the parasite in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the usefulness of K39 strip test as a noninvasive method of diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis under field conditions by testing serum antibody to the leishmanial antigen K39.One drop of serum/blood was applied to the sample application pad on the test strip, which was diluted with 2 drops of chase buffer solution. The development of two visible red lines indicates the presence of IgG anti-K39. In the first phase of the study (2001), a total of 200 patients (Active VL-70, ex-VL-30, healthy endemic control-20 and patients with other tropical diseases-80) were tested with the K39 strip test at the School of Tropical Medicine, Kolkata. In the second phase of the study (2002), the test was applied in a remote tribal area of West Bengal where an epidemic of VL had occurred. Thirty-two patients were identified in 207 villagers of the affected area; all of them were tested with the K39 strip test.In the first phase, all VL and ex-VL cases gave positive results (100%). Ten percent of the healthy endemic controls were positive. The test results were negative in all other prevalent tropical diseases (100%). The estimated sensitivity of the test was 100% and the specificity was 98.18%. In the second phase of the study, all 32 patients of the epidemic were shown to be positive. All patients were treated with sodium stibogluconate injections and they recovered uneventfully.K39 strip test is ideal for rapid reliable field diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. The test has high sensitivity and specificity but it remains positive long after treatment (up to 3 years).[Katex for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis].Katex is a latex agglutination test allowing highly specific detection Leishmania antigen in urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. A multicentric study of this new diagnostic tool which is also effective in patients co-infected by leishmaniasis and HIV is currently in progress in Sudan, India, Nepal, Brazil and Spain. The authors describe the utility of this technique in comparison with other routine diagnostic procedures such as microscopic examination and serological tests. Preliminary results suggest that it could be used to confirm infection in the field and to monitor treatment efficacy.Evaluation of two rK39 dipstick tests, direct agglutination test, and indirect fluorescent antibody test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in a new epidemic site in highland Ethiopia.We assessed the performance characteristics of two rK39 immunochromatographic tests, a direct agglutination test (DAT), and an indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) in the site of a new epidemic of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in northwestern Ethiopia. The study population was composed of 179 patients with suspected VL and 67 controls. The sensitivities of Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT in 35 polymerase chain reaction-confirmed VL cases were 94.3%, 91.4%, 91.4%, and 100%, respectively, and the specificities were 98.5%, 94%, 98.5%, and 98.5%, respectively. In a Bayesian latent class analysis of all 246 specimens, the estimated sensitivities were 90.5%, 89%, 88.8%, and 96% for Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT, respectively; DAT showed the highest estimated specificity (97.4%). Both rK39 immunochromatographic tests perform as well as DAT, and are suitable for VL diagnosis in first-level health centers in this area of Ethiopia.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): comparison with standard ELISA and complement fixation assays for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis.The dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA), standard ELISA and the complement fixation (CF) tests were compared in the serodiagnosis of African visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar). Assay sensitivity was determined using sera from 44 patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar. Using the Dot-ELISA, 42 of 44 patients (95%) were positive at a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 32 (titer range 512-524 288). In the standard ELISA technique, 43 of 44 patients (98%) were positive (titer range 32-32 768). At a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 8 in the CF test, 35 patients (80%) were positive, 1 (2%) was negative and 8 patients (18%) showed anticomplementary (AC) activity (titer range 8-2048). Specificity, determined using 33 sera from healthy individuals not living in endemic areas, was 97% in both the Dot-ELISA and the standard ELISA (32 of 33 sera); in he CF test, all sera were negative except 1 (3%) which showed AC activity. Sera from patients with Chagas' disease cross-reacted in the dot-ELISA up to a titer of 512. In the standard ELISA, cross-reactions occurred mainly using sera from patients with Chagas' disease, malaria and syphilis, and to a lesser extent with sera from amebiasis, schistosomiasis and trichinosis patients. Overall titer agreement in replicate experiments was highest in the Dot-ELISA (89%), followed by the standard ELISA (80%) and the CF test (72%).Multi-centric prospective evaluation of rk39 rapid test and direct agglutination test for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.The diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is still a major problem in Brazil and several other countries where the disease is endemic. The use of an easy-to-use and interpret, sensitive, and specific method that requires no complex infrastructure or specialized professionals, such as direct agglutination test (DAT) and the rK39-based rapid immunochromatographic test may enhance the diagnosis of disease. This study evaluated the performance of a rapid test (DiaMed- IT-LEISH®) and the DAT for the diagnosis of VL in 213 parasitologically confirmed cases and 119 controls with clinical suspicion of VL and confirmation of another etiology. The sensitivities and specificities of the rapid test were 93% and 97%, respectively and those of the DAT were 90% and 96%, respectively. The positive predictive values of the rapid test and the DAT were 98% and 97%, respectively and the negative predictive values were 89% and 84%, respectively. The Kappa index showed agreement between both methods classified as substantial (0.77). This study showed that the DAT and the rapid test can be used to diagnose VL in Brazil, following a pilot study for implementation of the rapid test in the health services.Use of the recombinant K39 dipstick test and the direct agglutination test in a setting endemic for visceral leishmaniasis in Nepal.We evaluated the field use of two serologic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), the direct agglutination test (DAT) and rK39 dipstick test, in the context of a case-control study. Most VL cases in Nepal are currently diagnosed on clinical grounds and with relatively non-specific tests such as the formol-gel test. Among 14 newly diagnosed VL patients with bone-marrow slides confirmed positive in two independent laboratories, the sensitivity of both tests was 100%. Among 113 controls with no personal or household history of VL, the specificity of the rK39 was 100% while that of the DAT was 93%. The rK39 was less expensive than DAT, and has the advantages of ease of use and obtaining results within minutes. The wider use of the rK39 dipstick test could improve the specificity of VL diagnosis in Nepal.Use of the Kala-Azar Detect® and IT-LEISH® rapid tests for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.The performances of two rapid tests and a standard serological test for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) were compared using sera from 193 patients with VL and 85 controls. The Kala-Azar Detect(®), IT-LEISH(®) and IFI-LH(®) assays showed sensitivities of 88.1%, 93.3% and 88.6%, respectively, and specificities of 90.6%, 96.5% and 80%, respectively. The sensitivity values were similar for both rapid tests, but the specificity and positive predictive values of IT-LEISH(®) were higher than the corresponding values for IFI-LH(®). Both rapid tests showed satisfactory performances and can be used in primary health care settings; however, IT-LEISH(®) permits the use of whole blood, making this assay more suitable for bedside diagnosis.Assessment of the direct agglutination test, fast agglutination screening test, and rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Syria.To evaluate the performances of 3 serological assays (direct agglutination test [DAT], fast agglutination screening test [FAST], recombinant protein [rK39] dipstick) test for use in primary care, for the diagnosis visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Syria.We utilized 267 serum samples obtained during 2007 from patient groups confirmed and suspected VL, confirmed cutaneous leishmaniasis, toxoplasmosis from endemic areas in Syria and control samples, and applied the 3 serological tests in the Damascus University, Damascus and Health laboratories at the same time, on these samples.Our data show that the tests were very sensitive, where the DAT was the most specific followed by FAST, then rK39 dipstick.Our study confirmed that all the tests performed well, and proved to be very important sero-diagnosis tools for visceral leishmaniasis.Comparison of an rK39 dipstick rapid test with direct agglutination test and splenic aspiration for the diagnosis of kala-azar in Sudan.We compared an rK39 dipstick rapid test (Amrad ICT, Australia) with a direct agglutination test (DAT) and splenic aspirate for the diagnosis of kala-azar in 77 patients. The study was carried out under field conditions in an endemic area of north-east Sudan. The sensitivity of the rK39 test compared with splenic aspiration was 92% (46/50), the specificity 59% (16/27), and the positive predictive value 81% (46/57). Compared with the diagnostic protocol used by Médecins sans Frontières, the sensitivity of the rK39 test was 93% (50/54), the specificity 70% (16/23), and the positive predictive value 88% (50/57). Compared with splenic aspirates, the sensitivity of a DAT with a titre > or =1:400 was 100% (50/50), but its specificity only 55% (15/27) and the positive predictive value was 80% (50/62). Using a DAT titre > or =1:6400, the sensitivity was 84% (42/50), the specificity 85% (23/27) and the positive predictive value 91% (42/46). All four patients with DAT titre > or =1:6400 but negative splenic aspirate were also rK39 positive; we consider these are probably 'true' cases of kala-azar, i.e. false negative aspirates, rather than false DAT and rK39 seropositives. There were no false negative DATs (DAT titre < or =1:400 and aspirate positive), but there were four false negative rK39 tests (rK39 negative and aspirate positive). The rK39 dipstick is a good screening test for kala-azar; but further development is required before it can replace the DAT as a diagnostic test in endemic areas of the Sudan.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of kala-azar & post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis at a tertiary care centre of north India.Definitive diagnosis of kala-azar requires demonstration of parasites by diagnostic protocols based on invasive organ aspirations. We evaluated in the present study the diagnostic utility of an immunochromatographic test (ICT) for detection of anti- rK-39 antibodies for the non-invasive diagnosis of kala-azar and post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL) at a tertiary care centre of north India.The study was conducted in the Department of Microbiology, All India Institute of Medical Sciences, New Delhi, from July 2003 to October 2004. Of the 120 samples tested, 57 were found to be positive by ICT; of which, 51 were diagnosed as kala-azar and 6 as PKDL. The controls included individuals from endemic (50) and non endemic (19) areas with malignancies, haemolytic disorders, chronic liver diseases, hypersplenism, portal hypertension, metabolic disorders and sarcoidosis. In addition, 47 sera from confirmed cases of tuberculosis, malaria, typhoid, filariasis, leptospirosis, histoplasmosis, toxoplasmosis, invasive aspergillosis, amoebic liver abscess, AIDS, leprosy, cryptococcosis, strongyloidiasis, cyclosporosis, patients having collagen vascular diseases and hypergammaglobulinaemia were also tested to check the specificity of the test.Of the 51 cases with kala-azar 43 were males, children accounted for 25 per cent of these cases. All had fever of duration ranging from <1 month to 1.5 yr (median 4.5 months). All PKDL patients (n=6, 4 males) gave a history of having suffered from kala-azar in the past, and their slit skin test smears were microscopically positive for Leishman-Donovan (LD) bodies. The strip test was positive in all the cases of kala-azar and PKDL (estimated sensitivity 100%), all control sera were negative by the ICT (specificity 100%).The rK-39 ICT is a highly sensitive and specific test, and may be suitable for a rapid, cost-effective and reliable field diagnosis of kala-azar and PKDL.Imported visceral leishmaniasis: diagnostic dilemmas and comparative analysis of three assays.The present study evaluates the performances of three noninvasive serological assays for the detection of immunoglobulin G antibodies to leishmania antigen for the diagnosis of imported cases of kala azar (visceral leishmaniasis [VL]) in a country, Kuwait, where the disease is not endemic. A total of 323 individuals including 21 patients with documented cases of VL, 72 individuals with suspected cases of VL, 155 patients with other parasitic infections, and 75 healthy control individuals were tested by indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA; Behring Diagnostics GmbH, Marburg, Germany), indirect fluorescent-antibody assay (IFA; bioMerieux sa, Marcy l'Etoile, France), and a qualitative membrane-based immunoassay with recombinant leishmania antigen K39 (strip-test; Intersep Ltd, Berkshire, United Kingdom). Our data show that IHA is the most sensitive test (100%), followed by IFA (86.6%) and the strip-test (80.0%). The strip-test was the most specific (100%) of the three assays, followed by IFA (93.0%) and IHA (86.0%). However, the strip-test failed to detect at least three confirmed cases of VL. We conclude that IHA is preferred over IFA and the strip-test for the screening of individuals with suspected cases of VL, especially in a country where VL is not endemic and where the number of cases is regular but limited. The details about some of the patients with VL are presented to highlight the diversity of clinical presentations and problems encountered in the diagnosis of VL in a country where VL is not endemic.A rapid and simple diagnostic test for active visceral leishmaniasis.We have developed an immunodot assay for the serodiagnosis of active visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) which utilizes protein A colloidal gold as the visualizing agent. The test is simple, requires few reagents, and can be completed in two hours. It is sensitive and specific for active visceral leishmaniasis, and generally correlates with the ELISA. Either whole blood or sera in minute quantities may be used as test antibody. In addition, the use of the protein A gold immunodot is shown to detect anti-leishmania antibodies in infected dogs.Rapid detection of human Leishmania infantum infection: a comparative field study using the fast agglutination screening test and the direct agglutination test.This study aimed to evaluate the performance of a fast agglutination screening test (FAST) for serodiagnosis of human Leishmania infantum infection in Iran. FAST is based on the direct agglutination test (DAT) but combines with a higher parasite concentration and is performed with only one serum dilution. The validity of FAST for the detection of L. infantum infection in the field was compared with the direct agglutination test on 110 confirmed or patients suspected of infection with leishmaniasis, 177 healthy individuals and 41 patients with other infectious diseases who were from northwestern and southern parts of Iran. In this study, we found a 1:1600 cut-off point empirically by seeking the best correlation (90.8) between sera confirmed with visceral leishmaniasis and healthy control sera. A sensitivity of 95.4% (95% CI, 91.4-99.4) and specificity of 88.5% (95% CI, 84.2-92.8) were found with 1:1600 as a cut-off titer when DAT-confirmed cases were compared with the control groups. A good degree of agreement was found between FAST and DAT (90.8%) by Kappa analysis. FAST requires 2 h for reading the results versus the 12-18 h needed for DAT. As FAST is simple, rapid, sensitive and non-invasive and does not require a higher volume of antigens or much expertise, it can be used for screening and serodiagnosis of human L. infantum infection.Field use of the Dot-ELISA test for visceral leishmaniasis in Honduras.Detection of circulating antigens in sera from visceral leishmaniasis patients using dot-ELISA.The anti-amastigote IgG antibodies were raised in rabbits purified and fractionated using the standard methods. From the same anti-amastigote IgG antibodies, a peroxidase conjugate reagent was prepared. Initially, the anti-amastigote IgG antibodies and their corresponding peroxidase conjugate reagents were analyzed with respect to their ability to recognise the homologous antigens. Thirty five serum samples from visceral leishmaniasis patients (VLP) were examined using dot-ELISA. In addition, thirty seven serum samples from either non-infected individuals or from patients infected with heterologous organisms were used to define the sensitivity and specificity of the test. Circulating antigens in 35 serum samples from VLP were successfully identified using dot-ELISA giving 100% sensitivity. With exception of serum samples from patients with Plasmodium vivax which shown cross-reactivity with Leishmania donovani antigens, the test appeared to be specific for the detection of circulating leishmanial antigens. Cross-reactivity was not observed with P. faciparum or Brucellosis.Immunochromatographic rK39 strip test in the serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Tunisia.The performance of the rK39 strip test in the diagnosis of Tunisian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) was evaluated and compared with that of immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT). A total of 929 sera, including 574 from VL patients, 54 from cutaneous leishmaniasis (CL) patients, 42 from patients with other protozoan diseases, 152 from patients with non-parasitic diseases and 107 from healthy controls, were used in the study. The sensitivity and specificity of the rK39 strip test were 87.1 and 94.4%, respectively. Sixteen CL sera showed positive results, suggesting that the rK39 strip test is not restricted to Leishmania donovani complex detection. IFAT was comparatively more sensitive (98.9%) but slightly less specific (90.7%). Despite cross-reactivity shown by CL sera, the rK39 strip test can be recommended for the routine diagnosis of VL in Tunisia, as VL and CL are distinct clinical entities.False-positive results of a rapid K39-based strip test and Chagas disease.The definitive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires invasive procedures with demonstration of amastigotes in tissue or promastigotes in culture. Unfortunately, these approaches require laboratory materials not available in poor countries where the disease is endemic. The correct diagnosis of VL is important, and made more difficult by the fact that several common tropical diseases such as malaria, disseminated tuberculosis, and enteric fever share the same clinical presentation. Serological tests have been developed to replace parasitological diagnosis in the field. A commercially available K39-based strip test for VL has been developed for this purpose. The endemic area of leishmaniasis in Brazil overlaps the endemic area of Chagas disease, a disease that can cause false-positive serological test results. The aim of this study was to evaluate the incidence of false-positive exams using a rapid test for VL in patients with Chagas disease.A rapid test based on the recombinant K39 antigen of Leishmania was used in: (1) 30 patients with confirmed Chagas disease, (2) 30 patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease by ELISA, indirect immunofluorescence, indirect hemagglutination, and chemiluminescence, (3) 30 healthy patients from a non-endemic area as the control group, (4) 30 patients with confirmed VL, and (5) 20 patients with proved cutaneous leishmaniasis.The sensitivity and specificity of the rapid strip test were 100% when compared with healthy volunteers and those with confirmed Chagas disease. One false-positive result occurred in the group with Chagas disease diagnosed by serological tests (specificity of 96%).The rapid test based on recombinant K39 is a useful diagnostic assay, and a false-positive result rarely occurs in patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease.Qualitative and semi-quantitative comparison of an rK39 strip test and direct agglutination test for detection of anti-Leishmania donovani antibodies in the Sudan.Until now, the comparison of the rK39 strip test (RKT) and direct agglutination test (DAT) for detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is exclusively based on either positive or negative qualification of the reaction outcome.In this study, we compared the diagnostic performance of RKT and DAT for VL both qualitatively and semi-quantitatively.For comparison based on semi-quantitative grounds, the execution of RKT and DAT was according to the standard procedures. For comparison on semi-qualitative grounds with DAT, the RKT was applied to aliquots from positive samples that were two-fold serially diluted in saline to determine, as for the DAT, the end-point reaction in RKT.While qualitatively both RKT and DAT demonstrated comparable reliability for VL detection (sensitivity = 96% and specificity = 98.7% or 99.3%), no significant correlation (r = 0.13) could be established between intensities of their positive reactions in 25 cases studied. A negative correlation was further determined in those 25 VL cases between the positive intensities of the RKT and antibody levels measured semi-quantitatively with the same procedure (r = -0.36) or the DAT (r = -0.30). Irrespective of the low, moderate or high antibody levels measured with RKT (< or = 1:8 and 1:16-1:32 > or = 1:256) or DAT (< or = 1:25,600 and 1:51,200- 1:409,600 > or = 1:3,276,800) in patients with confirmed or unconfirmed VL infection, exclusively strong positive intensities were obtained with RKT.For further optimizing diagnosis and simultaneously assessing magnitude of immune response to L. donovani infection in Sudanese patients, the combined application of RKT and DAT is recommended.Serological diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: direct agglutination test versus rK39 strip test.We evaluated the direct agglutination test (DAT), using freeze-dried (FD) and aqueous (AQ) antigen, and the rK39 immunochromatographic strip test in the diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Sera from 508 subjects (150 parasitologically confirmed patients with VL, 100 and 153 healthy controls drawn from non-endemic and endemic regions, respectively, and 105 patients with other diseases presenting with fever and/or splenomegaly) were tested. The sensitivity of the tests were as follows: DAT (FD), 96% (95% CI 91-98); DAT (AQ), 97% (95% CI 93-99); rK39 strip test, 99% (95% CI 95-100). The specificity of DAT (FD), DAT (AQ) and rK39 strip tests were 85% (95% CI 81-88), 87% (95% CI 83-91) and 89% (95% CI 86-92), respectively. A significant correlation (high degree of agreement) was observed between all tests (kappa>0.80). We conclude that the sensitivity of FD antigen is comparable to that of AQ antigen. Similarly, the rK39 strip test is as sensitive as the DAT, but the strip test's greater convenience of use makes it a better tool for diagnosis of VL in peripheral areas of endemic regions.Urine antigen detection by latex agglutination test for diagnosis and assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis.This prospective study evaluated the usefulness of the kala-azar latex agglutination test (KAtex) for the diagnosis and laboratory assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) (or kala-azar) patients following 30 days of sodium antimony gluconate treatment at Rajshahi Medical College Hospital (Bangladesh). KAtex detects a low molecular weight, heat-stable, carbohydrate antigen in the urine of VL patients. KAtex was performed using freshly voided urine samples obtained from 36 parasitologically confirmed cases of VL before and after treatment as well as from 40 healthy controls (20 each from kala-azar-endemic and non-endemic zones). KAtex was found to be positive in 27 (75%) of the 36 patients at diagnosis and was negative in all the controls. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of KAtex were 75% (95% CI 57-87%) and 100% (95% CI 89-100%), respectively. Following treatment, all 36 VL cases were negative for Leishman-Donovan bodies by splenic smear microscopy and 34 (94.4%) were negative by KAtex. This limited study suggests that KAtex is a satisfactorily sensitive, highly specific, rapid and completely non-invasive urine-based antigen detection test for the diagnosis of VL. Currently, this is the only non-invasive laboratory tool useful for the assessment of initial cure in VL patients.A community-based, comparative evaluation of direct agglutination and rK39 strip tests in the early detection of subclinical Leishmania donovani infection.In the Indian state of Bihar, the sensitivities and specificities of direct agglutination tests (DAT) and rK39 test strips for the detection of Leishmania donovani infection in humans were explored and found to be generally good (92%-100%). When 172 asymptomatic individuals [16 'case-contacts' who lived in the same households as past or current, confirmed cases of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) and 156 other subjects from neighbouring households] were tested, the same 36 (21%) individuals, including all 16 'case-contacts', were found seropositive using each type of test. When followed-up after 3 months, 18 of the individuals who had been found seropositive in the baseline survey remained seropositive, and eight (44%) of these had developed symptomatic VL, with amastigotes in their splenic aspirates. Seven (44%) of the 16 'case-contacts' but only one (5%) of the other 20 subjects found seropositive at baseline went on to develop VL within 3 months. Although the strip test appeared slightly better than DAT for predicting the development of VL in the 172 subjects, either type of test may be very useful for the early detection of asymptomatic L. donovani infection and thus the identification of those at relatively high risk of developing VL.Diagnostic tests for kala-azar: a multi-centre study of the freeze-dried DAT, rK39 strip test and KAtex in East Africa and the Indian subcontinent.Three diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), the freeze-dried direct agglutination test (FD-DAT), the rK39 dipstick and a urine latex antigen test (KAtex), were evaluated for use in primary care in East Africa and the Indian subcontinent. Clinical suspects were prospectively recruited and tissue, blood and urine samples were taken. Direct microscopic examination of tissue smear, and FD-DAT, rK39 and KAtex were performed. Sensitivity and specificity with 95% credible intervals were estimated using Bayesian latent class analysis. On the Indian subcontinent both the FD-DAT and the rK39 strip test exceeded the 95% sensitivity and 90% specificity target, but not so in East Africa. Sensitivity of the FD-DAT was high in Ethiopia and Kenya but lower in Sudan, while its specificity was below 90% in Kenya. Sensitivity of the rK39 was below 80% in the three countries, and its specificity was only 70% in Ethiopia. KAtex showed moderate to very low sensitivity in all countries. FD-DAT and rK39 can be recommended for clinical practice on the Indian subcontinent. In East Africa, their clinical use should be carefully monitored. More work is needed to improve existing formats, and to develop better VL diagnostics.Recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of human leishmaniasis.A new recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test (ICT) was compared with the immunofluorescent antibody assay (IFA) for the rapid serological diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Apulia, Southern Italy. A total of 264 individuals were tested, including 19 patients with VL (three of which were HIV positive), 67 individuals with suspected VL, 40 healthy controls and 138 patients with other diseases. The ICT was positive in all 19 patients with VL and negative in sera from the remaining individuals. Both the sensitivity and specificity of ICT was 100%. The ICT also worked well in HIV-Leishmania co-infected patients. Antibodies to Leishmania detected by the IFA and ICT remained at detectable levels for up to 12-24 months. A positive reaction by the ICT was detectable at a serum dilution of up to 1:20,480, indicating that a strong immunoresponse is mounted against the recombinant K39 antigen. In conclusion, the ICT is highly sensitive, specific, rapid, noninvasive and cost effective (euro8.43 for ICT and euro12 for IFA) in the diagnosis of VL in areas of low VL endemicity.Comparison of parasitological, serological, and molecular tests for visceral leishmaniasis in HIV-infected patients: a cross-sectional delayed-type study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of invasive and non-invasive tests for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in a large series of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected patients. In this delayed-type cross-sectional study, 113 HIV-infected symptomatic patients were evaluated by an adjudication committee after clinical follow-up to establish the presence or absence of VL as the target condition (reference test). The index tests were recombinant K39 antigen-based immunochromatographic test (rK39), indirect fluorescent antibody test (IFAT), prototype kit of direct agglutination test (DAT-LPC), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) in peripheral blood. Compared with parasitological test and adjudication committee diagnosis or latent class model analyses, IFAT and rk39 dipstick test presented the lowest sensitivity. DAT-LPC exhibited good overall performance, and there was no statistical difference between DAT-LPC and qPCR diagnosis accuracy. Real-time PCR emerges as a less invasive alternative to parasitological examination for confirmation of cases not identified by DAT.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): a micro technique for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A micro enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay utilizing antigen dotted onto nitrocellulose filter discs (Dot-ELISA) was developed for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Leishmania donovani promastigotes applied to filter discs in volumes of 1 microliter were placed in 96-well microtiter plates, blocked with bovine serum albumin, then incubated with 4-fold dilutions of patient sera. After incubation with peroxidase-conjugated anti-human antibody, washing and addition of precipitable substrate, positive reactions appeared as blue dots on a white background which were easily read by eye. The procedure is performed at room temperature, takes about 2 h and is economical. At a reciprocal diagnostic titer of greater than or equal to 32, 41 of 42 (98%) leishmaniasis patients were positive, and positive titers ranged from 512 to 524,288. Control sera from healthy individuals showed 1 of 50 (2%) false positive reactions. Sera from patients with African trypanosomiasis, Chagas' disease, and lupus erythematosus were cross-reactive in the Dot-ELISA. No cross-reactivity was noted with sera from patients with amebiasis, coccidioidomycosis, cutaneous leishmaniasis, viral hepatitis, hydatidosis, malaria, schistosomiasis, syphilis, toxoplasmosis or trichinosis. In replicate experiments, 90% of 167 sera tested did not vary in titer. This rapid and inexpensive test should prove to be an important field diagnostic technique for visceral leishmaniasis.Field evaluation of FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX (urine latex agglutination) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in northwest Ethiopia.Three novel diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), namely FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX, were evaluated under field conditions using 101 clinical cases suspected of having VL enrolled in a trial either by active (63 patients) or passive (38 patients) surveillance. VL was confirmed in 49 patients: 35 by both aspirate smear microscopy and NNN culture, 10 by NNN culture alone and 4 by aspirate smear microscopy alone. Based on tests performed in the field, sensitivity for FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX was determined to be 95.3% (95% CI 82.9-99.2%), 71.7% (95% CI 56.3-83.5%) and 57.4% (95% CI 42.3-71.4%), respectively. Similarly, the specificity was determined to be 62.7% (95% CI 48.1-75.5%), 82.4% (95% CI 68.6-91.1%) and 84.3% (95% CI 70.9-92.5%), respectively. A higher sensitivity of KATEX (73.9% vs. 41.7%) and higher specificity of FD-DAT (100.0% vs. 48.6%) were demonstrated under passive case detection compared with active case detection. FD-DAT is recommended for confirmation of VL diagnosis in hospital settings, whereas its use in the field will be limited to exclude VL in clinical suspects. The sensitivity of KATEX and rK39 dipstick tests needs to be improved to promote their use as first-line diagnostic tests in the field setting of northwestern Ethiopia.Immunochromatographic (rK39) strip test in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bangladesh.Immunochromatographic strip test (ICT strip test) for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis was evaluated in this study in the context of a case-control study. A total sixty consecutive cases of kala-azar admitted in all four Medicine Units of Mymensingh Medical College Hospital during the period of May 2002 to February 2003 was included here. Parasitological confirmation was done by demonstration of leishmania donovani bodies in bone marrow or splenic aspiration in all cases. A total 120 controls was taken of which sixty were asymptomatic endemic controls with no previous history of kala-azar and sixty were admitted patients suffering from diseases other than kala-azar (malaria, tuberculosis, enteric fever and chronic liver disease). ICT strip test for kala-azar was done in all cases and controls. Only 2 of the confirmed kala-azar cases were negative and the remaining 58 cases were positive for ICT strip test which gives the sensitivity of this test 96.6%. Among the controls, 118 were negative for ICT strip test and two of the asymptomatic controls were positive for this test with no clinical evidence of kala-azar. So, the estimated specificity of ICT strip test is 98.3%. The predictive value for a negative result was 98.3% and for a positive result was 96.6%. The ICT strip test is easy, quick, requires no technical facilities with higher sensitivity and specificity entails it to be the ideal test for the diagnosis of kala-azar in field level.[Non invasive diagnostic tools for visceral leishmaniasis: a comparison of the immunoserological tests DAT, rK26 and rK39].Human visceral leishmaniasis is a serious public health problem in endemic countries because of its high potential lethality, particularly in children. Rapid diagnosis is essential to early treatment and control of visceral leishmaniasis.The aim was to compare three serodiagnostic tools for human visceral leishmaniasis.Three methods were compared: the rK39 dipstick (Kalazar detection test, Inbios International Inc.), ELISA rK26 and direct agglutination test (DAT) (KIT Biomedical Research). Fifty serum samples from patients positive for rK39 ELISA were compared from four endemic provinces in Venezuela: Nueva Esparta (Margarita island), Lara, Anzoátegui and Trujillo. Additional serum samples from 17 healthy volunteers and 25 patients with other diseases were included. The rK39 ELISA served as the baseline standard method. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and likelihood ratio were calculated for each test.All methods had a positive correlation with rK39 ELISA (p<0.0001). They showed high sensitivity and specificity. The direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick showed high sensitivity values, 89.7% (95% CI: 81.34.0-98.2%) and 94.2% (95% CI: 87.7-100%), respectively, and high specificity, 81.0% (95% CI: 80.0-99.5%) and 100%. The rK26 ELISA showed good specificity, 99% (95% CI: 95.2-100%), but a very low sensitivity, 37% (95% CI: 23.4-50.2%).Overall results indicated that DAT and rK39 dipstick have the highest specificity and sensitivity. Both are simple, cost-effective and field applicable tests. Therefore, they are recommended for early and accurate diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Design, development and evaluation of rK28-based point-of-care tests for improving rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is diagnosed by microscopic confirmation of the parasite in bone marrow, spleen or lymph node aspirates. These procedures are unsuitable for rapid diagnosis of VL in field settings. The development of rK39-based rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) revolutionized diagnosis of VL by offering high sensitivity and specificity in detecting disease in the Indian subcontinent; however, these tests have been less reliable in the African subcontinent (sensitivity range of 75-85%, specificity of 70-92%). We have addressed limitations of the rK39 with a new synthetic polyprotein, rK28, followed by development and evaluation of two new rK28-based RDT prototype platforms.Evaluation of 62 VL-confirmed sera from Sudan provided sensitivities of 96.8% and 93.6% (95% CI = K28: 88.83-99.61%; K39: 84.30-98.21%) and specificities of 96.2% and 92.4% (95% CI = K28: 90.53-98.95%; K39: 85.54-96.65%) for rK28 and rK39, respectively. Of greater interest was the observation that individual VL sera with low rK39 reactivity often had much higher rK28 reactivity. This characteristic of the fusion protein was exploited in the development of rK28 rapid tests, which may prove to be crucial in detecting VL among patients with low rK39 antibody levels. Evaluation of two prototype lateral flow-based rK28 rapid tests on 53 VL patients in Sudan and 73 VL patients in Bangladesh provided promisingly high sensitivities (95.9% [95% CI = 88.46-99.1 in Sudan and 98.1% [95% CI = 89.93-99.95%] in Bangladesh) compared to the rK39 RDT (sensitivities of 86.3% [95% CI = 76.25-93.23%] in Sudan and 88.7% [95% CI = 76.97-95.73%] in Bangladesh).Our study compares the diagnostic accuracy of rK39 and rK28 in detecting active VL cases and our findings indicate that rK28 polyprotein has great potential as a serodiagnostic tool. A new rK28-based RDT will prove to be a valuable asset in simplifying VL disease confirmation at the point-of-care.Field evaluation of rK39 test and direct agglutination test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in a population with high prevalence of human immunodeficiency virus in Ethiopia.Accuracy of an rK39 rapid diagnostic test (DiaMed-IT-Leish ) for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) was compared with splenic aspiration and the direct agglutination test (DAT) in a population with a high prevalence of infection with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in Ethiopia. There were 699 patients clinically suspected of having VL (153 parasitologically confirmed, 482 DAT confirmed, and 130 DAT negative), and 97 DAT-negative controls. A total of 84% were tested for HIV and 34% were HIV positive. Sensitivity of the rK39 test in parasitologically confirmed VL patients was 84% (77% in HIV positive and 87% in HIV negative; P = 0.25). Sensitivity of the DAT was higher (94%; P = 0.01), 89% in HIV-positive patients and 95% in HIV-negative patients; P = 0.27). Specificity of the rK39 test was 99% in DAT-negative controls and 92% in DAT-negative patients clinically suspected of having VL. A diagnostic algorithm combining DAT and the rK39 test had a sensitivity of 98% in HIV-positive VL patients and 99% in HIV-negative VL patients. Despite the lower sensitivity in a population with a high prevalence of HIV, the DiaMed-IT-Leish rK39 test enables decentralization of diagnosis. Patients clinically suspected of having VL who show negative results on the rK39 antigen test should undergo follow-up DAT testing, especially if they are HIV positive.Evaluation of a new recombinant K39 rapid diagnostic test for Sudanese visceral leishmaniasis.A new rK39 rapid diagnostic dipstick test (DiaMed-IT-Leish) was compared with aspiration and a direct agglutination test (DAT) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in 201 parasitologically confirmed cases, 133 endemic controls, and in 356 clinical suspects in disease-endemic and -epidemic areas in Sudan. The sensitivity of the rK39 test in parasitologically confirmed VL cases was 90%, whereas the specificity in disease-endemic controls was 99%. The sensitivity of the DAT was 98%. In clinically suspected cases, the sensitivity of the rK39 test was 81% and the specificity was 97%. When compared with the diagnostic protocol based on the DAT and aspiration used by Médecins sans Frontières in epidemic situations, the positive predictive value was 98%, and the negative predictive value was 71%. This rK39 rapid diagnostic test is suitable for screening as well as diagnosis of VL. Further diagnostic work-up of dipstick-negative patients with clinically suspected VL is important. The ease and convenience of the dipstick test will allow decentralization and improved access to care in disease-endemic areas in Sudan.Comparative evaluation of parasitology and serological tests in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in India: a phase III diagnostic accuracy study.In this phase III trial for diagnostics for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in India, we compared parasitological diagnosis with several serological tests: direct agglutination test (freeze dried; DAT-FD), rK-39 strip test, rK-26 strip test and a latex agglutination test for antigen detection in urine (KAtex) in 452 subjects from the endemic regions of Bihar, India. The subjects were segregated into four categories: 230 confirmed patients, 52 probable cases, 70 non-cases and 100 healthy endemic controls. The first two groups were used for estimating sensitivity, the latter two for specificity. Sensitivity of DAT-FD was 98.9%, rK-39: 98.9%, KAtex: 67.0% and rK-26: 21.3%. Sensitivity of DAT-FD on blood taken on filter paper (DAT-FDF) was 99.3%, which was comparable with that using serum. Specificity of serological tests was comparable and high (DAT-FD and DAT-FDF: 94%, rK-39 strip test: 97%, KAtex: 99% and rK-26 strip test: 100%). The classical 'gold standard' parasitological demonstration in splenic smear performed poorly as it missed 18.4% of cases that benefited from VL treatment. Reproducibility of the serological tests between field and central laboratories was excellent (kappa = 1.0, 0.99, 0.96 and 0.94 respectively for microscopy, DAT-FD, rK-39 strip test and rK-26 strip test). A high degree of agreement was observed between DAT-FD and rK-39 strip test (kappa = 0.986). Although DAT-FD and rK-39 strip test were highly sensitive with excellent specificity, the ease of use of the latter makes it most suitable for the diagnosis of VL in the field conditions.Field validity, reproducibility and feasibility of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in rural Nepal.To assess the field accuracy, reproducibility and feasibility of the formol gel test (FGT), the urine latex agglutination test (KAtex) and a rK39 antigen-based dipstick for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in rural Nepal.Patients with clinical suspicion of VL were recruited at Rangeli District Hospital (DH), a 15-bed government hospital located in south-eastern Nepal. FGT, KAtex and rK39 dipstick tests were performed on site and later repeated at a reference kala-azar diagnostic laboratory to assess reproducibility. Diagnosis of VL was confirmed by either a positive bone marrow aspirate examination or a positive direct agglutination test (DAT titre > or = 1:3200) in patients who later responded to anti-leishmanial therapy.Of 155 patients initially recruited, 142 (85 with VL and 57 with another diagnosis) were included in the study. The sensitivity of the rK39 dipstick [89%; 95% confidence interval (CI): 81-94] was significantly higher than that of the KAtex (57%; 95% CI: 46-67) and the FGT (52%; 95% CI: 41-62). All three tests had a specificity of at least 90%. Agreement was higher for the rK39 dipstick (kappa = 0.87) than for the FGT (0.68) and the KAtex (0.43). All tests required < or = 20 min of actual work and < or = 40 min to obtain the results.The rK39 dipstick was easy to do, more accurate and reproducible than other rapid diagnostic tests for VL in a DH of rural Nepal. It should be integrated into the field diagnostic algorithm of VL in this region and mechanisms to secure its availability should be found.Sero-epidemiological study of kala-azar in a village of Varanasi district, India.To evaluate five kala-azar serological tests for field use.Serological survey in Pandit Ka Purva village in Varanasi district, India, using Sia water test, aldehyde test, direct agglutination test (DAT), micro-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and dot-ELISA.The total population of the village was 518, 67 of whom showed typical clinical and parasitological features of kala-azar, including seven who died. The age distribution of kala-azar cases showed significant differences, being highest among the 45-54-year age group. The disease was more prevalent among males. Serum samples were collected from 498 persons (96% of total population) including 67 kala-azar cases and 40 disease controls (malaria, TB, leprosy, typhoid). Ten 10 serum samples from healthy controls living in endemic area were also collected. The test sensitivities were: Sia water test, 85.0%; aldehyde test, 62.7%; DAT, 94.0%; micro-ELISA, 91.0% and dot-ELISA, 97.0%. The test specificities were: Sia water test 92.5%, aldehyde test, 93.2%, DAT, 96.7; micro-ELISA, 97.6% and dot-ELISA, 98.4%.The dot-ELISA is highly sensitive and specific, cheap, and easy to interpret with the naked eye, making it a powerful screening test for the surveillance and diagnosis of Indian kala-azar at field level.Latent class analysis of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.To estimate the sensitivities and specificities of different diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) using latent class analysis (LCA). This study was performed using data from a prospective study conducted in four Brazilian states from May 2004 to May 2007. Five diagnostic tests for VL were evaluated in 285 VL cases and 119 non-cases: microscopy, indirect fluorescence antibody test (IFAT), enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay using recombinant K39 antigen (rK39-ELISA), direct agglutination test (DAT) and the rK39 rapid test.Microscopy showed sensitivity of 77.0% (CI: 71.5-81.5) and specificity of 99.0% (CI: 94.0-99.7). The IFAT and the DAT showed similar sensitivities, 88.3% (CI: 84.0-92.0) and 88.5% (CI: 84.1-92.0), respectively, but the DAT had a higher specificity (95.4%, CI: 89.2-98.1) than did the IFAT (83.0%, CI: 75.0-88.2). The rK39-ELISA and the rK39 rapid test showed sensitivities of 99.0% (CI: 96.3-99.6) and 94.0% (CI: 90.1-96.3), and specificities of 82.5% (CI: 75.0-88.3) and 100% (CI: 97.0-100.0%), respectively.Considering the lack of an adequate reference standard, LCA proved to be a useful tool in validating diagnostic methods for VL. The DAT and the rK39 rapid test showed better performance. Thus, clinically suspected cases of VL in a Brazilian endemic area could be treated based on the positivity of one of these tests.[Evaluation of a rapid test using recombinant k39 antigen in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil ].Diagnostic value of rK39 dipstick in zoonotic visceral leishmaniasis in Turkey.K39 is a repetitive immunodominant epitope in a kinesin-related protein expressed predominantly in the amastigotes of visceral Leishmania spp. Enzyme immunoassays of patient's sera with recombinant K39 (rK39) proved to be highly specific and sensitive for diagnosis of active visceral leishmaniasis (VL, kala-azar). The same assays in dipstick format were also found effective for diagnosis of both human VL (HVL) and canine VL (CanVL) in most endemic areas of these diseases. Fifty-eight human patients and 22 dogs, clinically suspected of kala-azar, were screened with rK39 dipstick in comparison with the conventional methods of diagnosis, i.e., microscopic examinations of bone marrow and lymph node aspirates and immunofluorescent antibody tests (IFAT), respectively. Sixteen patients and 12 dogs were found to be rK39 dipstick positive. The results were corroborated with those of parasitological examinations, except 1, rK39-positive but smear-negative, case in each group. IFAT of the 2 discordant cases gave positive results. The rK39 dipstick is thus reliable for diagnosis of both HVL and canVL cases in Turkey.Immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in Indian visceral leishmaniasis.Stored sera from 429 Indian subjects were assayed to extend the analysis of the accuracy of immunochromatographic strip-test detection of anti-K39 antibody in the non-invasive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). All 225 samples from patients with proven Leishmania infection tested positive [estimated sensitivity = 100%; 95% confidence interval (CI)=98%-100%]. Sera from 99 of the 100 symptomatic patients with other diseases were non-reactive (estimated specificity = 99%; CI = 94%-100%). However, samples from 13 of the 104 apparently healthy controls showed positive strip-test results (estimated specificity = 88%; CI = 79%-93%), yielding an overall specificity of 93% (190/204; CI = 88%-96%). If applied in a practical clinical setting (on symptomatic patients in whom active VL is suspected and other common infections have been excluded), strip testing of serum for anti-K39 antibody should be both sensitive and specific for diagnosing VL in India.Antigen detection from urine of Kala-azar cases by latex agglutination test.A recently developed Latex agglutination method known as "KATEX" for detecting leishmanial antigen in urine of Kala-azar patients was evaluated on 97 Kala-azar cases and 35 controls in the department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College during the period from March' 2004 to February' 2005. The method yielded sensitivity as 100% and 82.8% in 33 confirmed and 64 ICT positive cases respectively. Since 8.6% controls showed antigen positive results, so specificity of KATEX was calculated as 91.4%. KATEX methods for antigen detection in urine should be used as an early immuno-diagnostic test as it has yielded high sensitivity. But interpretation of a positive test must be made cautiously having correlation with clinical findings as because it becomes false positive in Kala-azar free person. Further elucidation of KATEX method including larger population from community giving particular emphasis on its prognostic use was strongly recommended.Performance of a rapid diagnostic test for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis in a large urban setting.Rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) may improve the early detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), but their real-world performance requires additional study. Therefore, we evaluated the performance of an rK39-based RDT (Kalazar Detect™) for the detection of VL in an endemic, large urban area.Data were collected from a registry of rK39 RDT performed at 11 emergency care units in Belo Horizonte, Brazil, and from a national database of reportable communicable diseases of the Sistema de Informação de Agravos de Notificação (SINAN).The rapid rK39 test was performed in 476 patients, with 114 (23.9%) positive results. The analysis of rK39 RDT performance was based on 381 (80%) cases reported to the SINAN database, of which 145 (38.1%) were confirmed cases. Estimates for sensitivity and specificity were 72.4% (95% CI: 64.6-79%) and 99.6% (95%CI: 97.6-99.9%), respectively. Positive and negative predictive values were estimated at 99.1% (95%CI: 94.9-99.8%) and 85.5% (95%CI: 80.8-89.1%), respectively. In addition, close agreement between the rK39 RDT and indirect immunofluorescence was observed.In summary, the rK39 RDT showed a high specificity but only moderate sensitivity. In endemic areas for VL, treatment may be considered in cases with clinical manifestations and a positive rK39 RDT, but those with a negative test should be subjected to further investigation.Rapid & reliable diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis.Comparison of microscopic examination, rK39, and PCR for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis in Turkey.The laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis is based on microscopic examination, culture, serological tests, and molecular methods. In this study, we examined 50 blood specimens from suspected visceral leishmaniasis patients by microscopic examination, recombinant antigen dipstick test (rK39), and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in the University of Cukurova, Faculty of Medicine, Parasitology Department in Turkey. We calculated the sensitivity-specificity and positive-negative predictive values for these diagnostic tests. We found that positive predictive value of microscopy examination, rK39 dipstick test, and PCR were 20%, 24%, and 58% for visceral leishmaniasis, respectively. When we compared polymerase chain reaction, recombinant antigen dipstick test, and microscopic examination for visceral leishmaniasis diagnosis, the polymerase chain reaction is more sensitive (100%) than recombinant antigen dipstick test and microscopy examination.A comparative study of the effectiveness of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis.We compared the validity of pancytopenia, the formol-gel test (FGT), the indirect fluorescence antibody test (IFAT), the direct agglutination test (DAT), and the rK39 dipstick test as diagnostic criteria for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Nepal. Between September 2000 and January 2002, 310 clinical suspects had a bone marrow aspirate, and if negative, a spleen aspirate smear examined for Leishmania donovani. Sensitivity and specificity of all tests were determined compared with parasitology and by latent class analysis (LCA). Compared with parasitology, the sensitivities of the other tests were as follows: pancytopenia = 16.3% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 11.3-22.5%), FGT = 39.9% (95% CI = 32.7-47.4%), IFAT = 28.4% (95% CI = 22.0-35.5%), DAT = 95.1% (95% CI = 90.8-97.7%), and the rK39 dipstick test = 87.4% (95% CI = 81.7-91.9%). Sensitivity estimates obtained by LCA were similar, but specificity estimates were substantially higher (DAT = 93.7% versus 77.8%; rK39 dipstick test = 93.1% versus 77.0%). The DAT or the rK39 dipstick test can replace parasitology as the basis of a decision to treat VL in Nepalese peripheral health services.Compararative evaluation of rK9, rK26 and rK39 antigens in the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis.This study was designed for comparative evaluation of two relatively newer recombinant hydrophilic antigens, rK9 and rK26 of Leishmania chagasi along with rK39 (a 39-aminoacid-repetitive immunodominant B-cell epitope of kinesin-related antigen from L. chagasi) and crude soluble antigen (CSA) for the serodiagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) patients by quantitative ELISA.In the present study a total of 80 subjects comprising of 55 confirmed VL cases and 25 endemic controls (EC) were subjected to ELISA using four different antigens, namely rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA (derived from Leishmania donovani promastigotes).Sensitivity was as follows: 78% (95%CI 63-100%) for rK9, 38% (95%CI 28-59%) for rK26, 100% for rK39, and 80% (95% CI 65-100%) for CSA. The specificity of rK9, rK26, rK39 and CSA was found to be 84% (95%CI 61-100%), 80% (95%CI 56-100%), 96% (95%CI 75-100%) and 72% (95%CI 49-100%), respectively.rK39 was observed to be the most suitable antigen as compared to rK26 and rK9 whereas rK9 performed better than rK26. Hence rK9 antigen may either be used as an adjunct to rK39 for accurate diagnosis of VL or may be used in the absence or non-availability of rK39 antigen for the serodiagnosis.Prospective evaluation and comparison of the direct agglutination test and an rK39-antigen-based dipstick test for the diagnosis of suspected kala-azar in Nepal.The diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) remains difficult in rural endemic areas and practical and reliable tests are badly needed. Two serological tests, the Direct Agglutination Test (DAT) and an rK39-antigen-based dipstick test, were compared to parasitological diagnosis in a group of 184 patients presenting at a tertiary care centre in south-eastern Nepal with a history of fever > or = 14 days and splenomegaly; 139 patients had a parasitologically proven kala-azar and 45 patients had a negative parasitological work-up. The rK39 dipstick showed a sensitivity of 97% and a specificity of 71%. The DAT was up to 99% sensitive with a low cut-off titre (1:400) but its specificity did not exceed 82% even with a high cut-off titre (1:51 200). Both tests could be used for screening suspect patients in endemic areas. However, their use as confirmatory tests should be restricted to situations where the proportion of kala-azar among clinical suspect patients is high. The rK39 dipstick is cheaper and easier to use than the DAT and could be used widely provided that both its performance and production remain stable.Sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of immunochromatographic strip test in diagnosis of childhood kala-azar.In Bangladesh, the total population at risk for kala-azar exceeds 20 million (18%) living in 88 Thana (19%) of 27 districts (42%). A confirmatory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) is done by demonstration of the parasite (LD body) in organ aspirates or tissue biopsy sample, an invasive procedure with relatively low sensitivity. To assess the diagnostic usefulness of ICT for antibody against the leishmanial antigen rK39 & its feasibility for use under field conditions (rural areas). An experimental study conducted during January, 2003 to July, 2003 in pediatrics department of MMCH including 60 confirmedly diagnosed KA cases & 60 controls having diseases other than KA. One drop of peripheral blood is applied to the nitrocellulose strip & 3 drops of test buffer is added to the dried blood. Observing 2 visible bands indicates presence of IgG anti-K39. The rK39 strip test was positive in 57 out of 60 confirmed KA case diagnosed by LD body demonstration in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The estimated sensitivity was 95%. One control diagnosed as other than KA had positive strip test but negative aspirate smear. The estimated specificity of the strip test was 98.3%. The predictive value of a positive result is 98.3% & that of a negative result is 93.5%. rK39 strip test is highly sensitive & specific in our situation & it can be used as a simple & the best method for diagnosis of KA in rural areas.Evaluation of direct agglutination test, rk39 Test, and ELISA for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The study reports an evaluation of the direct agglutination test (DAT) with use of promastigote/amastigote antigen, rk39 strip test, and ELISA for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Out of 94 clinically suspected VL patients, 16 (17%) were seropositive by all the techniques; in addition, 6 were positive in rk39 strip test and ELISA. On retrospective analysis, out of 16 positive by all the techniques, 11 (69%) had demonstrable Leishmania donovani (LD) bodies in their bone marrow samples, while in 5 bone marrow was not examined. Out of 6 that were positive by ELISA and rk39 strip test, 2 had myelofibrosis and 4 had chronic myeloid leukemia. On the basis of bone marrow aspirate positivity, the sensitivity and specificity of DAT were 100% while those of rk39 strip test and ELISA were 100% and 87%, respectively. The study suggests that DAT appears to be the best technique for the serodiagnosis of VL.Validation of two rapid diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in Kenya.Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is a systemic parasitic disease that is fatal unless treated. In Kenya, national VL guidelines rely on microscopic examination of spleen aspirate to confirm diagnosis. As this procedure is invasive, it cannot be safely implemented in peripheral health structures, where non-invasive, accurate, easy to use diagnostic tests are needed.We evaluated the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values of two rapid diagnostic tests (RDT), DiaMed IT LEISH and Signal-KA, among consecutive patients with clinical suspicion of VL in two treatment centres located in Baringo and North Pokot District, Rift Valley province, Kenya. Microscopic examination of spleen aspirate was the reference diagnostic standard. Patients were prospectively recruited between May 2010 and July 2011.Of 251 eligible patients, 219 patients were analyzed, including 131 VL and 88 non-VL patients. The median age of VL patients was 16 years with predominance of males (66%). None of the tested VL patients were co-infected with HIV. Sensitivity and specificity of the DiaMed IT LEISH were 89.3% (95%CI: 82.7-94%) and 89.8% (95%CI: 81.5-95.2%), respectively. The Signal KA showed trends towards lower sensitivity (77.1%; 95%CI: 68.9-84%) and higher specificity (95.5%; 95%CI: 88.7-98.7%). Combining the tests did not improve the overall diagnostic performance, as all patients with a positive Signal KA were also positive with the DiaMed IT LEISH.The DiaMed IT LEISH can be used to diagnose VL in Kenyan peripheral health facilities where microscopic examination of spleen aspirate or sophisticated serological techniques are not feasible. There is a crucial need for an improved RDT for VL diagnosis in East Africa.Sensitivity and specificity of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test has become available for the qualitative detection of total anti-Leishmania immunoglobulins using the recombinant K39 antigen. To evaluate the test, 96 serum specimens from patients with a variety of tropical infections were tested. Fourteen of the specimens derived from patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar, and all were strongly positive for antibodies to Leishmania donovani complex using the immunofluorescence test. Although all 82 samples negative by the immunofluorescence test were confirmed as negative by the dipstick assay, only 10 (71.4%) of the 14 positive samples were reactive. These results indicate that the test in its current form lacks sufficient sensitivity to be recommended as a screening tool, but it might be useful for indicating further diagnostic procedures in a clinical setting.Standardization of the dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA) for human visceral leishmaniasis.The Dot-ELISA, a rapid, visually read micro enzyme immunoassay for visceral leishmaniasis utilizing minute volumes of antigen "dotted" on nitrocellulose filter discs and precipitable chromogenic substrate, was analyzed under a variety of experimental parameters. Raising assay incubation temperatures from 23 degrees C to 28 degrees C resulted in titer increases in three of five leishmaniasis patient sera; at 37 degrees C, all five patient sera and one of five normal human sera showed titer increases. The amount of antigen used could be reduced 50% by incubating patient serum overnight at 4 degrees C. Antigen discs stored at - 20 degrees C were optimally reactive with leishmaniasis sera over a 270-day period. Antigen discs stored at 4 degrees C and 23 degrees C showed reproducible titer decreases at 90 days. Aging either peroxidase-conjugated antibody or substrate for up to 28 days at 4 degrees C did not adversely affect titers of positive and negative control sera and reagent controls. Activated substrate stored at 23 degrees C was optimally reactive in the assay for at least 24 hours. No changes in titers of positive and negative control sera or nonspecific reactions in reagent controls occurred when using different brands of microtiter plates. The long shelf lives and stabilities of Dot-ELISA antigen and reagents indicate this test should prove useful both in the laboratory and in the field.Value of a dipstick based on recombinant RK39 antigen for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis from other sympatric endemic diseases in Venezuela.A laboratory trial using recombinant rK39 dipsticks for differential diagnosis of American visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) from other sympatric endemic diseases which share similar clinic features (Chagas disease, malaria, schistosomiasis and toxoplasmosis) was conducted in Venezuela. The 100% specificity of the test previously obtained in other countries was confirmed. The use of this test at the primary health care level in Venezuela for a rapid diagnosis of active AVL cases, which may avoid deaths, is recommended.Potential non-invasive urine-based antigen (protein) detection assay to diagnose active visceral leishmaniasis.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bihar India: comparison of the rK39 rapid diagnostic test on whole blood versus serum.Antibody-detecting rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) against rK39 are available to aid in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Although these rK39 RDTs have been developed, validated and approved for use with serum, they are universally performed using whole blood. It was therefore necessary to determine whether this RDT is as sensitive on whole blood as on serum.In this study we compared the rK39 RDT on serum and blood samples from 624 individuals with symptoms of VL attending the outpatient clinic at the Rajendra Memorial Research Institute of Medical Sciences, Patna, India. A total of 251 cases (40%) were both serum and blood-positive and 26 cases (4%) were identified as blood-negative and serum-positive. These 26 individuals in general had low titer antibodies against rK39 as determined by ELISA and follow-up on most of these individuals revealed none had persistent VL symptoms. The Cohen kappa index comparing blood and serum was 0.88 indicating excellent concordance.Although the concordance was excellent, it is possible to miss rK39 positive individuals when using blood and the titer of anti-rK39 antibodies is low. We recommend that when an individual from an endemic area has obvious clinical symptoms of VL and the whole blood rK39 RDT is negative, that the test should be redone 2-3 weeks later if the symptoms persist.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The purpose of this study was to compare the performance of a rapid immunochromatographic dipstick test for the qualitative detection of circulating antibodies to the leishmanial recombinant antigen K39 with that of a classical immunofluorescent antibody test for serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Sera from 143 Italian subjects, including 69 patients with clinically suspected visceral leishmaniasis, 23 patients with hypergammaglobulinemia and 51 healthy controls, were tested. The immunochromatographic test was performed according to the manufacturer's instructions, using antigen-impregnated nitrocellulose paper strips. The immunofluorescent antibody test was performed according to an established method, using promastigotes of Leishmania infantum zymodeme Montpellier 1 as antigen. In 11 patients, diagnosis of active Leishmania infection was established by microscopic examination of biopsy samples and/or clinical response to meglumine antimoniate. Results of the two tests correlated for all but two sera examined. In two patients, one with proven infectious mononucleosis and one with bacterial pneumonia, the immunofluorescent antibody test was positive and the dipstick test was negative. In the restricted sample of patients in whom a definitive diagnosis was established, the immunochromatographic test was positive in 11 of 11 patients with confirmed Leishmania infection and negative in 103 of 103 subjects who either had other documented diseases or were healthy controls, showing 100% sensitivity and 100% specificity.Field evaluation of a fast anti-Leishmania antibody detection assay in Ethiopia.A fast agglutination screening test (FAST) for the detection of Leishmania antibodies in human serum samples was evaluated under harsh field conditions in northern Ethiopia. Test performance was compared with a standard serological test, namely the direct agglutination test (DAT), and with parasitology. In total, 103 suspected cases were recruited for the study. Based on parasitological examination, 49 patients were confirmed of having visceral leishmaniasis (VL) and the other 54 suspected cases were parasitologically negative. Field evaluation of FAST was possible in blood samples of 89 patients. FAST had 4 false negative results and 13 false positive results. DAT had 2 false negative results and 20 false positive results. A good degree of agreement (86.9%) was observed between FAST and DAT (kappa value 0.73). In this field-based evalauation, the sensitivity and specificity of FAST were found to be 91.1% (95% CI 77.9-97.1) and 70.5% (95% CI 54.6-82.8), respectively, compared with 95.3% (95% CI 82.9-99.2) and 62.3% (95% CI 47.9-74.9) for DAT. FAST had a high predictive value of a negative test, demonstrating that FAST could be utilised to exclude rapidly non-VL patients from a large population of suspects with fever and splenomegaly in endemic areas.Noninvasive management of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: clinical application of diagnosis by K39 antigen strip testing at a kala-azar referral unit.Firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) requires organ aspiration and microscopic examination of tissue specimens. To determine the usefulness of noninvasive diagnosis by strip test detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin (Ig) G antibody in blood specimens obtained by fingerstick, 143 Indian patients with suspected kala-azar (fever, splenomegaly, anemia) were studied. Of 120 strip test-positive subjects (subjects with presumed kala-azar [group A]), amphotericin B treatment induced clinical cure in 119. Of 23 strip test-negative subjects (subjects presumed to have other diseases [group B]), 16 had other disorders diagnosed at entry, 4 responded to empiric antimalarial therapy, 2 were proven to have kala-azar, and 1 died elsewhere after undergoing splenic aspiration. Six months after treatment ended, all 120 patients in group A and the 18 assessable patients in group B were healthy. In a region in India where visceral infection is prevalent, strip test detection of anti-K39 IgG is a clinically promising diagnostic guide in persons with suspected kala-azar.Detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis by a latex agglutination test.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually done by demonstration of parasites in tissue smears. However, obtaining these smears may be risky, painful, and difficult. Antibody-based diagnostics are limited by their inability to predict active disease. In this study, a new latex agglutination test (KAtex), which detects parasite antigen in freshly voided and boiled urine, was evaluated in patients with VL before the start (n = 382) and at the end of treatment (n = 273); 185 healthy controls from leishmaniasis-endemic region were also studied. The KAtex result was positive in 87% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 83.3-90.3). However, at the end of treatment only 3% (95% CI = 1.6-6.2) patients were positive. The specificity of the test was 99% and 2 of 185 healthy controls tested positive. Positive and negative predictive values were 0.994 and 0.788, respectively. KAtex is a promising test, and in a simplified and improved format it could be applied meaningfully in the diagnosis of VL.The latex agglutination test: standardization and comparison with direct agglutination and dot-ELISA in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in India.Laboratory diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is usually based on the detection of Leishmania amastigotes in samples of bone marrow or splenic aspirate obtained by invasive procedures. Serological tests serve as a useful adjunct and are especially valuable in early or highly immune cases where amastigotes may be too scanty to be seen easily. The direct agglutination test (DAT) is generally considered the most suitable of the four types of tests currently employed (IFAT, counter immuno-electrophoresis, ELISA and DAT). However, the latex agglutination test (LAT) was recently reported to be a rapid and sensitive screening tool for VL and one which could be carried out at the patient's bedside. Further standardization and evaluation of LAT has now revealed that although it is comparable with DAT and dot-ELISA in terms of sensitivity it is far inferior because of cross-reactivity with other infections. This lack of specificity makes LAT unsuitable for routine diagnosis of VL even though it is rapid and sensitive. DAT still appears to be the best choice as a diagnostic tool, as it is very specific and does not require expensive equipment or reagents or much technical competence and the result can be visually interpreted. These merits make DAT very suitable for the diagnosis of VL in endemic areas of India.[Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum. Update on the utility of the IT-Leish and ID-Pagia leishmaniasis tests].The purpose of this article is to update information about Mediterranean leishmaniasis caused by Leishmania infantum in man and about the canine reservoir. Special emphasis is placed on laboratory diagnosis tests for Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis (MVL) in humans. In addition two rapid diagnostic tests for human leishmaniasis are compared based on indirect immunofluorescence and Western blot. Findings show that the overall sensitivity of the two tests in immunocompetent and immunodepressed patients ranged from 54% to 97%, a specificity of 97%, with positive predictive value ranging from 75% to 97% and a negative predictive value of around 95%. For diagnosis of cutaneous leishmaniasis, positivity of these tests in one case out of 2 underscores the predictive value of a positive test.Rapid screening with a recombinant antigen (rK39) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis using dipstick.To evaluate the diagnostic value of the recombinant antigen of 39 amino acid repeats encoded by a kinesin-like gene of Leishmania changasi (rK39) in serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL).In Kashi, Xinjiang, 13 VL patients with splenomegaly and bone marrow aspirate culture positive were subjected to dipstick assay. A drop of whole blood or serum from patient was placed at the absorbing pad at the bottom of the dipstick. Flooding of the bottom protein with buffer allows serum proteins to migrate upwards, producing the positive band and Western blot analysis of rK39 subsequently performed with the sera collected.The end-point titers of anti-rK39 antibodies of these sera were determined by ELISA and found to fall within the range of 10(-2) to 10(-4), which were consistent with the intensity of their reaction with rK39 in dipstick assay. The positive sera could also recognize the specific rK39 band as analyzed by Western blot analysis.The rK39 dipstick assay is more rapid, specific, sensitive and less invasive than the conventional methods of diagnosis for VL in the areas of low endemicity.Testing urine samples with rK39 strip as the simplest non-invasive field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis: an early report from eastern India.Diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is a major obstacle in the control of this disease. The rK39 strip-test using patient's blood is a breakthrough; however, it still requires a blood sample, which is a concern for safety in the field. We tried to simplify the test using the patient's urine instead of blood.To observe the sensitivity and specificity of the urine test in comparison with the blood test.We tested active and post-treatment VL patients, Post Kala azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL), VL/HIV and control subjects (healthy, disease suspects and diseased other than VL) with the rK39 strip-test using blood and urine samples.The level of agreement between the urine and blood testing was calculated by inter-rater agreement (kappa) statistics.Forty-two active VL, 40 treated VL, six PKDL, three VL/HIV and 139 controls (54 healthy, 21 disease suspects and 64 diseased other than VL) were tested. All VL-related cases showed positive results with urine as well as blood samples (100%). The urine testing was found to have 100% sensitivity and 86.33% specificity for the diagnosis of VL. Kappa statistic between the two methods was 0.916 (P<0.001). Urine testing had more false-positive results in comparison with blood testing (13.67% vs. 9.45%), but the test subjects were from VL-endemic areas and they might be exposed to Leishmania donovani infection.The present study has the potentiality of providing a new, yet simplest non-invasive screening tool for VL in remote rural areas.Diagnostic accuracy of two rK39 antigen-based dipsticks and the formol gel test for rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in northeastern Uganda.The development of an accurate, practical, and affordable diagnostic test is essential to improve the management of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in remote health centers. We evaluated the Formol Gel test (FGT) and two rK39 antigen-based dipsticks, the DUAL-IT L/M, and the Kalazar Detect for VL diagnosis in Amudat Hospital in Uganda. The DUAL-IT L/M was also evaluated for the diagnosis of malaria. All patients clinically suspect of VL were prospectively included in the study between October 2003 and March 2004. The gold standard used to define a VL case was a positive spleen aspirate or a direct agglutination test titer of >1:12,800 with an appropriate clinical response to antileishmanial therapy. A total of 131 VL and 112 non-VL patients were included in the analysis. The DUAL IT L/M was found to be more sensitive than the Kalazar Detect: 97% (95% confidence interval [95%CI] = 92 to 99%) versus 82% (95%CI = 74 to 87%). The Kalazar Detect and the DUAL IT L/M were highly specific (99% [95%CI = 95 to 100%] and 97% [95%CI = 92 to 99%], respectively). The FGT lacked both sensitivity (66% [95%CI = 57 to 73%]) and specificity (90% [95%CI = 83 to 94%]). The sensitivity of the DUAL IT L/M for malaria was only 57% (95%CI = 37 to 76%). The two rK39 dipsticks can be used for diagnostic confirmation of VL in this region. The DUAL-IT L/M without its malaria diagnostic component (DiaMed-IT LEISH) will be adopted as first-line test for VL in Uganda.[Investigation of Leishmania infantum seropositivity in HIV/AIDS patients].In recent years an increase in the rate of detection of HIV and Leishmania co-infections has been reported from many countries especially countries in Southern Europe. Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is sporadically detected in some parts of Turkey. Although the natural transmission is via sandfly bites, VL may be transmitted by needle sharing of intravenous drug addicts or by blood transfusion in HIV/AIDS patients. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence of specific antibodies against Leishmania infantum, which is the causative agent of VL, in the sera of HIV/AIDS patients. A total of 79 HIV/AIDS patients (61 male, 18 female; mean age: 30 +/- 2 years) with confirmed diagnosis by HIV Reference Laboratory of Refik Saydam Hygiene Center between the years of 2004-2006, were included in the study. L. infantum antibodies were searched by fast agglutination screening test (FAST), direct agglutination test (DAT), indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) and rK39 dipstick assay. Only one serum sample (1.2%) was found to be seropositive by all of the serological tests (> 1/100 by FAST, 1/3200 by DAT, 1/256 by IFAT, and specific bands for L. infantum by rK39 dipstick test), while the remaining samples were negative with all of the methods. The seropositive serum was from a 49 years-old heterosexual male, living on the Mediterranean cost and has had acquired the HIV infection by sexual contact. He has no history of intravenous drug use but he had experienced blood transfusion. Since the seropositive serum sample was collected 2-3 weeks after the transfusion, the transmission of L. infantum was thought to be during blood transfusion, however it could also be acquired via a previous sandfly bite. In conclusion although the rate of L. infantum seropositivity was low in HIV/AIDS patients in our study, the possibility of HIV/Leishmania co-infections should be considered.Evaluation of latex agglutination test (KAtex) for early diagnosis of kala-azar.Kala-azar is one of the major public health problem in Bangladesh. But the diagnosis of the problem often is difficult, unusual and time consuming, a simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, reliable and rapid diagnostic test has been a long-felt need of the clinicians. Therefore, the present study was conducted to see the sensitivity and specificity of Latex Agglutination test (KAtex) to detect leishmanial antigen from urine of kala-azar cases. The study was carried out in the department of Paediatrics, Mymensingh Medical College and Hospital, Bangladesh during July to December, 2008. A total of 100 urine samples were collected of which 50 were confirmed kala-azar cases and 50 were age and sex matched controls. Out of 50 kala-azar cases 47 showed positive result of KAtex. The test was also positive in 01 out of 30 healthy controls. None of the febrile controls was positive by KAtex. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the test using presence of LD bodies in splenic and/or bone marrow aspirate as gold standard were 94%, 98%, 97.91% and 94.23% respectively. KAtex is simple, noninvasive, easy to perform, rapid and reliable test for diagnosing kala-azar in endemic area and useful for small, less equipped laboratories as well as for the laboratories with better facilities.Rapid accurate field diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis.A firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) requires demonstration of the parasite in organ aspirates or tissue biopsy samples. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the diagnostic usefulness of non-invasive testing for antibody to the leishmanial antigen K39 by means of antigen-impregnated nitrocellulose paper strips adapted for use under field conditions.One drop of peripheral blood is applied to the hitrocellulose strip. Three drops of test buffer (phosphate-buffered saline plus bovine serum albumin) are added to the dried blood. The development of two visible bands indicates presence of IgG anti-K39. 323 consecutive patients with suspected kala-azar referred to two specialist units in India, and 25 healthy controls, provided fingerstick blood samples for the test. Spleen aspirates were taken from 250 patients.Kala-azar was confirmed by microscopy of spleen-aspirate smears in 127 patients. The K39 strip test was positive in all 127; the estimated sensitivity was therefore 100% (95% CI 98-100). Four patients had positive strip tests but negative aspirate smears; all four responded to treatment for leishmaniasis. 217 individuals, including the 25 healthy controls, 73 patients with malaria or tuberculosis, and 119 spleen-aspirate-negative patients who had presumed malaria or cirrhosis (79) or no final diagnosis (40), had negative strip-test results. None of the 119 aspirate-negative patients developed evidence of kala-azar during 3-6 months of follow-up. The estimated specificity of the strip test was 98% (95-100; 217/221).Detection of anti-K39 by immunochromatographic strip testing is a rapid and non-invasive method of diagnosing kala-azar, which has good sensitivity and specificity and is well suited for use in field conditions.Diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis with the recombinant K39 strip test: experience from the Sudan.We compared a strip test employing recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen and protein A/colloidal gold as read-out agents with the rK39 ELISA for IgM and IgG antibodies and the direct agglutination test (DAT) using 55 sera from patients with parasitologically confirmed visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The rK39 strip test was positive in 37/55 (67%), the DAT in 50/55 (91%) at > or = 1 : 1600 cut-off value and in 47/55 (85%) at > or = 1 : 6400 cut-off value. The rK39-ELISA gave positive IgG results for all sera; those who had a positive strip test had significantly higher IgG levels than those with a negative strip test (31.1 (SD=3.6) and 17.7 U/ml (SD=9.8), respectively, P < 0.0001). A total of 31/55 (56%) sera showed a positive IgM result; of these 27 (49%) had a positive strip test. We tested 115 apparently cured VL patients with the strip test during follow-up; 68 were also tested with DAT. In the strip test, 25-43% of patients had a positive result at time points 3, 6, 9 and 12 months after treatment; for DAT (cut-off > or = 1 : 1600) these results were 67-83%. In neither test did a significant decrease in positivity rates occur over time (P=0.37 for the strip test, P=0.17 for the DAT). No correlation (P=0.33) was found between a positive strip test and a positive DAT result (cut-off > or = 1: 1600), indicating that the strip test and DAT are complementary rather than interchangeable. Of 61 endemic controls two (3%) had a positive strip test result; both had a positive leishmanin skin test. The rK39 strip test has the ideal format for use in the field, but its sensitivity is limited; like DAT, but to a lesser extent, it remains positive after treatment.Rapid immunochromatographic strip test for detection of anti-K39 immunoglobulin G antibodies for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.InBios International has developed an immunochromatographic rapid strip for the detection of visceral leishmaniasis that requires minimal equipment and only a small amount of blood to run a test. We compared the InBios rapid strip test with the CDC immunofluorescent antibody assay, and the agreement, sensitivity, and specificity were 98%, 90%, and 100%, respectively.Latex agglutination test for the detection of urinary antigens in visceral leishmaniasis.This paper describes a new latex agglutination test ('KATEX') for the detection of leishmanial antigen in the urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. In preliminary laboratory trials, using urine collected from well-defined cases and controls from Brazil, Yemen and Nepal, the test had 100% specificity and a sensitivity between 68 and 100%. When used in a time-course experiment in cotton rats infected with Leishmania donovani, the test became positive 1 week after inoculation and antigen levels in urine declined rapidly after chemotherapy (the test was negative before the end of the course of treatment). Finally, in an integrated study performed in Sudan, KATEX was compared to microscopy and four different serological tests in a group of 73 patients having presented with clinical manifestations suggestive of visceral leishmaniasis. Compared to microscopy, KATEX performed better than any single serological test in predicting positivity and a particularly good result was obtained by combining KATEX and the direct agglutination test (DAT).Dot-ELISA using monoclonal antibodies for identification of Leishmania donovani.Evaluation of the direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.The direct agglutination test (DAT) based on a freeze-dried antigen and the rK39 dipstick test were evaluated for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL). The sensitivity and specificity of both tests were determined using sera from confirmed VL patients (n = 21), healthy controls (n = 19) and from patients with other confirmed infectious diseases (n = 42). The DAT had a sensitivity and a specificity of 100%. The rK39 had a sensitivity of 85.7% and a specificity of 82%. Both tests were also used to screen blood samples of confirmed VL patients (n = 15) and serum samples of VL suspects (n = 61). The DAT found all blood samples of confirmed VL patients positive and tested 98.4% of the serum samples of the VL suspects positive. In contrast, rK39 detected in 9/15 blood samples (60%) antibodies against Leishmania chagasi and found 85.3% of the serum samples of the suspected patients positive. Although the rK39 dipstick is more rapid and user friendlier than the DAT, the latter has a superior sensitivity and specificity. Furthermore, the reagents used for DAT do not require cold storage, whereas the buffer of the rK39 must be stored at 4oC. Therefore, the DAT is the most suitable test for the sero-diagnosis of VL under field conditions.Comparison of new diagnostic tools for management of pediatric Mediterranean visceral leishmaniasis.New techniques are available for diagnosing leishmaniasis, but their efficacy in the identification of pediatric visceral leishmaniasis (VL) has not been compared with that of traditional methods. Blood, bone marrow, and urine samples were taken from 25 children with VL during their first clinical episode, 22 days after the start of treatment with liposomal amphotericin B (3 mg/kg/day on 6 days over a 10-day period), and when a relapse was suspected during follow-up. The results obtained suggest that antibody detection techniques, the antigen detection in urine (KAtex kit), and Leishmania nested PCR (LnPCR) analysis of the blood could be used for diagnosis of the first clinical episode. After treatment, clinical improvement was associated with negativization of Novy-MacNeal-Nicolle culture and microscopy of bone marrow aspirate, KAtex test, and LnPCR blood analysis results. Interestingly, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow aspirate showed that sterile cure was not achieved in eight patients, two of which suffered a relapse within 10 to 20 weeks. All of the new noninvasive techniques tested showed high diagnostic sensitivity. However, LnPCR analysis of the bone marrow was the most sensitive; this test was able to detect the persistence of parasites and predict potential relapses.Easy test for visceral Leishmaniasis and post-Kala-azar Dermal Leishmaniasis.Performance of recombinant K39 antigen in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis.This study evaluated the performance of recombinant K39 (rK39) antigen in a immunochromatographic format (strip test) and a crude antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in the diagnosis of Brazilian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in 128 consecutive patients with parasitologically proven infections (by microscopy and/or culture). For each patient, a medical history was obtained and a complete physical examination was performed. Controls included 10 healthy volunteers and 50 patients with other diseases: malaria (10), leprosy (9), Chagas' disease (10), tuberculosis (10), and cutaneous leishmaniasis (11). The sensitivities of the rK39 antigen strip test and the ELISA were 90% and 89%, respectively, while the specificities were 100% and 98%, respectively. Our study confirms the accuracy of the rK39 antigen strip test in the diagnosis of VL in a high prevalence population.Improvement of the newly developed latex agglutination test (Katex) for diagnosis of visceral lieshmaniasis.Different methods are available for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL), among them the urine-based antigen detection assay, latex agglutination test (Katex), is a recently developed one. The main drawback of the test is false-positive reactivity in some of healthy individuals. The false positivity of the test can be removed by boiling the urine sample for 5 min before testing. In this study an attempt was made to improve Katex by removing unpleasant boiling process, which also decreases field applicability of the test.False-positive and true-positive urine samples were collected from VL patients and healthy individuals. Both samples were then treated by reagents including, sodium dodecyl sulfate, trichloroacetic acid, dithiothreitol (DTT), sulphosalicylic acid and also heating at 56 degrees C.Findings of this study showed that DTT pretreatment significantly reduced the rate of false-positive reactivity of Katex where 73% of false-positive urine samples changed to negative after DTT treatment. However, the DTT treatment reduced the rate of true positivity by 14%.These data indicate that DTT can be used to eliminate nonspecific reactivity in the Katex. This will improve the performance of Katex and make it a more convenient and field applicable test.Diagnosis of Indian kala-azar by dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (dot-ELISA).Serodiagnosis of kala-azar was determined by dot-ELISA under variable conditions such as may be encountered in the field, for example, in the nature of the antigen, the preservation of antigen at different temperatures, variation in incubation temperature and so on. The test was found to be useful under field conditions, and the correlation between ELISA and dot-ELISA was significant. Dot-ELISA has definite advantages over the ELISA test, as it is easy to perform, is stable and does not require expensive equipment. The test can be used for large-scale screening of sera in sero-epidemiological studies.In search of an ideal test for diagnosis and prognosis of kala-azar.The latex agglutination test (KAtex), direct agglutination test (DAT), and the rK39 immuno-chromatographic strip test (dipstick test) were evaluated for their role in the diagnosis and prognosis of visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar) in India. Sera and urine samples from 455 subjects--150 confirmed visceral leishmaniasis cases, 160 endemic controls, 100 non-endemic controls, and 45 other febrile diseases--were included in the study. The sensitivity of the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test was 87% [95% confidence interval (CI) 80-96], 93.3% (95% CI 88-100), and 98% (95% CI 93-100) respectively. The specificity of these tests was 98% (95% CI 93-100), 93% (95% CI 87-100), and 89% (95% CI 82-97) for the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test respectively. Fifty cases were followed up and subjected to the KAtex, DAT, and rK39 strip test after 30 days of successful treatment. The DAT and rK39 strip test showed positive results in all the 50 cases whereas the KAtex showed no positive reaction in any case. Based on the results, it is concluded that the sensitivity and specificity of the DAT and rK39 strip test are comparable but the greater convenience of use of the strip test makes it a better tool for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in the peripheral areas of endemic regions whereas the sensitivity of the KAtex needs to be improved to promote its use as a first-line diagnostic test in the field-setting. It may be used for the prognosis of the disease as antigen becomes undetectable in urine after 30 days of the completion of the treatment. Alternatively, it can be used as an adjunct with rK39 for sero-epidemiological surveys.Evaluation of a urinary antigen-based latex agglutination test in the diagnosis of kala-azar in eastern Nepal.We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy as well as the reproducibility of the urine latex agglutination test 'KAtex' in the diagnosis of kala-azar in patients recruited at a tertiary care centre in Dharan, Nepal, between November 2000 and January 2002.All patients presenting with fever of 2 weeks or more and splenomegaly were consecutively enrolled. Bone marrow and--if negative--spleen aspirates were examined for Leishmania donovani. Serum and urine samples were taken in duplicate for the Direct Agglutination Test (DAT) and KAtex. The reference laboratory determined sensitivity and specificity of KAtex. Reproducibility between both laboratories was assessed.KAtex was performed on urine from 155 parasitologically confirmed kala-azar and 77 non-kala-azar cases (parasitology and DAT-negative). KAtex showed a sensitivity of 47.7% (74/155, 95% CI: 39.7-55.9) and a specificity of 98.7% (76/77, 95% CI: 93.0-100.0). Reproducibility of KAtex showed a kappa of 0.684 (P < 0.001, n = 232).KAtex evaluation showed high specificity, low sensitivity and moderate reproducibility. A urine test for kala-azar could become a real breakthrough in kala-azar management if its reproducibility and sensitivity could be further improved.K39 strip test--easy, reliable and cost-effective field diagnosis for visceral leishmaniasis in India.A firm diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires demonstration of the parasite in splenic or bone marrow aspirate. The aim of this prospective study was to assess the usefulness of K39 strip test as a noninvasive method of diagnosing visceral leishmaniasis under field conditions by testing serum antibody to the leishmanial antigen K39.One drop of serum/blood was applied to the sample application pad on the test strip, which was diluted with 2 drops of chase buffer solution. The development of two visible red lines indicates the presence of IgG anti-K39. In the first phase of the study (2001), a total of 200 patients (Active VL-70, ex-VL-30, healthy endemic control-20 and patients with other tropical diseases-80) were tested with the K39 strip test at the School of Tropical Medicine, Kolkata. In the second phase of the study (2002), the test was applied in a remote tribal area of West Bengal where an epidemic of VL had occurred. Thirty-two patients were identified in 207 villagers of the affected area; all of them were tested with the K39 strip test.In the first phase, all VL and ex-VL cases gave positive results (100%). Ten percent of the healthy endemic controls were positive. The test results were negative in all other prevalent tropical diseases (100%). The estimated sensitivity of the test was 100% and the specificity was 98.18%. In the second phase of the study, all 32 patients of the epidemic were shown to be positive. All patients were treated with sodium stibogluconate injections and they recovered uneventfully.K39 strip test is ideal for rapid reliable field diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. The test has high sensitivity and specificity but it remains positive long after treatment (up to 3 years).[Katex for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis].Katex is a latex agglutination test allowing highly specific detection Leishmania antigen in urine of patients with visceral leishmaniasis. A multicentric study of this new diagnostic tool which is also effective in patients co-infected by leishmaniasis and HIV is currently in progress in Sudan, India, Nepal, Brazil and Spain. The authors describe the utility of this technique in comparison with other routine diagnostic procedures such as microscopic examination and serological tests. Preliminary results suggest that it could be used to confirm infection in the field and to monitor treatment efficacy.Evaluation of two rK39 dipstick tests, direct agglutination test, and indirect fluorescent antibody test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in a new epidemic site in highland Ethiopia.We assessed the performance characteristics of two rK39 immunochromatographic tests, a direct agglutination test (DAT), and an indirect immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT) in the site of a new epidemic of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in northwestern Ethiopia. The study population was composed of 179 patients with suspected VL and 67 controls. The sensitivities of Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT in 35 polymerase chain reaction-confirmed VL cases were 94.3%, 91.4%, 91.4%, and 100%, respectively, and the specificities were 98.5%, 94%, 98.5%, and 98.5%, respectively. In a Bayesian latent class analysis of all 246 specimens, the estimated sensitivities were 90.5%, 89%, 88.8%, and 96% for Kalazar Detect(®), DiaMed-IT Leish(®), DAT, and IFAT, respectively; DAT showed the highest estimated specificity (97.4%). Both rK39 immunochromatographic tests perform as well as DAT, and are suitable for VL diagnosis in first-level health centers in this area of Ethiopia.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): comparison with standard ELISA and complement fixation assays for the diagnosis of human visceral leishmaniasis.The dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA), standard ELISA and the complement fixation (CF) tests were compared in the serodiagnosis of African visceral leishmaniasis (kala-azar). Assay sensitivity was determined using sera from 44 patients with parasitologically confirmed kala-azar. Using the Dot-ELISA, 42 of 44 patients (95%) were positive at a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 32 (titer range 512-524 288). In the standard ELISA technique, 43 of 44 patients (98%) were positive (titer range 32-32 768). At a reciprocal titer of greater than or equal to 8 in the CF test, 35 patients (80%) were positive, 1 (2%) was negative and 8 patients (18%) showed anticomplementary (AC) activity (titer range 8-2048). Specificity, determined using 33 sera from healthy individuals not living in endemic areas, was 97% in both the Dot-ELISA and the standard ELISA (32 of 33 sera); in he CF test, all sera were negative except 1 (3%) which showed AC activity. Sera from patients with Chagas' disease cross-reacted in the dot-ELISA up to a titer of 512. In the standard ELISA, cross-reactions occurred mainly using sera from patients with Chagas' disease, malaria and syphilis, and to a lesser extent with sera from amebiasis, schistosomiasis and trichinosis patients. Overall titer agreement in replicate experiments was highest in the Dot-ELISA (89%), followed by the standard ELISA (80%) and the CF test (72%).Multi-centric prospective evaluation of rk39 rapid test and direct agglutination test for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.The diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is still a major problem in Brazil and several other countries where the disease is endemic. The use of an easy-to-use and interpret, sensitive, and specific method that requires no complex infrastructure or specialized professionals, such as direct agglutination test (DAT) and the rK39-based rapid immunochromatographic test may enhance the diagnosis of disease. This study evaluated the performance of a rapid test (DiaMed- IT-LEISH®) and the DAT for the diagnosis of VL in 213 parasitologically confirmed cases and 119 controls with clinical suspicion of VL and confirmation of another etiology. The sensitivities and specificities of the rapid test were 93% and 97%, respectively and those of the DAT were 90% and 96%, respectively. The positive predictive values of the rapid test and the DAT were 98% and 97%, respectively and the negative predictive values were 89% and 84%, respectively. The Kappa index showed agreement between both methods classified as substantial (0.77). This study showed that the DAT and the rapid test can be used to diagnose VL in Brazil, following a pilot study for implementation of the rapid test in the health services.Use of the recombinant K39 dipstick test and the direct agglutination test in a setting endemic for visceral leishmaniasis in Nepal.We evaluated the field use of two serologic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), the direct agglutination test (DAT) and rK39 dipstick test, in the context of a case-control study. Most VL cases in Nepal are currently diagnosed on clinical grounds and with relatively non-specific tests such as the formol-gel test. Among 14 newly diagnosed VL patients with bone-marrow slides confirmed positive in two independent laboratories, the sensitivity of both tests was 100%. Among 113 controls with no personal or household history of VL, the specificity of the rK39 was 100% while that of the DAT was 93%. The rK39 was less expensive than DAT, and has the advantages of ease of use and obtaining results within minutes. The wider use of the rK39 dipstick test could improve the specificity of VL diagnosis in Nepal.Use of the Kala-Azar Detect® and IT-LEISH® rapid tests for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.The performances of two rapid tests and a standard serological test for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) were compared using sera from 193 patients with VL and 85 controls. The Kala-Azar Detect(®), IT-LEISH(®) and IFI-LH(®) assays showed sensitivities of 88.1%, 93.3% and 88.6%, respectively, and specificities of 90.6%, 96.5% and 80%, respectively. The sensitivity values were similar for both rapid tests, but the specificity and positive predictive values of IT-LEISH(®) were higher than the corresponding values for IFI-LH(®). Both rapid tests showed satisfactory performances and can be used in primary health care settings; however, IT-LEISH(®) permits the use of whole blood, making this assay more suitable for bedside diagnosis.Assessment of the direct agglutination test, fast agglutination screening test, and rK39 dipstick test for the sero-diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Syria.To evaluate the performances of 3 serological assays (direct agglutination test [DAT], fast agglutination screening test [FAST], recombinant protein [rK39] dipstick) test for use in primary care, for the diagnosis visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Syria.We utilized 267 serum samples obtained during 2007 from patient groups confirmed and suspected VL, confirmed cutaneous leishmaniasis, toxoplasmosis from endemic areas in Syria and control samples, and applied the 3 serological tests in the Damascus University, Damascus and Health laboratories at the same time, on these samples.Our data show that the tests were very sensitive, where the DAT was the most specific followed by FAST, then rK39 dipstick.Our study confirmed that all the tests performed well, and proved to be very important sero-diagnosis tools for visceral leishmaniasis.Comparison of an rK39 dipstick rapid test with direct agglutination test and splenic aspiration for the diagnosis of kala-azar in Sudan.We compared an rK39 dipstick rapid test (Amrad ICT, Australia) with a direct agglutination test (DAT) and splenic aspirate for the diagnosis of kala-azar in 77 patients. The study was carried out under field conditions in an endemic area of north-east Sudan. The sensitivity of the rK39 test compared with splenic aspiration was 92% (46/50), the specificity 59% (16/27), and the positive predictive value 81% (46/57). Compared with the diagnostic protocol used by Médecins sans Frontières, the sensitivity of the rK39 test was 93% (50/54), the specificity 70% (16/23), and the positive predictive value 88% (50/57). Compared with splenic aspirates, the sensitivity of a DAT with a titre > or =1:400 was 100% (50/50), but its specificity only 55% (15/27) and the positive predictive value was 80% (50/62). Using a DAT titre > or =1:6400, the sensitivity was 84% (42/50), the specificity 85% (23/27) and the positive predictive value 91% (42/46). All four patients with DAT titre > or =1:6400 but negative splenic aspirate were also rK39 positive; we consider these are probably 'true' cases of kala-azar, i.e. false negative aspirates, rather than false DAT and rK39 seropositives. There were no false negative DATs (DAT titre < or =1:400 and aspirate positive), but there were four false negative rK39 tests (rK39 negative and aspirate positive). The rK39 dipstick is a good screening test for kala-azar; but further development is required before it can replace the DAT as a diagnostic test in endemic areas of the Sudan.Evaluation of a rapid immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of kala-azar & post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis at a tertiary care centre of north India.Definitive diagnosis of kala-azar requires demonstration of parasites by diagnostic protocols based on invasive organ aspirations. We evaluated in the present study the diagnostic utility of an immunochromatographic test (ICT) for detection of anti- rK-39 antibodies for the non-invasive diagnosis of kala-azar and post kala-azar dermal leishmaniasis (PKDL) at a tertiary care centre of north India.The study was conducted in the Department of Microbiology, All India Institute of Medical Sciences, New Delhi, from July 2003 to October 2004. Of the 120 samples tested, 57 were found to be positive by ICT; of which, 51 were diagnosed as kala-azar and 6 as PKDL. The controls included individuals from endemic (50) and non endemic (19) areas with malignancies, haemolytic disorders, chronic liver diseases, hypersplenism, portal hypertension, metabolic disorders and sarcoidosis. In addition, 47 sera from confirmed cases of tuberculosis, malaria, typhoid, filariasis, leptospirosis, histoplasmosis, toxoplasmosis, invasive aspergillosis, amoebic liver abscess, AIDS, leprosy, cryptococcosis, strongyloidiasis, cyclosporosis, patients having collagen vascular diseases and hypergammaglobulinaemia were also tested to check the specificity of the test.Of the 51 cases with kala-azar 43 were males, children accounted for 25 per cent of these cases. All had fever of duration ranging from <1 month to 1.5 yr (median 4.5 months). All PKDL patients (n=6, 4 males) gave a history of having suffered from kala-azar in the past, and their slit skin test smears were microscopically positive for Leishman-Donovan (LD) bodies. The strip test was positive in all the cases of kala-azar and PKDL (estimated sensitivity 100%), all control sera were negative by the ICT (specificity 100%).The rK-39 ICT is a highly sensitive and specific test, and may be suitable for a rapid, cost-effective and reliable field diagnosis of kala-azar and PKDL.Imported visceral leishmaniasis: diagnostic dilemmas and comparative analysis of three assays.The present study evaluates the performances of three noninvasive serological assays for the detection of immunoglobulin G antibodies to leishmania antigen for the diagnosis of imported cases of kala azar (visceral leishmaniasis [VL]) in a country, Kuwait, where the disease is not endemic. A total of 323 individuals including 21 patients with documented cases of VL, 72 individuals with suspected cases of VL, 155 patients with other parasitic infections, and 75 healthy control individuals were tested by indirect hemagglutination assay (IHA; Behring Diagnostics GmbH, Marburg, Germany), indirect fluorescent-antibody assay (IFA; bioMerieux sa, Marcy l'Etoile, France), and a qualitative membrane-based immunoassay with recombinant leishmania antigen K39 (strip-test; Intersep Ltd, Berkshire, United Kingdom). Our data show that IHA is the most sensitive test (100%), followed by IFA (86.6%) and the strip-test (80.0%). The strip-test was the most specific (100%) of the three assays, followed by IFA (93.0%) and IHA (86.0%). However, the strip-test failed to detect at least three confirmed cases of VL. We conclude that IHA is preferred over IFA and the strip-test for the screening of individuals with suspected cases of VL, especially in a country where VL is not endemic and where the number of cases is regular but limited. The details about some of the patients with VL are presented to highlight the diversity of clinical presentations and problems encountered in the diagnosis of VL in a country where VL is not endemic.A rapid and simple diagnostic test for active visceral leishmaniasis.We have developed an immunodot assay for the serodiagnosis of active visceral leishmaniasis (AVL) which utilizes protein A colloidal gold as the visualizing agent. The test is simple, requires few reagents, and can be completed in two hours. It is sensitive and specific for active visceral leishmaniasis, and generally correlates with the ELISA. Either whole blood or sera in minute quantities may be used as test antibody. In addition, the use of the protein A gold immunodot is shown to detect anti-leishmania antibodies in infected dogs.Rapid detection of human Leishmania infantum infection: a comparative field study using the fast agglutination screening test and the direct agglutination test.This study aimed to evaluate the performance of a fast agglutination screening test (FAST) for serodiagnosis of human Leishmania infantum infection in Iran. FAST is based on the direct agglutination test (DAT) but combines with a higher parasite concentration and is performed with only one serum dilution. The validity of FAST for the detection of L. infantum infection in the field was compared with the direct agglutination test on 110 confirmed or patients suspected of infection with leishmaniasis, 177 healthy individuals and 41 patients with other infectious diseases who were from northwestern and southern parts of Iran. In this study, we found a 1:1600 cut-off point empirically by seeking the best correlation (90.8) between sera confirmed with visceral leishmaniasis and healthy control sera. A sensitivity of 95.4% (95% CI, 91.4-99.4) and specificity of 88.5% (95% CI, 84.2-92.8) were found with 1:1600 as a cut-off titer when DAT-confirmed cases were compared with the control groups. A good degree of agreement was found between FAST and DAT (90.8%) by Kappa analysis. FAST requires 2 h for reading the results versus the 12-18 h needed for DAT. As FAST is simple, rapid, sensitive and non-invasive and does not require a higher volume of antigens or much expertise, it can be used for screening and serodiagnosis of human L. infantum infection.Field use of the Dot-ELISA test for visceral leishmaniasis in Honduras.Detection of circulating antigens in sera from visceral leishmaniasis patients using dot-ELISA.The anti-amastigote IgG antibodies were raised in rabbits purified and fractionated using the standard methods. From the same anti-amastigote IgG antibodies, a peroxidase conjugate reagent was prepared. Initially, the anti-amastigote IgG antibodies and their corresponding peroxidase conjugate reagents were analyzed with respect to their ability to recognise the homologous antigens. Thirty five serum samples from visceral leishmaniasis patients (VLP) were examined using dot-ELISA. In addition, thirty seven serum samples from either non-infected individuals or from patients infected with heterologous organisms were used to define the sensitivity and specificity of the test. Circulating antigens in 35 serum samples from VLP were successfully identified using dot-ELISA giving 100% sensitivity. With exception of serum samples from patients with Plasmodium vivax which shown cross-reactivity with Leishmania donovani antigens, the test appeared to be specific for the detection of circulating leishmanial antigens. Cross-reactivity was not observed with P. faciparum or Brucellosis.Immunochromatographic rK39 strip test in the serodiagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Tunisia.The performance of the rK39 strip test in the diagnosis of Tunisian visceral leishmaniasis (VL) was evaluated and compared with that of immunofluorescent antibody test (IFAT). A total of 929 sera, including 574 from VL patients, 54 from cutaneous leishmaniasis (CL) patients, 42 from patients with other protozoan diseases, 152 from patients with non-parasitic diseases and 107 from healthy controls, were used in the study. The sensitivity and specificity of the rK39 strip test were 87.1 and 94.4%, respectively. Sixteen CL sera showed positive results, suggesting that the rK39 strip test is not restricted to Leishmania donovani complex detection. IFAT was comparatively more sensitive (98.9%) but slightly less specific (90.7%). Despite cross-reactivity shown by CL sera, the rK39 strip test can be recommended for the routine diagnosis of VL in Tunisia, as VL and CL are distinct clinical entities.False-positive results of a rapid K39-based strip test and Chagas disease.The definitive diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) requires invasive procedures with demonstration of amastigotes in tissue or promastigotes in culture. Unfortunately, these approaches require laboratory materials not available in poor countries where the disease is endemic. The correct diagnosis of VL is important, and made more difficult by the fact that several common tropical diseases such as malaria, disseminated tuberculosis, and enteric fever share the same clinical presentation. Serological tests have been developed to replace parasitological diagnosis in the field. A commercially available K39-based strip test for VL has been developed for this purpose. The endemic area of leishmaniasis in Brazil overlaps the endemic area of Chagas disease, a disease that can cause false-positive serological test results. The aim of this study was to evaluate the incidence of false-positive exams using a rapid test for VL in patients with Chagas disease.A rapid test based on the recombinant K39 antigen of Leishmania was used in: (1) 30 patients with confirmed Chagas disease, (2) 30 patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease by ELISA, indirect immunofluorescence, indirect hemagglutination, and chemiluminescence, (3) 30 healthy patients from a non-endemic area as the control group, (4) 30 patients with confirmed VL, and (5) 20 patients with proved cutaneous leishmaniasis.The sensitivity and specificity of the rapid strip test were 100% when compared with healthy volunteers and those with confirmed Chagas disease. One false-positive result occurred in the group with Chagas disease diagnosed by serological tests (specificity of 96%).The rapid test based on recombinant K39 is a useful diagnostic assay, and a false-positive result rarely occurs in patients with a serological diagnosis of Chagas disease.Qualitative and semi-quantitative comparison of an rK39 strip test and direct agglutination test for detection of anti-Leishmania donovani antibodies in the Sudan.Until now, the comparison of the rK39 strip test (RKT) and direct agglutination test (DAT) for detection of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is exclusively based on either positive or negative qualification of the reaction outcome.In this study, we compared the diagnostic performance of RKT and DAT for VL both qualitatively and semi-quantitatively.For comparison based on semi-quantitative grounds, the execution of RKT and DAT was according to the standard procedures. For comparison on semi-qualitative grounds with DAT, the RKT was applied to aliquots from positive samples that were two-fold serially diluted in saline to determine, as for the DAT, the end-point reaction in RKT.While qualitatively both RKT and DAT demonstrated comparable reliability for VL detection (sensitivity = 96% and specificity = 98.7% or 99.3%), no significant correlation (r = 0.13) could be established between intensities of their positive reactions in 25 cases studied. A negative correlation was further determined in those 25 VL cases between the positive intensities of the RKT and antibody levels measured semi-quantitatively with the same procedure (r = -0.36) or the DAT (r = -0.30). Irrespective of the low, moderate or high antibody levels measured with RKT (< or = 1:8 and 1:16-1:32 > or = 1:256) or DAT (< or = 1:25,600 and 1:51,200- 1:409,600 > or = 1:3,276,800) in patients with confirmed or unconfirmed VL infection, exclusively strong positive intensities were obtained with RKT.For further optimizing diagnosis and simultaneously assessing magnitude of immune response to L. donovani infection in Sudanese patients, the combined application of RKT and DAT is recommended.Serological diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis: direct agglutination test versus rK39 strip test.We evaluated the direct agglutination test (DAT), using freeze-dried (FD) and aqueous (AQ) antigen, and the rK39 immunochromatographic strip test in the diagnosis of Indian visceral leishmaniasis (VL). Sera from 508 subjects (150 parasitologically confirmed patients with VL, 100 and 153 healthy controls drawn from non-endemic and endemic regions, respectively, and 105 patients with other diseases presenting with fever and/or splenomegaly) were tested. The sensitivity of the tests were as follows: DAT (FD), 96% (95% CI 91-98); DAT (AQ), 97% (95% CI 93-99); rK39 strip test, 99% (95% CI 95-100). The specificity of DAT (FD), DAT (AQ) and rK39 strip tests were 85% (95% CI 81-88), 87% (95% CI 83-91) and 89% (95% CI 86-92), respectively. A significant correlation (high degree of agreement) was observed between all tests (kappa>0.80). We conclude that the sensitivity of FD antigen is comparable to that of AQ antigen. Similarly, the rK39 strip test is as sensitive as the DAT, but the strip test's greater convenience of use makes it a better tool for diagnosis of VL in peripheral areas of endemic regions.Urine antigen detection by latex agglutination test for diagnosis and assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis.This prospective study evaluated the usefulness of the kala-azar latex agglutination test (KAtex) for the diagnosis and laboratory assessment of initial cure of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) (or kala-azar) patients following 30 days of sodium antimony gluconate treatment at Rajshahi Medical College Hospital (Bangladesh). KAtex detects a low molecular weight, heat-stable, carbohydrate antigen in the urine of VL patients. KAtex was performed using freshly voided urine samples obtained from 36 parasitologically confirmed cases of VL before and after treatment as well as from 40 healthy controls (20 each from kala-azar-endemic and non-endemic zones). KAtex was found to be positive in 27 (75%) of the 36 patients at diagnosis and was negative in all the controls. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of KAtex were 75% (95% CI 57-87%) and 100% (95% CI 89-100%), respectively. Following treatment, all 36 VL cases were negative for Leishman-Donovan bodies by splenic smear microscopy and 34 (94.4%) were negative by KAtex. This limited study suggests that KAtex is a satisfactorily sensitive, highly specific, rapid and completely non-invasive urine-based antigen detection test for the diagnosis of VL. Currently, this is the only non-invasive laboratory tool useful for the assessment of initial cure in VL patients.A community-based, comparative evaluation of direct agglutination and rK39 strip tests in the early detection of subclinical Leishmania donovani infection.In the Indian state of Bihar, the sensitivities and specificities of direct agglutination tests (DAT) and rK39 test strips for the detection of Leishmania donovani infection in humans were explored and found to be generally good (92%-100%). When 172 asymptomatic individuals [16 'case-contacts' who lived in the same households as past or current, confirmed cases of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) and 156 other subjects from neighbouring households] were tested, the same 36 (21%) individuals, including all 16 'case-contacts', were found seropositive using each type of test. When followed-up after 3 months, 18 of the individuals who had been found seropositive in the baseline survey remained seropositive, and eight (44%) of these had developed symptomatic VL, with amastigotes in their splenic aspirates. Seven (44%) of the 16 'case-contacts' but only one (5%) of the other 20 subjects found seropositive at baseline went on to develop VL within 3 months. Although the strip test appeared slightly better than DAT for predicting the development of VL in the 172 subjects, either type of test may be very useful for the early detection of asymptomatic L. donovani infection and thus the identification of those at relatively high risk of developing VL.Diagnostic tests for kala-azar: a multi-centre study of the freeze-dried DAT, rK39 strip test and KAtex in East Africa and the Indian subcontinent.Three diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), the freeze-dried direct agglutination test (FD-DAT), the rK39 dipstick and a urine latex antigen test (KAtex), were evaluated for use in primary care in East Africa and the Indian subcontinent. Clinical suspects were prospectively recruited and tissue, blood and urine samples were taken. Direct microscopic examination of tissue smear, and FD-DAT, rK39 and KAtex were performed. Sensitivity and specificity with 95% credible intervals were estimated using Bayesian latent class analysis. On the Indian subcontinent both the FD-DAT and the rK39 strip test exceeded the 95% sensitivity and 90% specificity target, but not so in East Africa. Sensitivity of the FD-DAT was high in Ethiopia and Kenya but lower in Sudan, while its specificity was below 90% in Kenya. Sensitivity of the rK39 was below 80% in the three countries, and its specificity was only 70% in Ethiopia. KAtex showed moderate to very low sensitivity in all countries. FD-DAT and rK39 can be recommended for clinical practice on the Indian subcontinent. In East Africa, their clinical use should be carefully monitored. More work is needed to improve existing formats, and to develop better VL diagnostics.Recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test for diagnosis of human leishmaniasis.A new recombinant K39 immunochromatographic test (ICT) was compared with the immunofluorescent antibody assay (IFA) for the rapid serological diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in Apulia, Southern Italy. A total of 264 individuals were tested, including 19 patients with VL (three of which were HIV positive), 67 individuals with suspected VL, 40 healthy controls and 138 patients with other diseases. The ICT was positive in all 19 patients with VL and negative in sera from the remaining individuals. Both the sensitivity and specificity of ICT was 100%. The ICT also worked well in HIV-Leishmania co-infected patients. Antibodies to Leishmania detected by the IFA and ICT remained at detectable levels for up to 12-24 months. A positive reaction by the ICT was detectable at a serum dilution of up to 1:20,480, indicating that a strong immunoresponse is mounted against the recombinant K39 antigen. In conclusion, the ICT is highly sensitive, specific, rapid, noninvasive and cost effective (euro8.43 for ICT and euro12 for IFA) in the diagnosis of VL in areas of low VL endemicity.Comparison of parasitological, serological, and molecular tests for visceral leishmaniasis in HIV-infected patients: a cross-sectional delayed-type study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the accuracy of invasive and non-invasive tests for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in a large series of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected patients. In this delayed-type cross-sectional study, 113 HIV-infected symptomatic patients were evaluated by an adjudication committee after clinical follow-up to establish the presence or absence of VL as the target condition (reference test). The index tests were recombinant K39 antigen-based immunochromatographic test (rK39), indirect fluorescent antibody test (IFAT), prototype kit of direct agglutination test (DAT-LPC), and real-time polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) in peripheral blood. Compared with parasitological test and adjudication committee diagnosis or latent class model analyses, IFAT and rk39 dipstick test presented the lowest sensitivity. DAT-LPC exhibited good overall performance, and there was no statistical difference between DAT-LPC and qPCR diagnosis accuracy. Real-time PCR emerges as a less invasive alternative to parasitological examination for confirmation of cases not identified by DAT.Dot enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (Dot-ELISA): a micro technique for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.A micro enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay utilizing antigen dotted onto nitrocellulose filter discs (Dot-ELISA) was developed for the rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis. Leishmania donovani promastigotes applied to filter discs in volumes of 1 microliter were placed in 96-well microtiter plates, blocked with bovine serum albumin, then incubated with 4-fold dilutions of patient sera. After incubation with peroxidase-conjugated anti-human antibody, washing and addition of precipitable substrate, positive reactions appeared as blue dots on a white background which were easily read by eye. The procedure is performed at room temperature, takes about 2 h and is economical. At a reciprocal diagnostic titer of greater than or equal to 32, 41 of 42 (98%) leishmaniasis patients were positive, and positive titers ranged from 512 to 524,288. Control sera from healthy individuals showed 1 of 50 (2%) false positive reactions. Sera from patients with African trypanosomiasis, Chagas' disease, and lupus erythematosus were cross-reactive in the Dot-ELISA. No cross-reactivity was noted with sera from patients with amebiasis, coccidioidomycosis, cutaneous leishmaniasis, viral hepatitis, hydatidosis, malaria, schistosomiasis, syphilis, toxoplasmosis or trichinosis. In replicate experiments, 90% of 167 sera tested did not vary in titer. This rapid and inexpensive test should prove to be an important field diagnostic technique for visceral leishmaniasis.Field evaluation of FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX (urine latex agglutination) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in northwest Ethiopia.Three novel diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL), namely FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX, were evaluated under field conditions using 101 clinical cases suspected of having VL enrolled in a trial either by active (63 patients) or passive (38 patients) surveillance. VL was confirmed in 49 patients: 35 by both aspirate smear microscopy and NNN culture, 10 by NNN culture alone and 4 by aspirate smear microscopy alone. Based on tests performed in the field, sensitivity for FD-DAT, rK39 dipstick and KATEX was determined to be 95.3% (95% CI 82.9-99.2%), 71.7% (95% CI 56.3-83.5%) and 57.4% (95% CI 42.3-71.4%), respectively. Similarly, the specificity was determined to be 62.7% (95% CI 48.1-75.5%), 82.4% (95% CI 68.6-91.1%) and 84.3% (95% CI 70.9-92.5%), respectively. A higher sensitivity of KATEX (73.9% vs. 41.7%) and higher specificity of FD-DAT (100.0% vs. 48.6%) were demonstrated under passive case detection compared with active case detection. FD-DAT is recommended for confirmation of VL diagnosis in hospital settings, whereas its use in the field will be limited to exclude VL in clinical suspects. The sensitivity of KATEX and rK39 dipstick tests needs to be improved to promote their use as first-line diagnostic tests in the field setting of northwestern Ethiopia.Immunochromatographic (rK39) strip test in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Bangladesh.Immunochromatographic strip test (ICT strip test) for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis was evaluated in this study in the context of a case-control study. A total sixty consecutive cases of kala-azar admitted in all four Medicine Units of Mymensingh Medical College Hospital during the period of May 2002 to February 2003 was included here. Parasitological confirmation was done by demonstration of leishmania donovani bodies in bone marrow or splenic aspiration in all cases. A total 120 controls was taken of which sixty were asymptomatic endemic controls with no previous history of kala-azar and sixty were admitted patients suffering from diseases other than kala-azar (malaria, tuberculosis, enteric fever and chronic liver disease). ICT strip test for kala-azar was done in all cases and controls. Only 2 of the confirmed kala-azar cases were negative and the remaining 58 cases were positive for ICT strip test which gives the sensitivity of this test 96.6%. Among the controls, 118 were negative for ICT strip test and two of the asymptomatic controls were positive for this test with no clinical evidence of kala-azar. So, the estimated specificity of ICT strip test is 98.3%. The predictive value for a negative result was 98.3% and for a positive result was 96.6%. The ICT strip test is easy, quick, requires no technical facilities with higher sensitivity and specificity entails it to be the ideal test for the diagnosis of kala-azar in field level.[Non invasive diagnostic tools for visceral leishmaniasis: a comparison of the immunoserological tests DAT, rK26 and rK39].Human visceral leishmaniasis is a serious public health problem in endemic countries because of its high potential lethality, particularly in children. Rapid diagnosis is essential to early treatment and control of visceral leishmaniasis.The aim was to compare three serodiagnostic tools for human visceral leishmaniasis.Three methods were compared: the rK39 dipstick (Kalazar detection test, Inbios International Inc.), ELISA rK26 and direct agglutination test (DAT) (KIT Biomedical Research). Fifty serum samples from patients positive for rK39 ELISA were compared from four endemic provinces in Venezuela: Nueva Esparta (Margarita island), Lara, Anzoátegui and Trujillo. Additional serum samples from 17 healthy volunteers and 25 patients with other diseases were included. The rK39 ELISA served as the baseline standard method. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and likelihood ratio were calculated for each test.All methods had a positive correlation with rK39 ELISA (p<0.0001). They showed high sensitivity and specificity. The direct agglutination test and the rK39 dipstick showed high sensitivity values, 89.7% (95% CI: 81.34.0-98.2%) and 94.2% (95% CI: 87.7-100%), respectively, and high specificity, 81.0% (95% CI: 80.0-99.5%) and 100%. The rK26 ELISA showed good specificity, 99% (95% CI: 95.2-100%), but a very low sensitivity, 37% (95% CI: 23.4-50.2%).Overall results indicated that DAT and rK39 dipstick have the highest specificity and sensitivity. Both are simple, cost-effective and field applicable tests. Therefore, they are recommended for early and accurate diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Design, development and evaluation of rK28-based point-of-care tests for improving rapid diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis.Visceral leishmaniasis (VL) is diagnosed by microscopic confirmation of the parasite in bone marrow, spleen or lymph node aspirates. These procedures are unsuitable for rapid diagnosis of VL in field settings. The development of rK39-based rapid diagnostic tests (RDT) revolutionized diagnosis of VL by offering high sensitivity and specificity in detecting disease in the Indian subcontinent; however, these tests have been less reliable in the African subcontinent (sensitivity range of 75-85%, specificity of 70-92%). We have addressed limitations of the rK39 with a new synthetic polyprotein, rK28, followed by development and evaluation of two new rK28-based RDT prototype platforms.Evaluation of 62 VL-confirmed sera from Sudan provided sensitivities of 96.8% and 93.6% (95% CI = K28: 88.83-99.61%; K39: 84.30-98.21%) and specificities of 96.2% and 92.4% (95% CI = K28: 90.53-98.95%; K39: 85.54-96.65%) for rK28 and rK39, respectively. Of greater interest was the observation that individual VL sera with low rK39 reactivity often had much higher rK28 reactivity. This characteristic of the fusion protein was exploited in the development of rK28 rapid tests, which may prove to be crucial in detecting VL among patients with low rK39 antibody levels. Evaluation of two prototype lateral flow-based rK28 rapid tests on 53 VL patients in Sudan and 73 VL patients in Bangladesh provided promisingly high sensitivities (95.9% [95% CI = 88.46-99.1 in Sudan and 98.1% [95% CI = 89.93-99.95%] in Bangladesh) compared to the rK39 RDT (sensitivities of 86.3% [95% CI = 76.25-93.23%] in Sudan and 88.7% [95% CI = 76.97-95.73%] in Bangladesh).Our study compares the diagnostic accuracy of rK39 and rK28 in detecting active VL cases and our findings indicate that rK28 polyprotein has great potential as a serodiagnostic tool. A new rK28-based RDT will prove to be a valuable asset in simplifying VL disease confirmation at the point-of-care.Field evaluation of rK39 test and direct agglutination test for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in a population with high prevalence of human immunodeficiency virus in Ethiopia.Accuracy of an rK39 rapid diagnostic test (DiaMed-IT-Leish ) for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) was compared with splenic aspiration and the direct agglutination test (DAT) in a population with a high prevalence of infection with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in Ethiopia. There were 699 patients clinically suspected of having VL (153 parasitologically confirmed, 482 DAT confirmed, and 130 DAT negative), and 97 DAT-negative controls. A total of 84% were tested for HIV and 34% were HIV positive. Sensitivity of the rK39 test in parasitologically confirmed VL patients was 84% (77% in HIV positive and 87% in HIV negative; P = 0.25). Sensitivity of the DAT was higher (94%; P = 0.01), 89% in HIV-positive patients and 95% in HIV-negative patients; P = 0.27). Specificity of the rK39 test was 99% in DAT-negative controls and 92% in DAT-negative patients clinically suspected of having VL. A diagnostic algorithm combining DAT and the rK39 test had a sensitivity of 98% in HIV-positive VL patients and 99% in HIV-negative VL patients. Despite the lower sensitivity in a population with a high prevalence of HIV, the DiaMed-IT-Leish rK39 test enables decentralization of diagnosis. Patients clinically suspected of having VL who show negative results on the rK39 antigen test should undergo follow-up DAT testing, especially if they are HIV positive.Evaluation of a new recombinant K39 rapid diagnostic test for Sudanese visceral leishmaniasis.A new rK39 rapid diagnostic dipstick test (DiaMed-IT-Leish) was compared with aspiration and a direct agglutination test (DAT) for diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in 201 parasitologically confirmed cases, 133 endemic controls, and in 356 clinical suspects in disease-endemic and -epidemic areas in Sudan. The sensitivity of the rK39 test in parasitologically confirmed VL cases was 90%, whereas the specificity in disease-endemic controls was 99%. The sensitivity of the DAT was 98%. In clinically suspected cases, the sensitivity of the rK39 test was 81% and the specificity was 97%. When compared with the diagnostic protocol based on the DAT and aspiration used by Médecins sans Frontières in epidemic situations, the positive predictive value was 98%, and the negative predictive value was 71%. This rK39 rapid diagnostic test is suitable for screening as well as diagnosis of VL. Further diagnostic work-up of dipstick-negative patients with clinically suspected VL is important. The ease and convenience of the dipstick test will allow decentralization and improved access to care in disease-endemic areas in Sudan.Comparative evaluation of parasitology and serological tests in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in India: a phase III diagnostic accuracy study.In this phase III trial for diagnostics for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in India, we compared parasitological diagnosis with several serological tests: direct agglutination test (freeze dried; DAT-FD), rK-39 strip test, rK-26 strip test and a latex agglutination test for antigen detection in urine (KAtex) in 452 subjects from the endemic regions of Bihar, India. The subjects were segregated into four categories: 230 confirmed patients, 52 probable cases, 70 non-cases and 100 healthy endemic controls. The first two groups were used for estimating sensitivity, the latter two for specificity. Sensitivity of DAT-FD was 98.9%, rK-39: 98.9%, KAtex: 67.0% and rK-26: 21.3%. Sensitivity of DAT-FD on blood taken on filter paper (DAT-FDF) was 99.3%, which was comparable with that using serum. Specificity of serological tests was comparable and high (DAT-FD and DAT-FDF: 94%, rK-39 strip test: 97%, KAtex: 99% and rK-26 strip test: 100%). The classical 'gold standard' parasitological demonstration in splenic smear performed poorly as it missed 18.4% of cases that benefited from VL treatment. Reproducibility of the serological tests between field and central laboratories was excellent (kappa = 1.0, 0.99, 0.96 and 0.94 respectively for microscopy, DAT-FD, rK-39 strip test and rK-26 strip test). A high degree of agreement was observed between DAT-FD and rK-39 strip test (kappa = 0.986). Although DAT-FD and rK-39 strip test were highly sensitive with excellent specificity, the ease of use of the latter makes it most suitable for the diagnosis of VL in the field conditions.Field validity, reproducibility and feasibility of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in rural Nepal.To assess the field accuracy, reproducibility and feasibility of the formol gel test (FGT), the urine latex agglutination test (KAtex) and a rK39 antigen-based dipstick for the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis (VL) in rural Nepal.Patients with clinical suspicion of VL were recruited at Rangeli District Hospital (DH), a 15-bed government hospital located in south-eastern Nepal. FGT, KAtex and rK39 dipstick tests were performed on site and later repeated at a reference kala-azar diagnostic laboratory to assess reproducibility. Diagnosis of VL was confirmed by either a positive bone marrow aspirate examination or a positive direct agglutination test (DAT titre > or = 1:3200) in patients who later responded to anti-leishmanial therapy.Of 155 patients initially recruited, 142 (85 with VL and 57 with another diagnosis) were included in the study. The sensitivity of the rK39 dipstick [89%; 95% confidence interval (CI): 81-94] was significantly higher than that of the KAtex (57%; 95% CI: 46-67) and the FGT (52%; 95% CI: 41-62). All three tests had a specificity of at least 90%. Agreement was higher for the rK39 dipstick (kappa = 0.87) than for the FGT (0.68) and the KAtex (0.43). All tests required < or = 20 min of actual work and < or = 40 min to obtain the results.The rK39 dipstick was easy to do, more accurate and reproducible than other rapid diagnostic tests for VL in a DH of rural Nepal. It should be integrated into the field diagnostic algorithm of VL in this region and mechanisms to secure its availability should be found.Sero-epidemiological study of kala-azar in a village of Varanasi district, India.To evaluate five kala-azar serological tests for field use.Serological survey in Pandit Ka Purva village in Varanasi district, India, using Sia water test, aldehyde test, direct agglutination test (DAT), micro-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and dot-ELISA.The total population of the village was 518, 67 of whom showed typical clinical and parasitological features of kala-azar, including seven who died. The age distribution of kala-azar cases showed significant differences, being highest among the 45-54-year age group. The disease was more prevalent among males. Serum samples were collected from 498 persons (96% of total population) including 67 kala-azar cases and 40 disease controls (malaria, TB, leprosy, typhoid). Ten 10 serum samples from healthy controls living in endemic area were also collected. The test sensitivities were: Sia water test, 85.0%; aldehyde test, 62.7%; DAT, 94.0%; micro-ELISA, 91.0% and dot-ELISA, 97.0%. The test specificities were: Sia water test 92.5%, aldehyde test, 93.2%, DAT, 96.7; micro-ELISA, 97.6% and dot-ELISA, 98.4%.The dot-ELISA is highly sensitive and specific, cheap, and easy to interpret with the naked eye, making it a powerful screening test for the surveillance and diagnosis of Indian kala-azar at field level.Latent class analysis of diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil.To estimate the sensitivities and specificities of different diagnostic tests for visceral leishmaniasis (VL) using latent class analysis (LCA). This study was performed using data from a prospective study conducted in four Brazilian states from May 2004 to May 2007. Five diagnostic tests for VL were evaluated in 285 VL cases and 119 non-cases: microscopy, indirect fluorescence antibody test (IFAT), enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay using recombinant K39 antigen (rK39-ELISA), direct agglutination test (DAT) and the rK39 rapid test.Microscopy showed sensitivity of 77.0% (CI: 71.5-81.5) and specificity of 99.0% (CI: 94.0-99.7). The IFAT and the DAT showed similar sensitivities, 88.3% (CI: 84.0-92.0) and 88.5% (CI: 84.1-92.0), respectively, but the DAT had a higher specificity (95.4%, CI: 89.2-98.1) than did the IFAT (83.0%, CI: 75.0-88.2). The rK39-ELISA and the rK39 rapid test showed sensitivities of 99.0% (CI: 96.3-99.6) and 94.0% (CI: 90.1-96.3), and specificities of 82.5% (CI: 75.0-88.3) and 100% (CI: 97.0-100.0%), respectively.Considering the lack of an adequate reference standard, LCA proved to be a useful tool in validating diagnostic methods for VL. The DAT and the rK39 rapid test showed better performance. Thus, clinically suspected cases of VL in a Brazilian endemic area could be treated based on the positivity of one of these tests.[Evaluation of a rapid test using recombinant k39 antigen in the diagnosis of visceral leishmaniasis in Brazil ].